Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE A. HIGHER EDUCATION IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 51. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBCHAPTER A. CONTROL OF FUNDS

Sec. 51.001. INSTITUTIONS TO WHICH APPLICABLE. The provisions of this subchapter apply to each institution of higher education, as that term is defined by Section 61.003 of this code, including each public junior college to the extent possible.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1656, ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1973; Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 813, ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.05, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1070, Sec. 2, eff. May 15, 1988.

Sec. 51.002. FUNDS SUBJECT TO CONTROL. (a) The governing board of each institution listed in Section 51.001 of this code may retain control of the following sums of money collected at the institution, subject to Section 51.008 of this code:

(1) student fees of all kinds;

(2) charges for use of rooms and dormitories;

(3) receipts from meals, cafes, and cafeterias;

(4) fees on deposit refundable to students under certain conditions;

(5) receipts from school athletic activities;

(6) income from student publications and other student activities;

(7) receipts from the sale of publication products and miscellaneous supplies and equipment;

(8) students' voluntary deposits of money for safekeeping;

(9) all other fees and local or institutional funds arising out of and by virtue of the educational activities, research, or demonstrations carried on by the institution; and

(10) donations and gifts to the institution.

(b) The provisions of this subchapter do not apply to any income derived from the permanent university fund.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 481, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1991.

Sec. 51.003. DEPOSITORIES. (a) The governing board of each institution may select one or more depositories as places of deposit for the funds enumerated in Section 51.002 of this code. Depositories shall be selected on the basis of competitive bids. If bids are taken orally, the bids shall be tabulated by the person taking the bids and made a part of the permanent records of the institution.

(b) The funds shall either be deposited in the depository bank or banks or invested as authorized by Chapter 2256, Government Code (Public Funds Investment Act). Funds that are to be deposited in the depository bank or banks must be deposited within seven days from the date of receipt by the institution.

(c) The governing board shall require adequate surety bonds or securities to be posted to secure the deposits and may require additional security at any time it deems the deposits inadequately secured. The depository banks selected may pledge their securities to protect the funds.

(d) A depository shall pay interest on the deposits at a rate agreed on by the depository and the governing board.

(e) Any surety bond furnished under the provisions of this section shall be payable to the governor and his successors in office. Venue for a suit to recover an amount claimed by the state to be due on a surety bond is in Travis County.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the governing board of each institution may maintain unsecured deposits in a foreign bank as necessary to support the institution's academic and research operations in the foreign country in which the bank is located, provided that no appropriated or tuition funds other than those collected from students enrolled in the affected programs are deposited. The foreign bank must:

(1) be licensed and supervised by a central bank;

(2) be audited annually by an accounting firm that follows international financial reporting standards; and

(3) maintain a capital to total assets ratio that is not less than the greater of four percent or the minimum tier 1 capital to total assets ratio required for depository institutions insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 4.03, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 889, Sec. 8, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 402, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.0031. DEPOSITS AND INVESTMENTS. (a) A governing board may deposit funds under its control as provided in Section 51.003 of this code, may invest funds under its control in accordance with Chapter 2256, Government Code and, with regard to donations, gifts, and trusts, may establish endowment funds that operate as trusts and are managed under prudent person standards.

(b) Funds described in this section may also be invested in cash management and fixed income funds held by organizations exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 501(f)), as that section may be amended.

(c) If a governing board has under its control at least $25 million in book value of endowment funds, such governing board may invest all funds described in this section under prudent person standards.

(c-1) If a governing board does not have under its control at least $25 million in book value of endowment funds, the governing board may contract to pool its funds described in this section with another institution that meets the $25 million in book value of endowment funds threshold established under Subsection (c), and have its funds invested by that governing board under prudent person standards.

(d) As used in this section, "prudent person standard" is the standard of care described in Article VII, Section 11b, of the Texas Constitution, and means that standard of judgment and care that prudent investors, exercising reasonable care, skill, and caution, would acquire or retain in light of the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the fund then prevailing, taking into consideration the investment of all the assets of the fund rather than a single investment.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 4.04, eff. June 20, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 240, Sec. 4, eff. May 22, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 402, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 111 (S.B. 1019), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.0032. INVESTMENT REPORTS AND POLICIES. (a) A governing board shall adopt by rule or resolution a written investment policy for the investment of its institutional funds.

(b) Not less than quarterly, an institution of higher education shall prepare and submit to the governing board of the institution a written report of the institution's institutional funds investment transactions for the preceding reporting period.

(c) In addition to other information that may be required by the governing board, the report must contain:

(1) a summary statement of each pooled fund group that states the beginning market value for the reporting period, additions and changes to the market value during the period, and the ending market value for the period; and

(2) the book value and market value of each separately invested asset at the beginning and end of the reporting period by type of asset and fund type invested.

(d) In this section:

(1) "Governing board" means a governing board described in Section 51.0031(c).

(2) "Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education under the governance of a governing board to which this section applies.

(3) "Pooled fund group" means an internally created fund of an institution of higher education in which one or more institutional accounts are invested.

(4) "Separately invested asset" means an account of an institution of higher education that is not invested in a pooled fund group.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 402, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 51.004. SEPARATE ACCOUNTS; TRUST FUNDS; INTEREST. (a) Separate accounts shall be kept on the books of the institution showing the sources of all sums collected and the purposes for which disbursements are made.

(b) All trust funds, including gifts, grants, and bequests received, establishing or adding to endowment funds, loan and scholarship funds, and funds for other current restricted purposes, shall be credited to separate accounts and shall not be commingled with other local or institutional funds.

(c) If the governing board so elects, deposits of all funds not specifically required to be deposited to special accounts may be deposited in a single bank account if the records of the institution clearly reflect the balances attributable to general funds and various categories of trust funds.

(d) Interest received from depository banks for funds on deposit may be credited to an appropriate account in either general funds or trust funds in relation to the sources of temporary investments in time deposits, if the disposition of the earnings was not specified by the grantor. Interest received from the trust funds time deposits shall be available for loans, scholarships, fellowships, institutional research, faculty aid, and other lawful purposes.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 481, Sec. 2, eff. June 8, 1991.

Sec. 51.005. REPORTS. Each institution of higher education shall prepare a complete annual financial report as prescribed by Section 2101.011, Government Code.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 568, ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1975; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1187, ch. 455, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1053, ch. 484, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.06, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 98, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 449, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.0051. ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGETS. The governing board of each institution shall approve on or before September 1 of each year an itemized budget covering the operation of the institution for the fiscal year beginning on September 1 of each year. The budget shall be prepared within the limits of legislatively appropriated general revenue and estimated educational and general funds. The budget shall also include estimated institutional funds. Copies of each such budget shall be furnished to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board for distribution to the Governor's Budget and Planning Office, Legislative Budget Board, and Legislative Reference Library. Additional copies shall be delivered to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board as required. The governing board of the institution shall retain five copies of the budget for distribution to legislators or other state officials on request.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 481, Sec. 3, eff. June 8, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 51.0052. REPORT TO SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) In this section, "colonia" means a geographic area that:

(1) is an economically distressed area as defined by Section 17.921, Water Code;

(2) is located in a county any part of which is within 62 miles of an international border; and

(3) consists of 11 or more dwellings that are located in close proximity to each other in an area that may be described as a community or neighborhood.

(b) To assist the secretary of state in preparing the report required under Section 405.021, Government Code, an institution of higher education on a quarterly basis shall provide a report to the secretary of state detailing any projects funded by the institution of higher education that provide assistance to colonias.

(c) The report must include:

(1) a description of any relevant projects;

(2) the location of each project;

(3) the number of colonia residents served by each project;

(4) the exact amount spent or the anticipated amount to be spent on each colonia served by each project;

(5) a statement of whether each project is completed and, if not, the expected completion date of the project; and

(6) any other information, as determined appropriate by the secretary of state.

(d) The institution of higher education shall require an applicant for funds administered by the institution to submit to the institution a colonia classification number, if one exists, for each colonia that may be served by the project proposed in the application. If a colonia does not have a classification number, the institution of higher education may contact the secretary of state or the secretary of state's representative to obtain the classification number. On request of the institution, the secretary of state or the secretary of state's representative shall assign a classification number to the colonia.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 341 (S.B. 99), Sec. 10, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.006. FUNDS NOT TO BE USED TO INCREASE SALARIES. No part of any of the funds listed in Section 51.002 of this code shall ever be used to increase any salary beyond the sum fixed by the legislature in the general appropriations act; provided, however, that the use of such funds by an institution for this purpose may be specifically authorized by the legislature in general law or the general appropriations act.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 481, Sec. 4, eff. June 8, 1991.

Sec. 51.0065. APPLICABILITY OF ACROSS-THE-BOARD SALARY INCREASE. An institution of higher education that has adopted a pay-for-performance program that is in effect when an across-the-board salary increase for state employees made by an appropriation act of the legislature takes effect is entitled to receive any appropriation made for purposes of the across-the-board salary increase, and may use the amount appropriated for an across-the-board salary increase or for increases in compensation under the institution's pay-for-performance program.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 2.07, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 51.007. PENALTY. Any state officer, agent, employee, or member of a governing board of any of the above named institutions, or any other person who violates any provision of this subchapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $500, and in addition may be sentenced to not less than 15 days nor more than three months in the county jail. Failure to print and furnish to the officers above named, the reports above specified, shall subject all of the members of the governing board of the institutions above mentioned to the penalties provided for in this section. Every day in excess of the number of days hereinabove provided for that any sum of money belonging to any of the funds enumerated in this subchapter, whether depositable in special depositories or whether those that should be deposited in the state treasury, shall be withheld from deposit at its proper place of deposit, shall constitute a separate offense and each day of such withholding shall subject the officer, agent, employee, or person so withholding said sum to the penalties herein provided for.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.008. CERTAIN RECEIPTS TO BE DEPOSITED IN STATE TREASURY. (a) The governing board of every state institution of higher education is directed to designate special depository banks, subject to the approval of the comptroller, for the purpose of receiving and keeping certain receipts of the institution separate and apart from funds now deposited in the state treasury. The receipts here referred to are described in Subsection (b) of this section. The comptroller is directed to deposit the receipts, or funds representing such receipts, enumerated herein, in the special depository bank or banks nearest the institution credited with the receipts, so far as is practicable, and is authorized to withdraw such funds on drafts or checks prescribed by the comptroller. The comptroller is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to require collateral security for the protection of such funds pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 404, Government Code. For the purpose of facilitating the clearance and collection of the receipts herein enumerated, the comptroller is hereby authorized to deposit such receipts in any state depository bank and transfer funds representing such receipts enumerated herein to the respective special depository banks. Banks so designated as special depository banks are hereby authorized to pledge their securities to protect such funds.

(b) The governing board of every state institution of higher education shall deposit in the state treasury all cash receipts accruing to any college or university under its control that may be derived from all sources except auxiliary enterprises, noninstructional services, agency, designated, and restricted funds, endowment and other gift funds, student loan funds, funds retained under Chapter 145 of this code, and Constitutional College Building Amendment funds. The comptroller is directed to credit such receipts deposited by each such institution to a separate fund account for the institution depositing the receipts, but he shall not be required to keep separate accounts of types of funds deposited by each institution. For the purpose of facilitating the transferring of such institutional receipts to the state treasury, each institution shall open in a local depository bank a clearing account to which it shall deposit daily all such receipts, and shall, not less often than every seven days, make remittances therefrom to the comptroller of all except $500 of the total balance in said clearing account, such remittances to be in the form of checks drawn on the clearing account by the duly authorized officers of the institution, and no disbursements other than remittances to the state treasury shall be made from such clearing account. All money so deposited in the state treasury shall be paid out on warrants drawn by the comptroller as provided by law.

(c) The legislature is authorized to create revolving funds for the handling of funds of institutions of higher education, as enumerated herein, by making provision in each biennial appropriation bill enacted by the legislature.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the provisions of Title 47, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas, 1925, usually referred to as the State Depository Law. However, the limitation of deposits contained in Article 2532, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas, 1925, as amended, shall not apply insofar as the specific funds enumerated in this section are concerned.

(e) This section prevails over Sections 51.001-51.007 of this code to the extent of any conflict.

(f) Interest earned on the receipts deposited under this section to an institution's separate fund account in the state treasury shall be credited to that separate fund account.

(g) Revenues collected at institutions of higher education and deposited in the state treasury pursuant to this section and Section 34.017, Natural Resources Code, and the interest earned thereon, are dedicated to the institution which collected and deposited the funds irrespective of the year the funds were collected, deposited, or earned. These funds may be only used for the support, maintenance, and operation of the institution as provided for by law. Section 403.094(h), Government Code, does not apply to funds described in this section.

(h) Tuition revenues and revenue collected under Section 34.017, Natural Resources Code, that are deposited in the treasury pursuant to this section, and the interest earned on those revenues, shall be treated as designated funds in the general revenue fund. Notwithstanding a pledge of those revenues made or to be made in the proceedings approved by the governing board of an institution of higher education authorizing the issuance or incurrence of bonds, the deposit of those revenues in the treasury to the credit of an account in the general revenue fund does not:

(1) affect in any manner the pledge of the revenues or the governing board's ability to pledge the revenues to secure and pay bonds issued or incurred by the governing board in accordance with law;

(2) cause the bonds to constitute a debt of the state or be payable from the full faith and credit of the state;

(3) change the character of the revenues as separate revenue of the institution collecting the revenue; or

(4) cause the revenue to be considered general revenue for purposes of Sections 17 and 18, Article VII, Texas Constitution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4650, ch. 804, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.09, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 5.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.009. DEFINING AND ACCOUNTING FOR CERTAIN INCOME. (a) "Local funds" are the items to be accounted for as "educational and general funds" as described in Subsection (c) of this section, but do not include general revenue funds. These funds shall be accounted for in a manner recommended by the National Association of College and University Business Officers and approved by the comptroller of public accounts and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(b) "Institutional funds" means all funds collected at the institution that are not "educational and general funds" as described in Subsection (c) of this section. These funds shall be accounted for in a manner recommended by the National Association of College and University Business Officers and approved by the comptroller of public accounts and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) Each of the following shall be accounted for as educational and general funds:

(1) net tuition, special course fees charged under Sections 54.051(e) and (l), lab fees, student teaching fees, organized activity fees, and proceeds from the sale of educational and general equipment; and

(2) hospital and clinic fees received by a state-owned clinical care facility that is operated using general revenue fund appropriations for patient care.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 901, Sec. 36, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 481, Sec. 5, eff. June 8, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1227), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 1446), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.010. COLLECTION OF DELINQUENT OBLIGATIONS. If under the rules adopted by the attorney general under Chapter 2107, Government Code, an institution of higher education is not required to refer a delinquent obligation for collection to the attorney general, the institution is not required to expend resources for further collection efforts if, considering the amount, security, likelihood of collection, expense, and available resources, the institution determines that further collection should not be actively pursued.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.011. DISPOSITION OF SMALL CREDIT BALANCES. (a) This section applies to a credit balance of less than $25 held by an institution of higher education that is presumed abandoned under Chapter 72, Property Code.

(b) An institution of higher education may maintain an unclaimed money fund and transfer to that fund a credit balance to which this section applies. A deposit to the unclaimed money fund does not affect the ownership of the amount deposited. The institution shall:

(1) adopt procedures for owners to make and receive payments of claims against the fund; and

(2) maintain a database that permits members of the public to search for ownership of unclaimed funds.

(c) The institution of higher education shall use the fund to pay the claims of persons establishing ownership of amounts transferred to the fund and shall hold and account for the unclaimed money fund as educational and general funds of the institution. If the fund balance is insufficient to pay a valid claim, the institution shall pay the claim from the institution's other educational and general funds.

(d) Each fiscal year, after deducting funds sufficient to pay anticipated expenses of and claims against the unclaimed money fund, the institution shall use the balance of the fund as other educational and general funds of the institution.

(e) In consultation with institutions of higher education, the comptroller by rule may establish minimum requirements for notice to owners of unclaimed money deposited in the unclaimed money fund and for charges for that notice. The rules may not provide stricter requirements than the comptroller applies for amounts of less than $25 in the custody of the comptroller under Chapter 74, Property Code.

(f) If an institution of higher education maintains an unclaimed money fund under this section, Chapter 74, Property Code, does not apply to a credit balance to which this section applies.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.012. PAYMENTS BY ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER OR ELECTRONIC PAY CARD. An institution of higher education may make any payment through electronic funds transfer or by electronic pay card.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. FACULTY DEVELOPMENT LEAVES OF ABSENCE

Sec. 51.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned to it in Section 61.003 of this code, except that Texas State Technical College System is included and the Rodent and Predatory Animal Control Service is excluded for the purposes of this subchapter.

(2) "Governing board" means the body charged with policy direction of an institution of higher education.

(3) "Faculty member" means a person who is employed by an institution of higher education on a full-time basis as a member of the faculty or staff and whose duties include teaching, research, administration, including professional librarians, or the performance of professional services. However, the term does not include a person employed in a position which is in the institution's classified personnel system or a person employed in a similar type of position if the institution does not have a classified personnel system.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 51.102. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. The legislature finds that higher education is vitally important to the welfare, if not the survival, of Texas and the United States at this stage in history and that the quality of higher education is dependent upon the quality of college and university faculties. The legislature finds, therefore, that money spent on recognized means for producing an excellent system of public higher education is money spent to serve a public purpose of great importance. The legislature finds further that a sound program of faculty development leaves of absence designed to enable the faculty member to engage in study, research, writing, and similar projects for the purpose of adding to the knowledge available to himself, his students, his institution, and society generally is a well-recognized means for improving a state's program of public higher education. The legislature's purpose in establishing the faculty development leave program provided for by this subchapter is to improve further the higher education available to the youth at the state-supported colleges and universities and to establish this program of faculty development leaves as part of the plan of compensation for the faculty of these colleges and universities.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.103. GRANTING LEAVES OF ABSENCE; PROCEDURES. (a) On the application of a faculty member, the governing board of an institution of higher education may grant a faculty development leave of absence for study, research, writing, field observations, or other suitable purpose, to a faculty member if it finds that he is eligible by reason of service, that the purpose for which he seeks a faculty development leave is one for which a faculty development leave may be granted, and that granting leave to him will not place on faculty development leave a greater number of faculty members than that authorized.

(b) The governing board by regulation shall establish a procedure whereby the applications for faculty development leaves of absence are received by a committee elected by the general faculty for evaluation and whereby this faculty committee then makes recommendations to the chief administrative officer of the institution of higher education, who shall then make recommendations to the governing board as to which applications should be granted.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.104. SERVICE REQUIRED. A faculty member is eligible by reason of service to be considered for a faculty development leave when he has served as a member of the faculty of the same institution of higher education for at least two consecutive academic years. This service may be as an instructor or as an assistant, associate, or full professor, or an equivalent rank, and must be full-time academic duty but need not include teaching.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.105. DURATION AND COMPENSATION. (a) The governing board may grant to a faculty member a faculty development leave either for one academic year at one-half of his regular salary or for one-half academic year at his full regular salary. Payment of salary to the faculty member on faculty development leave may be made from the funds appropriated by the legislature specifically for that purpose, or from such other funds as might be available to the institution.

(b) A faculty member on faculty development leave may accept a grant for study, research, or travel from any institution of higher education, from a charitable, religious, or educational corporation or foundation, from any business enterprise, or from any federal, state, or local governmental agency. An accounting of all grants shall be made to the governing board of the institution by the faculty member. A faculty member on faculty development leave may not accept employment from any other person, corporation, or government, unless the governing board determines that it would be in the public interest to do so and expressly approves the employment.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3351, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1640, ch. 597, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1973; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 890, ch. 316, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Sec. 51.106. NUMBER ON LEAVE AT ONE TIME. Not more than six percent of the faculty members of any institution of higher education may be on faculty development leave at any one time.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.107. RIGHTS RETAINED. (a) A faculty member on faculty development leave shall continue to be a member of the Teacher Retirement System of Texas or of the Optional Retirement Program of the institution of higher education, or of both, just as any other member of the faculty on full-time duty.

(b) The institution of higher education shall cause to be deducted from the compensation paid to a member of the faculty on faculty development leave the deposit and membership dues required to be paid by him to the Teacher Retirement System of Texas or to the Optional Retirement Program, or both, the contribution for Old Age and Survivors Insurance, and any other amounts required or authorized to be deducted from the compensation paid any faculty member.

(c) A member of the faculty on faculty development leave is a faculty member for purposes of participating in the programs and of receiving the benefits made available by or through the institution of higher education or the state to faculty members.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.108. REGULATIONS CONCERNING ABSENCE. (a) The governing board of each college or university supported in whole or in part by state funds shall issue regulations concerning the authorized and unauthorized absence from duty of faculty members, including teaching assistants and research assistants.

(b) Each governing board shall file a copy of these regulations with the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System. Each governing board shall file any amendment to its regulations with the coordinating board not later than 30 days after the effective date of the amendment.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3352, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER D. INFORMATION NETWORK ASSOCIATIONS

Sec. 51.151. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Association" means the Western Information Network Association or any other regional network association created and named by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

(2) "Member" means one of the institutions of higher education which compose an association.

(3) "Associate member" means an organization other than an institution of higher education admitted to associate membership in an association.

(4) "Board" means the board of directors of an association.

(5) "Director" means a member of a board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.152. PURPOSE. The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the educational programs of state-supported institutions of higher education in Texas by authorizing the establishment and operation of a cooperative system for communication and information retrieval and transfer between the institutions and between the institutions and private educational institutions, industry, and the public. The system, employing two-way, closed-circuit television and other electronic communication facilities, is to provide a means of effecting the interchange of ideas, talents, faculties, libraries, and data processing equipment and a means of carrying out an approved program of instructional television.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.1521. INTERAGENCY CONTRACTS FOR NETWORKS. Any institution of higher education may enter into an interagency contract with one or more other institutions of higher education for the establishment and operation of a telecommunications network for the transmission of audio or video signals or electronic data, but only to the extent that the telecommunications services are not available through a system of telecommunications services established for state agencies generally. Each of those interagency contracts shall be reviewed by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 4.05, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 51.153. WESTERN INFORMATION NETWORK ASSOCIATION. (a) The Western Information Network Association is an agency of the state composed of the following state-supported member institutions of higher education: Amarillo College, Angelo State University, Clarendon Junior College, Frank Phillips College, Howard County Junior College, Midwestern University, Odessa College, South Plains College, Sul Ross State University, Texas Tech University, The University of Texas at El Paso, and West Texas State University.

(b) The board by a majority vote may admit other state-supported institutions of higher education to membership in the association on the approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

(c) The board by unanimous vote may admit private institutions of higher education to membership in the association on the approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

(d) The board by unanimous vote may admit other organizations to associate membership in the association.

(e) The Western Information Network Association is subject to the Texas Sunset Act (Chapter 325, Government Code). Unless continued in existence as provided by that Act, the association is abolished September 1, 1989.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1854, ch. 735, Sec. 2.157, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 197, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 51.154. BOARD OF DIRECTORS. The association is governed by a board of directors. The chief administrative officer, or a person designated by the chief administrative officer, of each institution of higher education holding membership in the association shall serve as a director of the board. Service on the board is an additional duty of employment of the chief administrative officers or the persons designated by the chief administrative officers of state-supported institutions and is not an additional position of honor, trust, or profit. The legislature finds that this service is necessary in accomplishing the purpose of this subchapter; is compatible with their employment; and will benefit the educational program of the institution and of the state.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.155. DIRECTOR'S EXPENSES. A director is entitled to receive reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in attending meetings of the board and in attending to the business of the association which is authorized by a resolution of the board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.156. MEETINGS OF THE BOARD; QUORUM; ACTION BY BOARD. (a) The board shall hold a meeting at least once each quarter and may hold meetings at other times at the call of the chairman of the board or at the request of a majority of the other directors.

(b) A majority of the membership of the board constitutes a quorum at a meeting of the board.

(c) Action may be taken by the board by the affirmative vote of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.157. CHAIRMAN, VICE CHAIRMAN. The board shall select a director to serve as chairman and a director to serve as vice chairman of the board. The chairman shall preside at meetings of the board. If the chairman is not present, or is unable to act, the vice chairman shall preside at the meeting.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.158. GENERAL MANAGER, EMPLOYEES. The board may employ a general manager who shall serve as the chief executive officer of the association. The board may employ other employees it considers necessary in carrying on the association's duties and functions.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.159. DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY. The board may delegate any of the powers, duties, or functions of the association to the general manager or to any other employee.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.160. BOND OF OFFICER, AGENT, OR EMPLOYEE. (a) The general manager and every agent or employee of the association charged with the collection, custody, or payment of any money of the association shall execute a bond conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties.

(b) The board shall approve the form, amount, and surety of the bond.

(c) The surety may be a surety company authorized to do business in this state.

(d) The association shall pay the premium on the bond.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.161. POWERS AND DUTIES OF ASSOCIATION. (a) The association may acquire, operate, and maintain, or obtain by contracting with any communications common carrier in accordance with its tariffs, a multichannel, two-way communications system, including closed-circuit television, linking classrooms, libraries, computer facilities, information retrieval systems, and communications facilities located at the member institutions.

(b) The association may lease, acquire, operate, and maintain, or obtain by contracting with any communications common carrier in accordance with its tariffs, any facilities in addition to those described in Subsection (a) of this section, which the board considers necessary or desirable in carrying out the purposes of this subchapter.

(c) The association is authorized to lease, as lessor or lessee, acquire, operate, maintain, and equip a dormitory or dormitories located on or near the campus of any member institution of the association that is a state-supported institution of higher education, and to issue its revenue bonds therefor as provided in this subchapter.

(d) The association may interchange educational information with private educational institutions, school districts, the United States government, and other parties engaged in education or participating in educational projects, and use the facilities of the association only in the exchange, retrieval, and transfer of information and the interchange of approval course offering and instruction between member-institutions and other parties engaged in education or participating in educational projects. Any dormitories leased, acquired, operated, and maintained by the association shall not be subject to the use limitation of this subsection that applies to all other facilities of the association.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.162. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The association may accept gifts, grants, or donations of real or personal property from any individual, group, association, or corporation. It may accept grants from the United States government subject to the limitations or conditions provided by law.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.163. INFORMATION NETWORK ASSOCIATION FUND. The Information Network Association Fund is a special fund in the state treasury. All money deposited in the treasury by the Western Information Network Association or any other regional network association created by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, shall be credited to the special fund and disbursed as provided by legislative appropriation.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.164. RULES AND REGULATIONS. The association shall adopt and publish rules to govern the conduct of its business.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.165. PRINCIPAL OFFICE. The board for Western Information Network Association shall maintain its principal office in Lubbock, at or near Texas Tech University. The boards for other regional information network associations created by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, shall maintain their principal offices at locations designated by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.166. FACILITIES. Each member institution shall furnish suitable space to the association for a classroom-studio, a lecture studio, and a control room. It may also furnish any additional physical plant facility needed by the association in carrying on its functions at the institution. The facilities may with the approval of the association board and the governing body of the state-supported member institutions be located in a dormitory owned and operated by the association.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.167. DESIGNATION OF REGIONS FOR ADDITIONAL ASSOCIATIONS. (a) In addition to the Western Information Network Association, the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, shall at such times as the board shall determine, divide the state into information network association regions consisting of state-supported institutions of higher education located within geographical boundaries prescribed by the coordinating board.

(b) The coordinating board shall give due consideration to the geographical proximity and number of institutions of higher education to be included within a proposed region.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.168. CREATION OF ADDITIONAL ASSOCIATIONS. (a) The coordinating board shall create and name an information network association within an information network region if:

(1) a majority of the institutions of higher education within a region apply to create an association; and

(2) the institutions applying show good cause for creating an association.

(b) The coordinating board may not create more than one information network association in an information network region.

(c) Each information network association created is an agency of the state.

(d) An information network association created under this section is subject to the Texas Sunset Act (Chapter 325, Government Code). Unless continued in existence as provided by that Act, the association is abolished September 1, 1989.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1854, ch. 735, Sec. 2.158, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 198, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 51.169. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO ADDITIONAL ASSOCIATIONS. Except for Subsection (a), Section 51.153 of this Code, the provisions of this subchapter apply to any additional information network association created by the coordinating board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.170. REVENUE BONDS. (a) The board may issue its revenue bonds for the purpose of providing funds to lease, as lessor or lessee, acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, or equip any property, buildings, structures, or other facilities, including but not limited to dormitories, for and on behalf of the association.

(b) The bonds shall be payable from and secured by liens on and pledges of all or any part of the revenues from any lease rentals, rentals, charges, fees, or other resources of the board or association.

(c) The bonds may be issued to mature serially or otherwise within not more than 40 years from their date. The board may provide for the subsequent issuance of additional parity bonds, or subordinate lien bonds, under the terms and conditions set forth in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(d) The bonds, and any interest coupons appertaining to them, are negotiable instruments. The bonds may be issued registrable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest. They shall be executed, and may be made redeemable prior to maturity, may be issued in the form, denominations, and manner, and under the terms, conditions, and details, may be sold in the manner, at the price, and under the terms, and shall bear interest at the rate or rates, as is determined and provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(e) Proceeds from the sale of the bonds may be used for paying interest on the bonds during the period of the acquisition or construction of any facilities to be provided through the issuance of the bonds and for providing a reserve for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. The proceeds may be placed on time deposit or invested until needed to the extent and in the manner provided in the bond resolution.

(f) The board shall fix and collect lease rentals, rentals, rates, charges, and fees, or any combination of them, from students or others for the occupancy, use, or availability of all or any of its property, buildings, structures, or other facilities in amounts which will be sufficient, together with any other pledged resources, to provide for all payments of principal, interest, and any other amounts required in connection with any bonds issued under this section, and, to the extent required by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, to provide for the payment of expenses in connection with the issuance of the bonds and for the payment of operation, maintenance, and other expenses in connection with the property, buildings, structures, or facilities.

(g) Fees for the use or availability of all or any property, buildings, structures, or facilities may be pledged to the payment of the bonds, and shall be fixed and collected in the manner determined and provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds. The board may pledge to the payment of the bonds all or any part of any resources of the board or association to the extent that the resources are permitted to be pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds. Each board may pledge to the payment of the bonds all or any part of any grant, donation, or income received or to be received from the United States government or any other public or private source, whether pursuant to an agreement or otherwise.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.171. REVENUE REFUNDING BONDS. Any revenue bonds issued by the board under this subchapter may be refunded, and in that case all pertinent and appropriate provisions of this subchapter are applicable to the refunding bonds. In refunding any of the bonds the board may, in the same authorizing proceedings, refund bonds issued under this subchapter and may combine all the refunding bonds with any other additional new bonds to be issued under this subchapter into one or more issues or series of bonds, and may provide for the subsequent issuance of additional parity bonds, or subordinate lien bonds, under terms and conditions set forth in the authorizing proceedings.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.172. APPROVAL OF BONDS; REGISTRATION. All bonds issued under this subchapter shall be submitted to the attorney general for examination. If he finds that the bonds have been authorized in accordance with law, he shall approve them, and thereupon they shall be registered by the comptroller of public accounts. After the approval and registration the bonds are incontestable for any reason and are valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms for all purposes. If the bonds recite that they are secured partially or otherwise by a pledge of the proceeds of a contract or lease made between the board and another party or parties, public agencies, or otherwise, a copy of the contract or lease and of the proceedings authorizing it may or may not be submitted to the attorney general along with the bond records. If submitted, then the approval by the attorney general of the bonds shall constitute an approval of the contract or lease, and thereafter the contract or lease shall be incontestable.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.173. BONDS AS LEGAL INVESTMENTS. All bonds issued under this subchapter are legal and authorized investments for all banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies of all kinds and types, fiduciaries, trustees, and guardians, and for all interest and sinking funds and other public funds of the State of Texas, and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic. The bonds are eligible and lawful security for all deposits of public funds of the State of Texas and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic, to the extent of the market value of the bonds, when accompanied by any unmatured interest coupons appurtenant to them.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER E. PROTECTION OF BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS

Sec. 51.201. APPLICABILITY OF CRIMINAL LAWS. All the general and criminal laws of the state are declared to be in full force and effect within the areas under the control and jurisdiction of the state institutions of higher education of this state.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.202. RULES AND REGULATIONS. (a) The governing board of each state institution of higher education, including public junior colleges, may promulgate rules and regulations for the safety and welfare of students, employees, and property, and other rules and regulations it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter and the governance of the institution, providing for the operation and parking of vehicles on the grounds, streets, drives, alleys, and any other institutional property under its control, including but not limited to the following:

(1) limiting the rate of speed;

(2) assigning parking spaces and designating parking areas and their use and assessing a charge for parking;

(3) prohibiting parking as it deems necessary;

(4) removing vehicles parked in violation of institutional rules and regulations or law at the expense of the violator; and

(5) instituting a system of registration for vehicle identification, including a reasonable charge.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 , Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2629), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2629), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.203. CAMPUS PEACE OFFICERS. (a) The governing boards of each state institution of higher education and public technical institute may employ and commission peace officers for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter. The primary jurisdiction of a peace officer commissioned under this section includes all counties in which property is owned, leased, rented, or otherwise under the control of the institution of higher education or public technical institute that employs the peace officer.

(b) Within a peace officer's primary jurisdiction, a peace officer commissioned under this section:

(1) is vested with all the powers, privileges, and immunities of peace officers;

(2) may, in accordance with Chapter 14, Code of Criminal Procedure, arrest without a warrant any person who violates a law of the state; and

(3) may enforce all traffic laws on streets and highways.

(c) Outside a peace officer's primary jurisdiction a peace officer commissioned under this section is vested with all the powers, privileges, and immunities of peace officers and may arrest any person who violates any law of the state if the peace officer:

(1) is summoned by another law enforcement agency to provide assistance;

(2) is assisting another law enforcement agency; or

(3) is otherwise performing his duties as a peace officer for the institution of higher education or public technical institute that employs the peace officer.

(d) Any officer assigned to duty and commissioned shall take and file the oath required of peace officers.

(e) Any person commissioned under this Act must be a certified police officer under the requirements of the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 468, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.12, eff. May 18, 2013.

Sec. 51.204. TRESPASS, DAMAGE, DEFACEMENT. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to:

(1) trespass on the grounds of an institution of higher education or of a private or independent institution of higher education; or

(2) damage or deface any of the buildings, statues, monuments, memorials, trees, shrubs, grasses, or flowers on the grounds of an institution of higher education or of a private or independent institution of higher education.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2629), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.205. PARKING; BLOCKING OR IMPEDING TRAFFIC. It is unlawful for any person to park a vehicle on any property under the control and jurisdiction of a state institution of higher education of this state except in the manner designated by the institution and in the spaces marked and designated by the governing board, or to block or impede traffic through any driveway of that property. All laws regulating traffic on highways and streets apply to the operation of vehicles within the property of the institution, except as may be modified in this subchapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.206. PARKING AND TRAFFIC TICKETS; SUMMONS; ARREST WARRANTS. In connection with traffic and parking violations, only the officers authorized to enforce the provisions of this subchapter have the authority to issue and use traffic tickets and summons of the type used by the Texas Highway Patrol, with any changes that are necessitated by reason of this subchapter. On the issuance of any parking or traffic ticket or summons, the same procedures shall be followed as prevail in connection with the use of parking and traffic violation tickets by the cities of this state and the Texas Highway Patrol. Nothing in this subchapter restricts the application and use of regular arrest warrants.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.207. VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION INSIGNIA; VEHICLE PERMITS. (a) Each public institution of higher education may provide for the issuance and use of suitable vehicle identification insignia. The institution may bar or suspend the permit of any vehicle from driving or parking on any institutional property for the violation of any rule or regulation promulgated by the board as well as for any violation of this subchapter. Reinstatement of the privileges may be permitted and a reasonable fee assessed.

(b) This subsection applies only to a public institution of higher education campus that is located in whole or part in an area in which a motor vehicle registered in the area is required to undergo a vehicle emissions inspection under Subchapter F, Chapter 548, Transportation Code. The institution may not issue a permit to a student enrolled at the institution to park or drive a motor vehicle that is not registered in this state on institutional property unless the institution has provided written notice to the student concerning requirements for vehicle emissions inspections pursuant to Subchapter F, Chapter 548, Transportation Code.

(c) The Public Safety Commission shall adopt rules providing for the inspection under Subchapter F, Chapter 548, Transportation Code, of motor vehicles not registered in this state for purposes of Subsection (b).

(d) This subsection applies only to a public institution of higher education campus that is not covered by Subsection (b). The institution may not issue a permit to a student of the institution for driving or parking a motor vehicle on institutional property unless the institution provides written notice to the student that failure to register the vehicle in this state may violate state law if the owner of the vehicle resides in this state.

(e) Each institution of higher education that maintains a campus police force shall adopt procedures for enforcing State of Texas vehicle inspection laws for vehicles parking or driving on the campus of the institution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1147, Sec. 1.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1291 (H.B. 2305), Sec. 3, eff. March 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.208. PENALTY; COURTS HAVING JURISDICTION. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) A person who violates any provision of this subchapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this subchapter commits an offense. An offense under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $200.

(c) The judge of a municipal court or any justice of the peace of any city or county where property under the control and jurisdiction of an institution of higher education or of a private or independent institution of higher education is located is each separately vested with all jurisdiction necessary to hear and determine criminal cases involving violations of this subchapter or rules or regulations promulgated under this subchapter for which the punishment does not exceed a fine of $200.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2629), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.209. UNAUTHORIZED PERSONS; REFUSAL OF ENTRY, EJECTION, IDENTIFICATION. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The governing board of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education or the governing board's authorized representatives may refuse to allow persons having no legitimate business to enter on property under the board's control, and may eject any undesirable person from the property on the person's refusal to leave peaceably on request. Identification may be required of any person on the property, and the person must provide that identification on request.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2629), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.210. ENFORCEMENT OF RULES AND REGULATIONS. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this subchapter, all officers commissioned by the governing board of a state institution of higher education may be empowered by the board to enforce rules and regulations promulgated by the board. Nothing in this subchapter is intended to limit or restrict the authority of each institution to promulgate and enforce appropriate rules and regulations for the orderly conduct of the institution in carrying out its purposes and objectives or the right of separate jurisdiction relating to the conduct of its students and personnel.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.211. CUMULATIVE EFFECT. The provisions of this subchapter are cumulative of all other laws.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.212. PEACE OFFICERS AT PRIVATE INSTITUTIONS. (a) The governing boards of private institutions of higher education, including private junior colleges, are authorized to employ and commission peace officers for the purpose of enforcing:

(1) state law on the campuses of private institutions of higher education; and

(2) state and local law, including applicable municipal ordinances, at other locations, as permitted by Subsection (b) or Section 51.2125.

(b) Any officer commissioned under the provisions of this section is vested with all the powers, privileges, and immunities of peace officers if the officer:

(1) is on the property under the control and jurisdiction of the respective private institution of higher education or is otherwise performing duties assigned to the officer by the institution, regardless of whether the officer is on property under the control and jurisdiction of the institution, but provided these duties are being performed within a county in which the institution has land; or

(2) to the extent authorized by Section 51.2125, is:

(A) requested by another law enforcement agency to provide assistance in enforcing state or local law, including a municipal ordinance, and is acting in response to that request; or

(B) otherwise assisting another law enforcement agency in enforcing a law described by Paragraph (A).

(c) Any officer assigned to duty and commissioned shall take and file the oath required of peace officers, and shall execute and file a good and sufficient bond in the sum of $1,000, payable to the governor, with two or more good and sufficient sureties, conditioned that the officer will fairly, impartially, and faithfully perform the duties as may be required of the officer by law. The bond may be sued on from time to time in the name of the person injured until the whole amount is recovered.

(d) The governing boards of private institutions of higher education are authorized to hire and pay on a regular basis peace officers commissioned by an incorporated city. The officers shall be under the supervision of the hiring institution, but shall be subject to dismissal and disciplinary action by the city. An incorporated city is authorized to contract with a private institution of higher education for the use and employment of its commissioned officers in any manner agreed to, provided that there is no expense incurred by the city.

(e) In this section, "private institution of higher education" means a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003.

(f) A campus police department of a private institution of higher education is a law enforcement agency and a governmental body for purposes of Chapter 552, Government Code, only with respect to information relating solely to law enforcement activities.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 516, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 258 (S.B. 11), Sec. 15.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (S.B. 308), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.2125. PRIVATE INSTITUTIONS: AUTHORITY TO ENTER INTO MUTUAL ASSISTANCE AGREEMENT. (a) This section applies only to a private institution of higher education that has under its control and jurisdiction property that is contiguous to, or located in any part within the boundaries of, a home-rule municipality that has a population of 1.18 million or more and is located predominantly in a county that has a total area of less than 1,000 square miles. For purposes of this section, a private institution of higher education is a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003.

(b) In addition to exercising the authority provided under Section 51.212(d), the governing board of a private institution of higher education to which this section applies and the governing body of each municipality, regardless of the municipality's population, that is contiguous to, or the boundaries of which contain any part of, property under the control and jurisdiction of the private institution of higher education may enter into a written mutual assistance agreement in which peace officers commissioned by the institution or the applicable municipality serve the public interest by assisting, without any form of additional compensation or other financial benefit, the peace officers of the other party to the agreement in enforcing state or local law, including applicable municipal ordinances. The agreement must be reviewed at least annually by the institution and the municipality and may be modified at that time by a written agreement signed by each party. The agreement may be terminated at any time by a party to the agreement on the provision of reasonable notice to the other party to the agreement.

(c) A mutual assistance agreement authorized by this section may designate the geographic area in which the campus peace officers are authorized to provide assistance to the peace officers of the municipality, except that if the agreement is entered into with a municipality described by Subsection (a) that elects all or part of the municipality's governing body from election districts, the designated geographic area consists of each of the election districts of the municipality's governing body that contains any part of the campus of the institution and each of the election districts of the governing body that is contiguous to another municipality that contains any part of the campus of the institution.

(d) This section does not affect a municipality's duty to provide law enforcement services to any location within the boundaries of the municipality.

(e) A peace officer providing assistance under a mutual assistance agreement authorized by this section may make arrests and exercise all other authority given to peace officers under other state law. The municipal law enforcement agency has exclusive authority to supervise any campus peace officer operating under the agreement to assist the peace officers of the municipality. A municipal peace officer operating under the agreement to assist the campus peace officers remains under the supervision of the municipal law enforcement agency.

(f) In the same manner and to the same extent as a municipality is liable for an act or omission of a peace officer employed by the municipality, a private institution of higher education is liable for an act or omission of a campus peace officer operating under a mutual assistance agreement authorized by this section at a location other than property under the control and jurisdiction of the institution.

(g) This section does not limit the authority of a campus peace officer to make a warrantless arrest outside the officer's jurisdiction as described by Article 14.03(d), Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 258 (S.B. 11), Sec. 15.02, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1229 (S.B. 1735), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.2126. APPEAL BY CAMPUS PEACE OFFICER OF DISCIPLINARY ACTION OR PROMOTIONAL BYPASS RELATED TO PROVISION OF ASSISTANCE UNDER MUTUAL ASSISTANCE AGREEMENT. (a) A campus peace officer acting under a mutual assistance agreement authorized by Section 51.2125 who is demoted, suspended, or terminated by the applicable private institution of higher education or who experiences a promotional bypass by the institution may elect to appeal the institution's action to an independent third party hearing examiner under this section.

(b) To elect to appeal to an independent third party hearing examiner under this section, the campus peace officer must submit to the head of the institution's law enforcement agency not later than the 30th day after the date of the action being appealed a written request stating the officer's decision to appeal to such a hearing examiner.

(c) The hearing examiner's decision is final and binding on all parties. If a campus peace officer elects to appeal the institution's action to an independent third party hearing examiner under this section, the officer or institution may appeal the examiner's decision to a district court only as provided by Subsection (j).

(d) If a campus peace officer elects to appeal to a hearing examiner, the officer and the head of the institution's law enforcement agency or their designees shall attempt to agree on the selection of an impartial hearing examiner. If the parties do not agree on the selection of a hearing examiner before the 10th day after the date the appeal is filed, the parties immediately shall request a list of seven qualified neutral arbitrators from the American Arbitration Association or the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service, or their successors in function. The officer and the agency head or their designees may agree on one of the seven neutral arbitrators on the list. If the parties do not agree before the fifth business day after the date the parties receive the list, the parties or their designees shall alternate striking a name from the list, and the single name remaining after all other names have been struck is selected as the hearing examiner. The parties or their designees shall agree on a date for the hearing.

(e) The appeal hearing must begin as soon as an appearance by the hearing examiner can be scheduled. If the hearing examiner cannot begin the hearing before the 45th day after the date of selection, the campus peace officer may, within 48 hours after learning of that fact, call for the selection of a new hearing examiner using the procedure prescribed by Subsection (d).

(f) In a hearing conducted under this section, the hearing examiner has the same duties and powers that a civil service commission has in conducting a hearing or hearing an appeal under Chapter 143, Local Government Code, including the right to issue subpoenas. The hearing examiner may:

(1) order that the campus peace officer be reinstated to the same position or status in which the officer was employed immediately before the demotion, suspension, or termination or, in the case of a promotional bypass, to the position or status with respect to which the officer experienced the bypass; and

(2) award the officer lost wages and any other compensation lost as a result of the disciplinary action or promotional bypass, as applicable.

(g) In a hearing conducted under this section, the parties may agree to an expedited hearing procedure. Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, in an expedited procedure the hearing examiner shall issue a decision on the appeal not later than the 10th day after the date the hearing is completed.

(h) In an appeal that does not involve an expedited hearing procedure, the hearing examiner shall make a reasonable effort to issue a decision on the appeal not later than the 30th day after the later of the date the hearing is completed or the briefs are filed. The hearing examiner's inability to meet the time requirements imposed by this section does not affect the hearing examiner's jurisdiction, the validity of the disciplinary action or promotional bypass, or the hearing examiner's final decision.

(i) The hearing examiner's fees and expenses shall be paid in equal amounts by the parties. The costs of a witness shall be paid by the party who calls the witness.

(j) A district court may hear an appeal of a hearing examiner's decision only on the grounds that the hearing examiner was without jurisdiction or exceeded the examiner's jurisdiction or that the decision was procured by fraud, collusion, or other unlawful means. An appeal must be brought in the district court having jurisdiction in the municipality in which the institution is located.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 258 (S.B. 11), Sec. 15.02, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 51.213. ABANDONED PERSONAL PROPERTY. (a) The governing board of each state institution of higher education, including public junior colleges, is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations providing for the disposition of abandoned and unclaimed personal property coming into the possession of the campus security personnel where the personal property is not being held as evidence to be used in any pending criminal case.

(b) The authority granted to governing boards under Subsection (a) may also be exercised by governing boards of private institutions of higher education, including private junior colleges.

(c) In this section, "private institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003(15).

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1712, ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 72, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 51.214. SECURITY OFFICERS FOR MEDICAL CORPORATIONS IN CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) In any municipality with a population of 1.18 million or more located primarily in a county with a population of 2 million or more, the governing board of a private, nonprofit medical corporation, or of the parent corporation of such medical corporation, that provides police or security services for an institution of higher education or a private postsecondary educational institution located within one of the medical corporation's or parent corporation's medical complexes, or that provides police or security services for another medical complex legally affiliated with or owned, leased, managed, or controlled by the medical corporation or parent corporation, may employ and commission police or security personnel to enforce the law of this state within the jurisdiction designated by Subsection (c).

(b) An officer commissioned under this section may make arrests and has all the powers, privileges, and immunities of a peace officer while performing the officer's assigned duties within the jurisdiction designated by Subsection (c). An officer assigned to duty and commissioned shall take and file the oath required of peace officers and shall execute and file a good and sufficient bond in the sum of $1,000, payable to the governor, with two or more good and sufficient sureties, conditioned that the officer will fairly, impartially, and faithfully perform the duties required of the officer by law. The bond may be sued on from time to time in the name of the person injured until the whole amount is recovered.

(c) The jurisdiction of an officer commissioned under this section is limited to:

(1) property under the control and jurisdiction of the private, nonprofit medical corporation or its parent corporation or any entity legally affiliated with or owned, leased, managed, or controlled by the medical corporation or its parent corporation;

(2) a street or alley that abuts the property or an easement in or a right-of-way over or through the property described by Subdivision (1); and

(3) any other location in which the officer is performing duties assigned to the officer by the private, nonprofit medical corporation or its parent corporation, regardless of whether the officer is on property under the control and jurisdiction of the medical corporation or its parent corporation, provided that the assigned duties are consistent with the mission of the medical corporation or its parent corporation and are being performed within a county in which the medical corporation or its parent corporation owns real property.

(d) An officer commissioned under this section is not entitled to compensation or benefits provided by this state or a political subdivision of this state.

(e) The state or a political subdivision of this state is not liable for an act or omission of an officer commissioned under this section during the performance of the officer's assigned duties.

(f) A person may not be commissioned under this section unless the person obtains a peace officer license issued by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement. The employing medical corporation or parent corporation shall pay to the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement on behalf of an employee any fees that are necessary to obtain a required license.

(g) A person's commission and any authority to act as an officer under this section are automatically revoked if the person's employment is terminated for any reason.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1810, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 8, Sec. 1, eff. March 31, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 9.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1229 (S.B. 1735), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.13, eff. May 18, 2013.

Sec. 51.215. ACCESS TO POLICE RECORDS OF EMPLOYMENT APPLICANTS. (a) An institution of higher education is entitled to obtain criminal history record information pertaining to an applicant for employment for a security-sensitive position. The institution of higher education may deny employment to an applicant for a security-sensitive position who fails to provide a complete set of fingerprints upon request.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 790, Sec. 46(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

(c) An institution of higher education may use information obtained under this section only for the purpose of evaluating applicants for employment in security-sensitive positions. Security-sensitive positions shall be restricted to employees who handle currency, have access to a computer terminal, have access to a master key, or who work in an area of the institution which has been designated as a security-sensitive area. A security-sensitive position shall be so identified in the job description and advertisement for the position.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 790, Sec. 46(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

(e) In this section, "institution of higher education" means:

(1) an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003(8) of this code; and

(2) a private institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003(15) of this code.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5011, ch. 901, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 356, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 941, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 516, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 790, Sec. 46(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 51.217. MULTIHAZARD EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN; SAFETY AND SECURITY AUDIT. (a) In this section, "institution" means a general academic teaching institution, a medical and dental unit, or other agency of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003.

(b) An institution shall adopt and implement a multihazard emergency operations plan for use at the institution. The plan must address mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. The plan must provide for:

(1) employee training in responding to an emergency;

(2) mandatory drills to prepare students, faculty, and employees for responding to an emergency;

(3) measures to ensure coordination with the Department of State Health Services, local emergency management agencies, law enforcement, health departments, and fire departments in the event of an emergency; and

(4) the implementation of a safety and security audit as required by Subsection (c).

(c) At least once every three years, an institution shall conduct a safety and security audit of the institution's facilities. To the extent possible, an institution shall follow safety and security audit procedures developed in consultation with the division of emergency management of the office of the governor.

(d) An institution shall report the results of the safety and security audit conducted under Subsection (c) to the institution's board of regents and the division of emergency management of the office of the governor.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (f), any document or information collected, developed, or produced during a safety and security audit conducted under Subsection (c) is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(f) A document relating to an institution's multihazard emergency operations plan is subject to disclosure if the document enables a person to:

(1) verify that the institution has established a plan and determine the agencies involved in the development of the plan and the agencies coordinating with the institution to respond to an emergency, including the Department of State Health Services, local emergency services agencies, law enforcement agencies, health departments, and fire departments;

(2) verify that the institution's plan was reviewed within the last 12 months and determine the specific review dates;

(3) verify that the plan addresses the four phases of emergency management under Subsection (b);

(4) verify that institution employees have been trained to respond to an emergency and determine the types of training, the number of employees trained, and the person conducting the training;

(5) verify that each campus has conducted mandatory emergency drills and exercises in accordance with the plan and determine the frequency of the drills;

(6) verify that the institution has completed a safety and security audit under Subsection (c) and determine the date the audit was conducted, the person conducting the audit, and the date the institution presented the results of the audit to the board of regents; and

(7) verify that the institution has addressed any recommendations by the board of regents for improvement of the plan and determine the institution's progress within the last 12 months.

(g) The personal information of an individual maintained in an institution's emergency notification system is confidential and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code. In this subsection, "personal information" includes an e-mail address or telephone number maintained in order to notify an individual of an emergency.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1280 (H.B. 1831), Sec. 6.13, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1229 (S.B. 602), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 51.218. EMERGENCY ALERT SYSTEM. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Each institution of higher education and private or independent institution of higher education shall establish an emergency alert system for the institution's students and staff, including faculty. The emergency alert system must use e-mail or telephone notifications in addition to any other alert method the institution considers appropriate to provide timely notification of emergencies affecting the institution or its students and staff.

(c) At the time a student initially enrolls or registers for courses or a staff member begins employment, the institution shall:

(1) obtain a personal telephone number or e-mail address from the student or staff member to be used to notify the individual in the event of an emergency; and

(2) register the student or staff member in the institution's emergency alert system.

(d) A student or staff member may elect not to participate in an emergency alert system established under this section. An election under this subsection may be submitted electronically or in writing, as chosen by the institution, and must be renewed at the start of each academic year.

(e) The personal identifying information obtained from an individual for the purpose of the emergency alert system of an institution of higher education, including an e-mail address or telephone number, is confidential and not subject to disclosure under Section 552.021, Government Code.

(f) Expired.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 547 (H.B. 2758), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.219. NOTIFICATION OF PENALTY FOR FALSE ALARM OR REPORT. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Each institution of higher education and private or independent institution of higher education shall notify all incoming students, as soon as practicable, of the penalty for the offense under Section 42.06, Penal Code, of making a false alarm or report involving a public or private institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 1284), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 51.220. PUBLIC JUNIOR COLLEGE SCHOOL MARSHALS. (a) In this section, "public junior college" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The governing board of a public junior college may appoint one or more school marshals.

(c) The governing board of a public junior college may select for appointment as a school marshal under this section an applicant who is an employee of the public junior college and certified as eligible for appointment under Section 1701.260, Occupations Code. The governing board may, but shall not be required to, reimburse the amount paid by the applicant to participate in the training program under that section.

(d) A school marshal appointed by the governing board of a public junior college may carry or possess a handgun on the physical premises of a public junior college campus, but only:

(1) in the manner provided by written regulations adopted by the governing board; and

(2) at a specific public junior college campus as specified by the governing board.

(e) Any written regulations adopted for purposes of Subsection (d) must provide that a school marshal may carry a concealed handgun as described by Subsection (d), except that if the primary duty of the school marshal involves regular, direct contact with students, the marshal may not carry a concealed handgun but may possess a handgun on the physical premises of a public junior college campus in a locked and secured safe within the marshal's immediate reach when conducting the marshal's primary duty. The written regulations must also require that a handgun carried by or within access of a school marshal may be loaded only with frangible duty ammunition approved for that purpose by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(f) A school marshal may access a handgun under this section only under circumstances that would justify the use of deadly force under Section 9.32 or 9.33, Penal Code.

(g) A public junior college employee's status as a school marshal becomes inactive on:

(1) expiration of the employee's school marshal license under Section 1701.260, Occupations Code;

(2) suspension or revocation of the employee's license to carry a concealed handgun issued under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code;

(3) termination of the employee's employment with the public junior college; or

(4) notice from the governing board of the public junior college that the employee's services as school marshal are no longer required.

(h) The identity of a school marshal appointed under this section is confidential, except as provided by Section 1701.260(j), Occupations Code, and is not subject to a request under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(i) If a parent or guardian of a student enrolled at a public junior college inquires in writing, the governing board of the public junior college shall provide the parent or guardian written notice indicating whether any employee of the public junior college is currently appointed a school marshal. The notice may not disclose information that is confidential under Subsection (h).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (S.B. 386), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 867), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER E-1. MAINTAINING CAMPUS ORDER DURING PERIODS OF DISRUPTION

Sec. 51.231. DEFINITION OF PERIODS OF DISRUPTION. For purposes of this subchapter a period of disruption is any period in which it reasonably appears that there is a threat of destruction to institutional property, injury to human life on the campus or facility, or a threat of willful disruption of the orderly operation of the campus or facility.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 84, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.232. IDENTIFICATION OF PERSONS ON CAMPUS. (a) During periods of disruption, as determined by the chief administrative officer of a state-supported institution of higher education, the chief administrative officer, or an officer or employee of the institution designated by him to maintain order on the campus or facility of the institution, may require that any person on the campus or facility present evidence of his identification, or if the person is a student or employee of the institution, his student or employee official institutional identification card, or other evidence of his relationship with the institution.

(b) If any person refuses or fails upon request to present evidence of his identification, or if the person is a student or employee of the institution, his student or employee official identification card, or other evidence of his relationship with the institution, and if it reasonably appears that the person has no legitimate reason to be on the campus or facility, the person may be ejected from the campus or facility.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 84, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.233. WITHDRAWAL OF CONSENT TO REMAIN ON CAMPUS. (a) During periods of disruption, the chief administrative officer of a campus or other facility of a state-supported institution of higher education, or an officer or employee of the institution designated by him to maintain order on the campus or facility, may notify a person that consent to remain on the campus or facility under the control of the chief administrative officer has been withdrawn whenever there is reasonable cause to believe that the person has willfully disrupted the orderly operation of the campus or facility and that his presence on the campus or facility will constitute a substantial and material threat to the orderly operation of the campus or facility.

(b) In no case shall consent be withdrawn for longer than 14 days from the date on which consent was initially withdrawn.

(c) Notification shall be in accordance with procedures set out in Section 51.234 of this code.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 84, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.234. NOTICE OF WITHDRAWAL OF CONSENT. When the chief administrative officer of a campus or other facility of a state-supported institution of higher education, or an officer or employee of the institution designated by him to maintain order on the campus or facility, decides to withdraw consent for any person to remain on the campus or facility, he shall notify that person in writing that consent to remain is withdrawn. The written notice must contain all of the following:

(1) that consent to remain on the campus has been withdrawn and the number of days for which consent has been withdrawn, not to exceed 14;

(2) the name and job title of the person withdrawing consent, along with an address where the person withdrawing consent can be contacted during regular working hours;

(3) a brief statement of the activity or activities resulting in the withdrawal of consent; and

(4) notification that the person from whom consent has been withdrawn is entitled to a hearing on the withdrawal not later than three days from the date of receipt by the chief administrative officer of a request for a hearing.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 85, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.235. REPORT TO CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER. Whenever consent is withdrawn by any authorized officer or employee other than the chief administrative officer, the officer or employee shall submit a written report to the chief administrative officer within 24 hours, unless the authorized officer or employee has reinstated consent for the person to remain on the campus. The report must contain all of the following:

(1) the description of the person from whom consent was withdrawn, including, if available, the person's name, address, and phone number; and

(2) a statement of the facts giving rise to the withdrawal of consent.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 85, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.236. CONFIRMATION OF WITHDRAWAL OF CONSENT. (a) If the chief administrative officer or, in his absence, a person designated by him for this purpose, upon reviewing the written report described in Section 51.235, finds that there was reasonable cause to believe that the person has willfully disrupted the orderly operation of the campus or facility, and that his presence on the campus or facility will constitute a substantial and material threat to the orderly operation of the campus or facility, he may enter written confirmation upon the report of the action taken by the officer or employee.

(b) If the chief administrative officer, or in his absence, the person designated by him, does not confirm the action of the officer or employee within 24 hours after the time that consent was withdrawn, the action of the officer or employee shall be deemed void and of no force or effect, except that any arrest made during the period shall not for this reason be deemed not to have been made for probable cause.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 85, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.237. REQUEST FOR HEARING. (a) A person from whom consent has been withdrawn may submit a written request for a hearing on the withdrawal to the chief administrative officer within the 14-day period. The written request must state the address to which notice of hearing is to be sent. The chief administrative officer shall grant a hearing not later than three days from the date of receipt of the request and shall immediately mail a written notice of the time, place, and date of the hearing to the person.

(b) The hearing shall be held before a duly designated discipline committee or authorized hearing officer of the institution in accordance with Section 51.243. In no instance shall the person issuing the withdrawal notice or causing it to be issued serve on any committee where the validity of his order of withdrawal is in question.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 85, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.238. REINSTATEMENT OF CONSENT TO REMAIN ON CAMPUS. The chief administrative officer shall reinstate consent whenever he has reason to believe that the presence of the person from whom consent was withdrawn will not constitute a substantial and material threat to the orderly operation of the campus or facility.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 86, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.239. ENTERING OR REMAINING ON CAMPUS AFTER WITHDRAWAL OF CONSENT. (a) Any person who has been notified by the chief administrative officer of a campus or facility of a state-supported institution of higher education, or by an officer or employee designated by the chief administrative officer to maintain order on the campus or facility, that consent to remain on the campus or facility has been withdrawn pursuant to Section 51.233, who has not had consent reinstated, and who willfully and knowingly enters or remains upon the campus or facility during the period for which consent has been withdrawn, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is subject to punishment as set out in Section 51.244.

(b) This section does not apply to any person who enters or remains on the campus or facility for the sole purpose of applying to the chief administrative officer or authorized officer or employee for the reinstatement of consent or for the sole purpose of attending a hearing on the withdrawal.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 86, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.240. AUTHORITY TO SUSPEND, DISMISS, OR EXPEL STUDENTS OR EMPLOYEES NOT AFFECTED. This subchapter does not affect the power of the duly constituted authorities of a state-supported institution of higher education to suspend, dismiss, or expel any student or employee at the university or college.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 86, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.241. STUDENTS AND EMPLOYEES BARRED FROM CAMPUS AFTER SUSPENSION OR DISMISSAL. (a) Every student or employee who has been suspended or dismissed from a state-supported institution of higher education after a hearing, in accordance with procedures established by the institution, for disrupting the orderly operation of the campus or facility of the institution, as a condition of the suspension or dismissal, may be denied access to the campus or facility, or both, of the institution for the period of suspension, and in the case of dismissal, for a period not to exceed one year.

(b) A person who has been notified by personal service of the suspension or dismissal and condition and who willfully and knowingly enters upon the campus or facility of the institution to which he has been denied access, without the express written permission of the chief administrative officer of the campus or facility, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to punishment as set out in Section 51.244.

(c) Knowledge shall be presumed if personal service has been given as prescribed in Subsection (b) of this section.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 86, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.242. REFUSING OR FAILING TO LEAVE BUILDING CLOSED TO PUBLIC. No person may refuse or fail to leave a building under the control and management of a public agency, including a state-supported institution of higher education, during those hours of the day or night when the building is regularly closed to the public, upon being requested to do so by a guard, watchman, or other employee of a public agency, including a state-supported institution of higher education, controlling and managing the building or property, if the surrounding circumstances are such as to indicate to a reasonable person that the individual or individuals have no apparent lawful business to pursue.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 87, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.243. REQUIRED HEARING PROCEDURES. A person from whom consent to remain on the campus of a state-supported institution of higher education has been withdrawn in accordance with Section 51.233 is entitled, in addition to the procedures set out in Section 51.234, to the following:

(1) to be represented by counsel;

(2) to the right to call and examine witnesses and to cross-examine adverse witnesses;

(3) to have all matters upon which the decision may be based introduced into evidence at the hearing in his presence;

(4) to have the decision based solely on the evidence presented at the hearing;

(5) to prohibit the introduction of statements made against him unless he has been advised of their content and the names of the persons who made them, and has been given the opportunity to rebut unfavorable inferences that might otherwise be drawn; and

(6) to have all findings made at the hearing be final, subject only to his right to appeal to the president and the governing board of the institution.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 87, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 51.244. PENALTIES. A person who violates Section 51.239, 51.241, or 51.242 of this code is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine of not more than $500 or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 87, ch. 51, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

SUBCHAPTER F. REQUIRED AND ELECTIVE COURSES

Sec. 51.301. GOVERNMENT OR POLITICAL SCIENCE. (a) Every college and university receiving state support or state aid from public funds shall give a course of instruction in government or political science which includes consideration of the Constitution of the United States and the constitutions of the states, with special emphasis on that of Texas. This course shall have a credit value of not less than six semester hours or its equivalent. Except as provided by Subsection (c), a college or university receiving state support or state aid from public funds may not grant a baccalaureate degree or a lesser degree or academic certificate to any person unless the person has credit for such a course. The college or university may determine that a student has satisfied this requirement in whole or in part on the basis of credit granted to the student by the college or university for a substantially equivalent course completed at another accredited college or university or on the basis of the student's successful completion of an advanced standing examination administered on the conditions and under the circumstances common for the college or university's advanced standing examinations. The college or university may grant as much as three semester hours of credit or its equivalent toward satisfaction of this requirement for substantially equivalent work completed by the student in the program of an approved senior R.O.T.C. unit.

(b) The requirement of Subsection (a) that the required course must include special emphasis on the Texas Constitution does not apply to a degree granted on completion of an academic program offered by a medical and dental unit, as that term is defined by Section 61.003, to a student who is a member of the armed forces of the United States, including the reserves or national guard, if:

(1) the program is operated by the medical and dental unit under contract with the United States Army;

(2) the program requires less than two years of residency in this state; and

(3) the principal participants in the program are military personnel stationed outside this state.

(c) The governing board of a general academic teaching institution that offers a joint baccalaureate degree program under a contract with a foreign college or university may exempt a student enrolled in the joint degree program from the course requirement prescribed by Subsection (a) if the student:

(1) enrolled in the foreign college or university before enrolling in the joint degree program or is otherwise considered to be primarily a student of the foreign college or university; and

(2) successfully completes the American Way course described by Subsection (d) at the institution the student attends or, with the approval of that institution, at another general academic teaching institution that offers the course.

(d) The American Way course authorized by Subsection (c)(2) must be designed to provide a foreign student with a familiarity and understanding of United States government and civic life and their sources, development, and character. The course must concentrate on important texts, including the United States Constitution and the Declaration of Independence, on the works and contributions of influential authors, political and cultural leaders, and other important figures, and on important events and developments in United States history. The course must cover important developments in human and civil rights, including the civil rights movement and the history of women's rights. The course must cover the history and development of the State of Texas and its place in United States history and culture. The course must consist of four semester credit hours, with one semester credit hour in practicum activities intended to provide the student with experience in the three branches of government through participation at the federal, state, or local level. The course may not be taken for course credit by a student other than a student described by Subsection (c).

(e) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 5, Sec. 1, eff. March 23, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 539 (S.B. 1051), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Sec. 51.302. AMERICAN OR TEXAS HISTORY. (a) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a college or university receiving state support or state aid from public funds may not grant a baccalaureate degree or a lesser degree or academic certificate to any person unless the person has credit for six semester hours or its equivalent in American History. A student is entitled to submit as much as three semester hours of credit or its equivalent in Texas History in partial satisfaction of this requirement. The college or university may determine that a student has satisfied this requirement in whole or part on the basis of credit granted to the student by the college or university for a substantially equivalent course completed at another accredited college or university, or on the basis of the student's successful completion of an advanced standing examination administered on the conditions and under the circumstances common for the college or university's advanced standing examinations. The college or university may grant as much as three semester hours of credit or its equivalent toward satisfaction of this requirement for substantially equivalent work completed by a student in the program of an approved senior R.O.T.C. unit.

(c) The governing board of a general academic teaching institution that offers a joint baccalaureate degree program under a contract with a foreign college or university may exempt a student enrolled in the joint degree program from the course requirement prescribed by Subsection (b) if the student:

(1) enrolled in the foreign college or university before enrolling in the joint degree program or is otherwise considered to be primarily a student of the foreign college or university; and

(2) successfully completes the American Way course described by Section 51.301(d) at the institution the student attends or, with the approval of that institution, at another general academic teaching institution that offers the course.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 5, Sec. 1, eff. March 23, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 539 (S.B. 1051), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2007.

Sec. 51.303. ELECTIVE COURSES IN DACTYLOLOGY. (a) In this section, "dactylology" means the art of communicating ideas by signs made with the fingers, as in the manual alphabets of deaf-mutes.

(b) Any state college or university offering a fully accredited program for teachers of the deaf may offer a three-hour elective course in dactylology.

(c) American Sign Language is recognized as a language, and any state institute of higher education may offer an elective course in American Sign Language. A student is entitled to count credit received for a course in American Sign Language toward satisfaction of a foreign language requirement of the institution of higher education where it is offered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 735, ch. 327, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 27, 1979.

Sec. 51.304. COURSES IN MILITARY AND NAVAL TRAINING. The governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education may request the United States Department of Defense to establish and maintain courses in military and naval training qualifying men student graduates of the courses for reserve commission awards as a part of its curriculum. The board may enter into mutually agreeable contracts for that purpose. The work of the students enrolling in the courses may be credited toward degree requirements under regulations prescribed by the board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.3041. AWARD OF COURSE CREDIT FOR MILITARY TRAINING. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) An institution of higher education shall consider, in determining whether to award to a student course credit toward a degree offered by the institution for the student's completion of certain military training:

(1) any official military record presented to the institution by the student that:

(A) describes the substance of the training completed by the student; and

(B) verifies the student's successful completion of that training; and

(2) whether the substance of that training satisfies the purpose of the course for which the student seeks credit as described in the institution's course catalog.

(c) This section applies to a student who has completed certain military training and is admitted to the institution, including a student who is readmitted under Section 51.9242.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 549 (H.B. 1170), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 907 (H.B. 133), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 51.3042. AWARD OF COURSE CREDIT FOR MILITARY SERVICE. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) An institution of higher education shall award to an undergraduate student who is admitted to the institution, including a student who is readmitted under Section 51.9242, course credit for all physical education courses required by the institution for an undergraduate degree and for additional semester credit hours, not to exceed 12, that may be applied to satisfy any elective course requirements for the student's degree program for courses outside the student's major or minor if the student:

(1) graduated from a public or private high school accredited by a generally recognized accrediting organization or from a high school operated by the United States Department of Defense; and

(2) is an honorably discharged former member of the armed forces of the United States who:

(A) completed at least two years of service in the armed forces; or

(B) was discharged because of a disability.

(c) This section does not prohibit an institution of higher education from awarding additional course credit for a student's military service as the institution considers appropriate.

(d) An institution of higher education may adopt rules requiring reasonable proof from a student of the fact and duration of the student's military service and of the student's military discharge status.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (H.B. 269), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.305. PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY TRAINING. (a) In this section:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "General academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The coordinating board by rule shall:

(1) require a general academic teaching institution to offer training in personal financial literacy to provide students of the institution with the knowledge and skills necessary as self-supporting adults to make critical decisions relating to personal financial matters; and

(2) determine the topics to be covered by the training, which may include budgeting, credit cards, spending, saving, loan repayment and consolidation, taxes, retirement planning, insurance, and financing of health care and other benefits.

(c) The coordinating board by rule may provide for the training required under this section to be offered in an online course.

(d) Expired.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 230 (H.B. 399), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1221 (S.B. 1590), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 51.307. RULES. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 273, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1993. Redesignated from Sec. 51.306(n) and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 4.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 51.308. DRIVER EDUCATION. A driver education course for the purpose of preparing students to obtain a driver's license may be offered by an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, with the approval of the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1009, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.307 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1044 (H.B. 1786), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.309. PAIN TREATMENT MEDICAL EDUCATION COURSE WORK. (a) Each medical school shall determine the extent to which pain treatment medical education course work is meeting the instructional elements described in Subsection (b) and is offered to all students enrolled in medical schools.

(b) Pain treatment medical education course work should include instruction in:

(1) pain assessment in adults, children, and special populations, including elderly and impaired individuals;

(2) pain anatomy, physiology and pathophysiology, and pharmacology of opioid and nonopioid analgesic drugs, including pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics;

(3) the advantages and disadvantages of various methods of drug administration, side effects, treatment outcome, and the outcome of behavioral and other psychological therapy for pain;

(4) the psychological, social, economic, and emotional impact of malignant and nonmalignant acute and chronic pain on patients;

(5) indications for and outcomes of anesthetic and neurosurgical pain-relieving techniques, including nerve blocks and neuroaugmentative and neuroablative techniques; and

(6) the outcome of treatment of pain emanating from a damaged nervous system and neuropathic pain.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 174, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 61.785 by Acts 2001, ch. 1420, Sec. 4.012, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER F-1. TEXAS SUCCESS INITIATIVE

Sec. 51.331. DEFINITIONS. (a) The definitions provided by Section 61.003 apply to this subchapter.

(b) In this subchapter:

(1) "Basic academic skills education" means non-course competency-based developmental education programs and interventions designed for students whose performance falls significantly below college readiness standards.

(2) "Program evaluation" means a systematic method of collecting, analyzing, and using information to answer questions about developmental education courses, interventions, and policies, particularly about their effectiveness and cost-efficiency.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.332. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) a student who has graduated with an associate or baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher education;

(2) a student who transfers to an institution of higher education from a private or independent institution of higher education or an accredited out-of-state institution of higher education and who has satisfactorily completed college-level coursework;

(3) a student who is enrolled in a certificate program of one year or less at a public junior college, a public technical institute, or a public state college;

(4) a student who is serving on active duty as a member of:

(A) the armed forces of the United States; or

(B) the Texas National Guard;

(5) a student who is currently serving as and, for at least the three-year period preceding enrollment, has served as a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States; or

(6) a student who on or after August 1, 1990, was honorably discharged, retired, or released from:

(A) active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States or the Texas National Guard; or

(B) service as a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062(r) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.03, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.333. COLLEGE READINESS ASSESSMENT REQUIRED. (a) An institution of higher education shall, using an assessment instrument designated by the board under Section 51.334, assess the academic skills of each entering undergraduate student to determine the student's readiness to enroll in freshman-level academic coursework.

(b) An institution of higher education may not use the assessment required under this section or the results of the assessment as a condition of admission to the institution.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062(b) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.04, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.334. ASSESSMENT INSTRUMENTS. (a) The board shall designate one or more instruments for use by institutions of higher education in assessing students under this subchapter.

(b) Each assessment instrument designated by the board for use under this subchapter must be diagnostic in nature and designed to assess a student's readiness to perform freshman-level academic coursework. The board shall prescribe a single standard or set of standards for each assessment instrument to effectively measure student readiness as demonstrated by current research.

(c) For each assessment instrument designated by the board for use under this subchapter, the board shall prescribe a score below which a student is eligible for basic academic skills education.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.05, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.335. COLLEGE READINESS ADVISING. (a) If a student fails to meet the assessment standards described by Section 51.334(b), the institution of higher education shall work with the student to develop a plan to assist the student in becoming ready to perform freshman-level academic coursework. The plan must be designed on an individual basis to provide the best opportunity for each student to attain that readiness.

(b) Each institution of higher education shall establish a program to advise students regarding coursework and other means by which students can develop the academic skills required to successfully complete college-level work.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.06, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.336. DEVELOPMENTAL EDUCATION. (a) An institution of higher education may refer a student to developmental coursework, including basic academic skills education, as considered necessary by the institution to address a student's deficiencies in the student's readiness to perform freshman-level academic coursework, except that the institution may not require enrollment in developmental coursework with respect to a student previously determined under Section 51.338(d) or by any institution of higher education to have met college-readiness standards.

(b) An institution of higher education that requires a student to enroll in developmental coursework must offer a range of developmental coursework, including online coursework, or instructional support that includes the integration of technology to efficiently address the particular developmental needs of the student.

(c) Each institution of higher education shall develop and implement for developmental coursework, other than adult basic education or basic academic skills education, developmental education using a corequisite model under which a student concurrently enrolls in a developmental education course and a freshman-level course in the same subject area for each subject area for which the student is referred to developmental coursework. Each institution shall ensure that at least 75 percent of the institution's students enrolled in developmental coursework other than adult basic education or basic academic skills education are enrolled in developmental coursework described by this subsection.

(d) If a student fails to satisfactorily complete a freshman-level course described by Subsection (c), the institution of higher education shall:

(1) review the plan developed for the student under Section 51.335(a) and, if necessary, work with the student to revise the plan; and

(2) offer to the student a range of competency-based education programs to assist the student in becoming ready to perform freshman-level academic coursework in the applicable subject area.

(e) An institution of higher education must base developmental coursework on research-based best practices that include the following components:

(1) assessment;

(2) differentiated placement and instruction;

(3) faculty development;

(4) support services;

(5) program evaluation;

(6) integration of technology with an emphasis on instructional support programs;

(7) non-course-based developmental education interventions; and

(8) subject to the requirements of Subsection (c), course pairing of developmental education courses with credit-bearing courses.

(f) To allow a student to complete any necessary developmental coursework in the most efficient and cost-effective manner, the board shall encourage institutions of higher education to offer various types of developmental coursework that address various levels of deficiency in readiness to perform college coursework for which course credit may be earned, as determined on the basis of assessments as described by Section 51.334. The types of developmental coursework may include:

(1) course-based programs;

(2) non-course-based programs, such as advising programs;

(3) module format programs;

(4) competency-based education programs;

(5) basic academic skills education, if applicable to the student; and

(6) subject to the requirements of Subsection (c), programs under which the student is pairing or taking concurrently a developmental education course and another course in the same subject area for which course credit may be earned.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.07, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.337. REEVALUATION OF COLLEGE READINESS. (a) A student may retake an assessment instrument designated by the board for use under this subchapter at any time to determine readiness to perform freshman-level academic coursework.

(b) An institution of higher education shall determine when a student is ready to perform freshman-level academic coursework. The institution must make its determination using learning outcomes for developmental education courses developed by the board based on established college and career readiness standards and student performance on one or more appropriate assessments.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.08, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.338. EXEMPTIONS. (a) An institution of higher education may exempt a non-degree-seeking or non-certificate-seeking student from the requirements of this subchapter.

(b) A student who has achieved a score set by the board on the SAT or ACT is exempt from the requirements of this subchapter. An exemption under this subsection is effective for the five-year period following the date a student takes the test and achieves the standard set by the board.

(c) A student who has achieved scores set by the board on the questions developed for end-of-course assessment instruments under Section 39.0233(a) is exempt from the requirements of this subchapter. The exemption is effective for the three-year period following the date a student takes the last assessment instrument for purposes of this subchapter and achieves the standard set by the board. This subsection does not apply during any period for which the board designates the questions developed for end-of-course assessment instruments under Section 39.0233(a) as the primary assessment instrument under this subchapter, except that the three-year period described by this subsection remains in effect for students who qualify for an exemption under this subsection before that period.

(d) A student who has demonstrated the performance standard for college readiness as provided by Section 28.008 on the postsecondary readiness assessment instruments adopted under Section 39.0238 for Algebra II and English III is exempt from the requirements of this subchapter with respect to those content areas. The commissioner of higher education by rule shall establish the period for which an exemption under this subsection is valid.

(e) A student who successfully completes a college preparatory course under Section 28.014 is exempt from the requirements of this subchapter with respect to the content area of the course, provided that the student satisfies the requirements of Subsection (f) of this section. The exemption is effective for the two-year period following the date the student graduates from high school. The exemption applies only at the institution of higher education that partners with the school district in which the student is enrolled to provide the course, except that the commissioner of higher education by rule may determine the manner in which the exemption may be applied to institutions of higher education other than the partnering institution.

(f) A student receiving an exemption under Subsection (e) must enroll in a college-level course in the exempted content area during the student's first year of enrollment at an institution of higher education occurring after the student qualifies for the exemption. If the student earns a grade below a "C" for the course, the institution shall advise the student of non-course-based options for attaining college readiness, such as tutoring or accelerated learning.

(g) The board shall:

(1) collect and analyze data regarding the effectiveness of college preparatory courses provided under Section 28.014 in assisting students to become ready to perform freshman-level academic coursework, as measured by the rate at which students receiving an exemption under Subsection (e) successfully complete the course described by Subsection (f); and

(2) in November of each even-numbered year, submit a report of the board's findings to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the standing legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over higher education, and each institution of higher education and school district that offers a college preparatory course under Section 28.014.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.09, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.339. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR DEVELOPMENTAL EDUCATION. The board, in consultation with institutions of higher education, shall develop and provide professional development programs, including instruction in differentiated instruction methods designed to address students' diverse learning needs, to faculty and staff who provide developmental coursework, including basic academic skills education, to students.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062(i-4) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.10, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.340. FUNDING. (a) The legislature shall appropriate money for approved non-degree-credit developmental courses, including basic academic skills education, except that legislative appropriations may not be used for developmental coursework taken by a student in excess of:

(1) for a general academic teaching institution:

(A) 9 semester credit hours; or

(B) 18 semester credit hours, if the developmental coursework is English for speakers of other languages; and

(2) for a public junior college, public technical institute, or public state college:

(A) 18 semester credit hours; or

(B) 27 semester credit hours, if the developmental coursework is English for speakers of other languages.

(b) The board may develop formulas to supplement the funding of developmental academic programs by institutions of higher education, including formulas for supplementing the funding of non-course-based programs. The board may develop a performance funding formula by which institutions of higher education may receive additional funding for each student who completes the success initiative established under this subchapter and then successfully completes college coursework. The legislature may appropriate the money required to provide the additional funding under those formulas.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.11, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.341. REPORT TO BOARD. Each institution of higher education, other than a medical and dental unit, shall report annually to the board on the success of its students and the effectiveness of its success initiative.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062(n) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.12, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.342. REPORT TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS. An institution of higher education that administers an assessment instrument to students under this subchapter shall report to each school district from which assessed students graduated high school all available information regarding student scores and performance on the assessment instrument and student demographics.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062(u) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.13, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.343. EVALUATION OF SUCCESS INITIATIVE. The board shall evaluate the effectiveness of the success initiative on a statewide basis and with respect to each institution of higher education.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062(o) by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.14, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.344. RULES. (a) The board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter.

(b) The board's rules may require an institution of higher education to adopt uniform standards for the placement of a student under this subchapter.

(c) The board shall adopt rules to ensure that this subchapter is administered in a manner that complies with federal law regarding confidentiality of student medical or educational information, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.), the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g), and any state law relating to the privacy of student information.

(d) The board shall adopt rules for the implementation of Section 51.336(e).

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 61, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 1244), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3468), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 62(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 63(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 1054), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (S.B. 1776), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 6(a), eff. June 19, 2015.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Education Code, Section 51.3062 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 1.15, eff. June 15, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER G. RESPONSIBILITIES OF GOVERNING BOARDS, SYSTEM ADMINISTRATIONS, AND INSTITUTIONS

Sec. 51.351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "General academic teaching institution," "governing board," "institution of higher education," "medical and dental unit," "public junior college," and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "System administration" means the administrative officers and employees of a university system who are assigned responsibility in relation to administration of two or more component institutions and are under the supervision of the chancellor or other chief executive officer of the university system.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 1.09, eff. June 20, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 526, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 292 (S.B. 34), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1227), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 51.352. RESPONSIBILITY OF GOVERNING BOARDS. (a) It is the policy of this state that the governing boards of institutions of higher education, being composed of lay members, shall exercise the traditional and time-honored role for such boards as their role has evolved in the United States and shall constitute the keystone of the governance structure. In this regard each governing board:

(1) is expected to preserve institutional independence and to defend its right to manage its own affairs through its chosen administrators and employees;

(2) shall enhance the public image of each institution under its governance;

(3) shall interpret the community to the campus and interpret the campus to the community;

(4) shall nurture each institution under its governance to the end that each institution achieves its full potential within its role and mission; and

(5) shall insist on clarity of focus and mission of each institution under its governance.

(b) The governing board of an institution of higher education shall provide the policy direction for each institution of higher education under its management and control.

(c) In making or confirming appointments to a governing board, the governor and senate shall ensure that the appointee has the background and experience suitable for performing the statutory responsibility of a member of the governing board.

(d) In addition to powers and duties specifically granted by this code or other law, each governing board shall:

(1) establish, for each institution under its control and management, goals consistent with the role and mission of the institution;

(2) appoint the chancellor or other chief executive officer of the system, if the board governs a university system;

(3) appoint the president or other chief executive officer of each institution under the board's control and management and evaluate the chief executive officer of each component institution and assist the officer in the achievement of performance goals;

(4) set campus admission standards consistent with the role and mission of the institution and considering the admission standards of similar institutions nationwide having a similar role and mission, as determined by the coordinating board; and

(5) ensure that its formal position on matters of importance to the institutions under its governance is made clear to the coordinating board when such matters are under consideration by the coordinating board.

(e) Each member of a governing board has the legal responsibilities of a fiduciary in the management of funds under the control of institutions subject to the board's control and management.

(f) The governing board of each general academic teaching institution and each public junior college within a 100-mile radius of that institution shall adopt a policy to enhance the transfer of students based on the recommendations of the permanent advisory committee under Section 51.3521 of this code.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 1.09, eff. June 20, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 526, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 51.3521. PERMANENT ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (a) Permanent advisory committees are established.

(b) Each committee consists of the president, or the president's designee, of each general academic teaching institution and of each public junior college within a 100-mile radius of a general academic teaching institution.

(c) Each committee shall biennially elect a presiding officer.

(d) Each committee may elect other officers.

(e) Each committee shall adopt rules to govern the time and place of meetings and the transaction of business.

(f) Each committee shall:

(1) periodically study regional higher education needs in this state; and

(2) make recommendations to the governing boards of each general academic teaching institution and each public junior college represented regarding degree programs, core curricula, and joint faculty appointments to enhance the transfer of students and the coordinated working relationships between those institutions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 526, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 51.353. RESPONSIBILITY OF SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION. (a) The system administration of each system shall coordinate the activities of component institutions within the system.

(b) In addition to other powers and duties provided by this code or other law, each system administration shall:

(1) initiate, monitor, approve, and coordinate long-range planning for the system;

(2) approve short-range institutional plans for operations and expenditures;

(3) provide to component institutions technical assistance such as legal and financial services;

(4) evaluate each component institution and assist the institution in the achievement of performance goals; and

(5) perform such other duties as may be delegated to it by the governing board of its system.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 1.09, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 51.354. INSTITUTIONAL RESPONSIBILITY. In addition to specific responsibilities imposed by this code or other law, each institution of higher education has the general responsibility to serve the public and, within the institution's role and mission, to:

(1) transmit culture through general education;

(2) extend knowledge;

(3) teach and train students for professions;

(4) provide for scientific, engineering, medical, and other academic research;

(5) protect intellectual exploration and academic freedom;

(6) strive for intellectual excellence;

(7) provide educational opportunity for all who can benefit from postsecondary education and training; and

(8) provide continuing education opportunities.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 1.09, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 51.355. NONVOTING STUDENT REGENT; UNIVERSITY SYSTEM BOARD OF REGENTS. (a) In this section, "student government" means the representative student organization directly elected by the student body of a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit.

(b) The chancellor of each university system shall develop a uniform application form to be used by each general academic teaching institution and medical and dental unit in the university system to solicit applicants for the position of student regent.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (f), not later than November 1 of each year, the student government of each general academic teaching institution and medical and dental unit in a university system shall solicit applicants for appointment to the next regular term of the position of student regent. Not later than January 1, from among the applications received by the student government, the student government shall select five applicants as the student government's recommendations for the position of student regent and send the applications of those applicants to the chancellor of the university system. From among those applicants, the chancellor shall select two or more applicants as the university system's recommendations for the position of student regent and shall send the applications of those applicants to the governor not later than February 1. The governor may request to review all applications for the position of student regent received by the student governments and may request an applicant to submit additional information to the governor. On June 1, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the governor shall appoint one of the applicants to serve as the student regent for the system for a one-year term expiring on the next May 31. The governor is not required to appoint an applicant recommended by the chancellor, but may not appoint a student regent who did not submit an application to the student government of a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit in the system as described by this subsection.

(d) To be eligible for appointment as student regent, a person must be enrolled as an undergraduate or graduate student in a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit in the university system and be in good academic standing as determined by the institution at the time of appointment. The person must remain enrolled at the institution throughout the person's term as a student regent. For purposes of this subsection, a person is considered to be enrolled in an institution or unit for a summer term if the person was enrolled in the institution or unit for the preceding semester and:

(1) is registered or preregistered at the institution or unit for the following fall semester;

(2) if the person has not completed the person's degree program, is eligible to continue the degree program at the institution or unit in the following fall semester; or

(3) if the person completed a degree program in the preceding semester, is admitted to another degree program at the institution or unit for the following fall semester.

(d-1) Throughout a student regent's term, the student regent must maintain a grade point average of at least 2.5 on a four-point scale. The president of the institution in which the student regent is enrolled shall notify the governor if the student regent fails to maintain the qualifications required by this section.

(e) A student regent is not a member of the board of regents of the system for which the student regent is appointed. A student regent has the same powers and duties as the members of the board of regents of the system, including the right to attend and participate in meetings of the board of regents, except that the student regent:

(1) may not vote on any matter before the board or make or second any motion before the board; and

(2) is not counted in determining whether a quorum exists for a meeting of the board or in determining the outcome of any vote of the board.

(f) The student government of the general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit at which a current student regent was enrolled at the time of the student regent's appointment may not solicit applicants for the position of student regent for the next regular term of the position.

(g) A vacancy in the position of student regent for a university system shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor in consultation with the chancellor of the system.

(h) On receiving notice under Subsection (d-1) from the president of the institution in which the student regent is enrolled that the student regent has failed to maintain the qualifications required by this section, the governor shall declare the position of student regent vacant and as soon as practicable fill the vacancy in the manner prescribed by Subsection (g).

(i) A student regent serves without compensation but is entitled to be reimbursed for the actual expenses incurred by the student regent in attending the meetings of the board of regents, subject to the approval of the chairman of the board of regents.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 292 (S.B. 34), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1227), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (S.B. 276), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 107 (S.B. 42), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 51.356. NONVOTING STUDENT REGENT; INSTITUTION BOARD OF REGENTS. (a) This section applies only to a general academic teaching institution that is not a part of a university system.

(b) In this section, "student government" means the representative student organization directly elected by the student body of a general academic teaching institution.

(c) The president of a general academic teaching institution shall develop a uniform application form to be used to solicit applicants for the position of student regent.

(d) Not later than November 1 of each year, the student government of the general academic teaching institution shall solicit applicants for appointment to the next regular term of the position of student regent. Not later than January 1, from among the applications received by the student government, the student government shall select five applicants as the student government's recommendations for the position of student regent and send the applications of those applicants to the president of the institution. From among those applicants, the president shall select two or more applicants as the institution's recommendations for the position of student regent and shall send the applications of those applicants to the governor not later than February 1. The governor may request to review all applications for the position of student regent received by the student government and may request an applicant to submit additional information to the governor. On June 1, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the governor shall appoint one of the applicants to serve as the student regent for the institution for a one-year term expiring on the next May 31. The governor is not required to appoint an applicant recommended by the president, but may not appoint a student regent who did not submit an application to the student government of the institution as described by this subsection.

(e) To be eligible for appointment as student regent, a person must be enrolled as an undergraduate or graduate student in the general academic teaching institution and be in good academic standing as determined by the institution at the time of appointment. The person must remain enrolled at the institution throughout the person's term as a student regent. For purposes of this subsection, a person is considered to be enrolled in an institution for a summer term if the person was enrolled in the institution for the preceding semester and:

(1) is registered or preregistered at the institution for the following fall semester;

(2) if the person has not completed the person's degree program, is eligible to continue the degree program at the institution in the following fall semester; or

(3) if the person completed a degree program in the preceding semester, is admitted to another degree program at the institution for the following fall semester.

(e-1) Throughout a student regent's term, the student regent must maintain a grade point average of at least 2.5 on a four-point scale. The president of the institution in which the student regent is enrolled shall notify the governor if the student regent fails to maintain the qualifications required by this section.

(f) A student regent is not a member of the board of regents of the institution for which the student regent is appointed. A student regent has the same powers and duties as the members of the board of regents of the institution, including the right to attend and participate in meetings of the board of regents, except that the student regent:

(1) may not vote on any matter before the board or make or second any motion before the board; and

(2) is not counted in determining whether a quorum exists for a meeting of the board or in determining the outcome of any vote of the board.

(g) A vacancy in the position of student regent for an institution shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor in consultation with the president of the institution.

(h) On receiving notice under Subsection (e-1) from the president of the institution that the student regent has failed to maintain the qualifications required by this section, the governor shall declare the position of student regent vacant and as soon as practicable fill the vacancy in the manner prescribed by Subsection (g).

(i) A student regent serves without compensation but is entitled to be reimbursed for the actual expenses incurred by the student regent in attending the meetings of the board of regents, subject to the approval of the chairman of the board of regents.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 292 (S.B. 34), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1227), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (S.B. 276), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 107 (S.B. 42), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 51.357. PUBLIC TESTIMONY AT CERTAIN MEETINGS OF GOVERNING BOARDS OF GENERAL ACADEMIC TEACHING INSTITUTIONS. (a) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The governing board of each general academic teaching institution or of a university system that includes one or more component general academic teaching institutions shall adopt a policy that allows the public to present, for a reasonable amount of time and for any item on the agenda, both written and oral testimony at a regular meeting of the board.

(c) The governing board shall consider the public testimony presented to the board on an issue before making a decision on the issue.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 303 (S.B. 511), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 51.355 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(13-a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 51.358. LONG-TERM STRATEGIC PLAN FOR RESEARCH UNIVERSITY OR EMERGING RESEARCH UNIVERSITY. (a) The governing board of each institution of higher education designated as a research university or emerging research university under the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board's accountability system shall submit to the coordinating board, in the form and manner prescribed by the coordinating board, a detailed, long-term strategic plan documenting the strategy by which the institution intends to achieve recognition as a research university, or enhance the university's reputation as a research university, as applicable.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt rules for the administration of this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 287 (H.B. 51), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 51.359. ROLE AND MISSION STATEMENT. Each institution of higher education shall develop a statement regarding the role and mission of the institution reflecting the three missions of higher education: teaching, research, and public service.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 1.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Transferred and redesignated from Education Code, Section 61.0511 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1155 (S.B. 215), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER H. GUIDELINES FOR ACADEMIC AND OTHER REPORTS BY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 51.401. PURPOSE. It is the intent of the legislature that all public higher education institutions of this state shall manage their institutions and institutional resources to achieve maximum effectiveness and to provide the greatest attainable educational benefit from the expenditure of public funds.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1478, ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 51.402. REPORT OF INSTITUTIONAL AND ACADEMIC DUTIES. (a) The Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, in cooperation with governing boards, institutional officials, and faculty representatives of general academic institutions of higher education, shall develop and recommend general policies and standard reports for academic faculty workloads and services.

(b) The governing board of each institution of higher education in the state shall adopt rules and regulations concerning faculty academic workloads. In adopting rules under this subsection, each institution shall recognize that classroom teaching, basic and applied research, and professional development are important elements of faculty academic workloads by giving appropriate weight to each activity when determining the standards for faculty academic workload. An institution may give the same or different weight to each activity and to other activities recognized by the institution as important elements of faculty academic workloads. The established rules and regulations of each institution shall be reported to the coordinating board and included in the operating budgets of each institution.

(c) Within 30 days of the end of each academic year, the institution shall file with its governing board a report, by department, of the academic duties and services performed by each member of the faculty during the nine-month academic year, showing evidence of compliance with requirements established by the governing board. The report of academic duties and services performed by each member of the faculty shall indicate all appointments held by the faculty member in the employing institution, the salary paid to each appointment, the percent of time of each appointment, and the source of funds from which salary payments were made. Teaching responsibilities in each workload standard shall be in proportion to the portion of salary paid from funds appropriated for instructional purposes.

(d) The institutional head of each higher education institution shall designate the officer of his staff who will monitor workloads, prepare and review appropriate workload reports, and submit the reports to the institutional head for his certification or approval and comments as may be appropriate.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1478, ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 845, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 51.403. ECONOMIC JUSTIFICATION FOR COURSES; REPORTS OF STUDENT ENROLLMENT AND ACADEMIC PERFORMANCE. (a) All higher education institutions of this state shall offer only such courses and teach such classes as are economically justified in the considered judgment of the appropriate governing board.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049, Sec. 9.01(a)(2), eff. September 1, 2011.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049, Sec. 9.01(a)(2), eff. September 1, 2011.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(13), eff. June 17, 2011.

(e) Under guidelines established by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, and the State Board of Education, postsecondary institutions shall report student performance during the first year enrolled after graduation from high school to the high school or junior college last attended. This report shall include, but not be limited to, appropriate student test scores, a description of developmental courses required, and the student's grade point average. Appropriate safeguards for student privacy shall be included in the rules for implementation of this subsection.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1478, ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1100, ch. 516, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 726, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 665, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 9.01(a)(2), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(13), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 4.007, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.4031. REPORTS OF AFFORDABILITY AND ACCESS. (a) Not later than November 1 of each year, the chief executive officer of each institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, shall provide to the governing board of the institution a report for the preceding fall, spring, and summer semesters that examines the affordability and access of the institution.

(b) The report must include:

(1) statistical information on the percentage of gross family income required for a student who is a resident of this state to pay tuition and required fees charged by the institution;

(2) the criteria used by the institution to admit students to the institution;

(3) an analysis of the criteria used to admit students and to award financial assistance to students, considering the mission of the institution and the purposes of higher education in this state;

(4) an analysis of the manner in which the factors described by Subdivisions (1)-(3) relate to:

(A) the regions of this state in which students reside;

(B) the race or ethnicity of students;

(C) the gender of students; and

(D) the level of education achieved by the parents of students; and

(5) comparisons of the institution with peer institutions in this state and in other states with respect to affordability and access.

(c) For purposes of the report, a student who applies for admission to or enrolls in an institution and applies for financial aid from the institution may be required to provide documentation necessary for the institution to complete the report.

(d) An institution's report must be in the form prescribed by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in consultation with the institution.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1321, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.4032. ANNUAL REPORT OF PARTICIPATION IN HIGHER EDUCATION. Not later than December 1 of each year and in the form prescribed by the coordinating board, each general academic teaching institution and medical and dental unit as defined in Section 61.003 shall provide to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and shall publish on the institution's website a report describing the composition of the institution's entering class of students. The report must include a demographic breakdown of the class, including a breakdown by race, ethnicity, economic status, and high school class standing. A report submitted by a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit as defined in Section 61.003 must include separate demographic breakdowns of the students admitted under Sections 51.803, 51.804, and 51.805 and a description of any plans, policies, or programs developed or implemented by the institution to recruit and retain students from underrepresented groups such as racial or ethnic minority groups.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 694 (S.B. 302), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1369 (H.B. 3851), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.404. SUBMISSION OF REPORTS. Each institution shall submit all reports required by this subchapter to the coordinating board. The coordinating board shall furnish such summaries of these reports as the governor's budget office and legislative budget board may request, including an analysis of compliance by each institution of higher education with its adopted rules and regulations as filed with the coordinating board in compliance with Section 51.402(b) of this code. All such reports shall be public information.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1478, ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 51.405. REPORTING OF NONCOMPLIANCE. Should any institution of higher education fail to comply with its adopted rules and regulations as determined by the coordinating board in Section 51.404 of this code, the coordinating board shall inform the governor's budget office, the legislative budget board, and the chairmen of the house and senate appropriations committees.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1478, ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 51.406. EXPIRATION OF CERTAIN REPORTING REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND UNIVERSITY SYSTEMS. (a) In this section, "university system" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) To the extent that any of the following laws require reporting by a university system or an institution of higher education, a university system or institution of higher education is not required to make the report on or after September 1, 2013, unless legislation enacted by the 83rd Legislature that becomes law expressly requires the institution or system to make the report:

(1) Section 7.109;

(2) Section 33.083;

(3) Section 59.07;

(4) Section 130.251;

(5) Section 325.007, Government Code;

(6) Section 669.003, Government Code;

(7) Section 2005.007, Government Code;

(8) Section 2054.097, Government Code;

(9) Chapter 2114, Government Code; and

(10) Section 2205.041, Government Code.

(c) A rule or policy of a state agency, including the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in effect on June 1, 2011, that requires reporting by a university system or an institution of higher education has no effect on or after September 1, 2013, unless the rule or policy is affirmatively and formally readopted before that date by formal administrative rule published in the Texas Register and adopted in compliance with Chapter 2001, Government Code. This subsection does not apply to:

(1) a rule or policy for which the authorizing statute is listed in Subsection (b);

(2) a rule or policy for which the authorizing statute is repealed on or before September 1, 2013, by legislation enacted by the legislature that becomes law; or

(3) a report required under any of the following provisions:

(A) Article 59.06(g)(1), Code of Criminal Procedure;

(B) Section 51.005;

(C) Section 51.0051;

(D) Subchapter F-1 of this chapter;

(E) Section 51.402;

(F) Section 56.039;

(G) Section 61.059;

(H) Section 62.095(b);

(I) Section 62.098;

(J) Section 411.187(b), Government Code;

(K) Subchapter C, Chapter 606, Government Code;

(L) Subchapter E, Chapter 815, Government Code; or

(M) Chapter 1551, Insurance Code.

(d) At least every five years, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall reevaluate its rules and policies to ensure the continuing need for the data requests the coordinating board imposes on university systems, institutions of higher education, or private or independent institutions of higher education. The coordinating board shall consult with those entities to identify unnecessary data requests and shall eliminate data requests identified as unnecessary from its rules and policies. In this subsection, "private or independent institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(e) This section does not apply to a request for information by the state auditor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.03, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1155 (S.B. 215), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(13), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 382), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 2.06, eff. June 15, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER I. TEXTBOOKS

Sec. 51.451. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "College bookstore" means a bookstore that is:

(A) operated by an institution of higher education; or

(B) in a contractual relationship or otherwise affiliated with an institution of higher education.

(2) "Custom textbook" means a textbook that is compiled by a publisher at the direction of a faculty member or other person in charge of selecting course materials at an institution of higher education and that may include items such as selections from original instructor materials, previously copyrighted publisher materials, copyrighted third-party works, or elements unique to a specific institution.

(3) "Faculty member" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.917.

(4) "Institution of higher education" means:

(A) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003; or

(B) a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003.

(4-a) "Open educational resource" means a teaching, learning, or research resource that is in the public domain or has been released under an intellectual property license that permits the free use, adaptation, and redistribution of the resource by any person. The term may include full course curricula, course materials, modules, textbooks, media, assessments, software, and any other tools, materials, or techniques, whether digital or otherwise, used to support access to knowledge.

(5) "Supplemental material," with respect to a textbook, means instructional material developed to accompany the textbook, including printed materials, computer disks, website access, and electronically distributed materials, other than material that is part of an integrated textbook.

(6) "Textbook" means a book published primarily for instruction in connection with a particular course or courses offered to postsecondary students by an institution of higher education. The term includes any edition of a textbook or set of textbooks and any item considered supplemental specifically to the textbook, regardless of whether the textbook and supplemental item are sold together or separately.

(7) "Textbook bundle" means a textbook that is combined with other instructional material, such as another textbook or additional printed material, a computer disk, website access, or electronically distributed material, and that is packaged or otherwise offered for sale with that instructional material at a single price. The term does not include a textbook that is combined with other instructional material if that material in its entirety is:

(A) required to be offered for sale with or as part of the textbook, according to a third-party contractual agreement; or

(B) interrelated with the content of the textbook to such a degree that any separation of the material from the textbook would render the textbook unusable for its intended purpose.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 810), Sec. 35, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 51.452. DISSEMINATION OF COURSE SCHEDULE AND LIST OF REQUIRED AND RECOMMENDED TEXTBOOKS. (a) Each institution of higher education shall:

(1) for each semester or academic term, compile a course schedule indicating each course offered by the institution for the semester or term to postsecondary students;

(2) with respect to each course, include with the schedule a list of the required and recommended textbooks that specifies, to the extent practicable, the following information for each textbook:

(A) the retail price;

(B) the author;

(C) the publisher;

(D) the most recent copyright date;

(E) the International Standard Book Number assigned, if any; and

(F) whether the textbook is an open educational resource;

(3) except as provided by Subsection (b), at the time required by Subsection (c)(2):

(A) publish the textbook list with the course schedule on the institution's Internet website and with any course schedule the institution provides in hard copy format to the students of the institution; and

(B) make that information available to college bookstores and other bookstores that generally serve the students of the institution; and

(4) except as provided by Subsection (b), as soon as practicable after the information becomes available disseminate as required by Subdivision (3) specific information regarding any revisions to the institution's course schedule and textbook list.

(b) An institution of higher education is not required to publish a textbook list as described by Subsection (a)(3)(A) or any revisions to that textbook list as described by Subsection (a)(4) if a college bookstore publishes that list and any revisions to that list on the bookstore's Internet website on behalf of the institution at the appropriate times required by this section.

(c) To allow for timely placement of textbook orders by students, each institution of higher education shall:

(1) establish a deadline by which faculty members must submit information to be included in the course schedule and textbook list required by Subsection (a); and

(2) disseminate the institution's course schedule and textbook list as required by Subsection (a)(3) as soon as practicable after the institution has compiled the schedule and list but not later than the 30th day before the first day that classes are conducted for the semester or other academic term for which the schedule and list are compiled.

(d) If an institution of higher education or a college bookstore publishes a textbook list with a course schedule on an Internet website that provides a search function, the institution or bookstore must:

(1) ensure that the search function permits a search based on whether a course or section of a course requires or recommends only open educational resources; or

(2) provide a searchable list of courses and sections of courses that require or recommend only open educational resources.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 810), Sec. 36, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 51.453. TEXTBOOK ASSISTANCE INFORMATION FOR STUDENTS. To the extent practicable, an institution of higher education shall make reasonable efforts to disseminate to its students information regarding:

(1) available institutional programs for renting textbooks or for purchasing used textbooks;

(2) available institutional guaranteed textbook buyback programs;

(3) available institutional programs for alternative delivery of textbook content;

(4) the availability of courses and sections of courses that require or recommend only open educational resources; and

(5) other available institutional textbook cost-savings strategies.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 810), Sec. 37, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 51.454. TEXTBOOK PUBLISHERS: AVAILABILITY OF INFORMATION TO FACULTY CONCERNING TEXTBOOK PRICES, REVISIONS, AND COPYRIGHTS. (a) When a textbook publisher provides information regarding a textbook or supplemental material other than an open educational resource to a faculty member or other person in charge of selecting course materials at an institution of higher education, the publisher shall also provide to the faculty member or other person written information that includes:

(1) the price at which the publisher would make the textbook or supplemental material available to a college bookstore or other bookstore that generally serves the students of the institution and, if applicable, to the public;

(2) the copyright dates of the current and three preceding editions of the textbook;

(3) a description of any substantial content revisions made between the current edition of the textbook or supplemental material and the most recent preceding edition of the textbook or material, including the addition of new chapters, new material covering additional time periods, new themes, or new subject matter;

(4) information as to whether the textbook or supplemental material is available in other formats, such as a paperback or unbound version; and

(5) the price at which the publisher would make the textbook or supplemental material in any alternative format available to a bookstore described by Subdivision (1) and, if applicable, to the public.

(b) A textbook publisher shall comply with this section with respect to a custom textbook only to the extent reasonably practicable.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 810), Sec. 38, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 51.455. TEXTBOOK BUNDLES. A textbook publisher that offers a textbook bundle for sale directly to students enrolled at an institution of higher education or, for resale purposes, to a college bookstore or other bookstore that generally serves the students of the institution shall also offer for sale to the students or bookstore, as applicable, each individual item of instructional material as a separate, unbundled item that is separately priced.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER K. PRIVATE DONOR RESEARCH FUND

Sec. 51.551. PURPOSE. The purpose of this subchapter is to establish a private donor research fund to encourage donations from the private sector to support research and development in teacher education and teaching.

Added by Acts 1984, 68th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 28, art. III, part J, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1984.

Sec. 51.552. FUND. (a) A special fund to be known as the private donor research fund is created in the state treasury.

(b) The fund shall be administered by the State Board of Education.

(c) Biennially, the legislature may appropriate general revenue to the fund in an amount not to exceed the amount of donations to the fund during the preceding biennium.

(d) In addition to donations from private sources and appropriations by the legislature, the board shall solicit money for the fund from the federal government.

Added by Acts 1984, 68th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 28, art. III, part J, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1984.

Sec. 51.553. USE OF FUND. (a) The board shall develop concepts for research projects in the areas of teacher education and teaching and shall assign each research project, together with the amount of money from the fund necessary to implement the project, to an approved teacher education program of an institution of higher education or to a school district, as appropriate.

(b) The board shall adopt guidelines to ensure it assigns projects and distributes money from the fund equitably among teacher education programs and equitably among school districts. In addition, the board shall adopt standards and timetables for the projects it assigns and shall periodically review the progress of the projects.

Added by Acts 1984, 68th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 28, art. III, part J, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1984.

SUBCHAPTER N. PARTNERSHIPS BETWEEN COMMUNITY/JUNIOR COLLEGES AND OTHER INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 51.661. PURPOSE. The purpose of this subchapter is to encourage partnerships between public community/junior colleges and other institutions of higher education that are located in the same state uniform service region as adopted by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in order to improve the continuity, quality, and efficiency of educational programs and services.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 901, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.6615. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.662. PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTS. With the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the governing boards of a public community/junior college and another institution of higher education that are located in the same state uniform service region as adopted by the coordinating board may enter into a partnership agreement designed to coordinate the management and operations of the institutions. The agreements shall in no way abrogate the powers and duties of the boards with regard to the governance of their respective institutions.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 901, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.663. ADVISORY COMMITTEE. The governing boards of the participating institutions shall appoint an advisory committee composed of three members from each board. The committee shall study the needs of the community served by the institutions and shall make recommendations to the respective boards concerning the development of coordinated programs and services to meet those needs. The committee shall give particular attention to the continuity of curriculum offerings and to the joint use of faculty and staff, facilities, and library resources.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985.

Sec. 51.664. JOINT USE OF PERSONNEL. By interagency contract the governing boards of the participating institutions may fill by joint appointment any administrative, faculty, or support position necessary for the operation of the institutions. In such cases, salaries and benefits shall be prorated and paid from the funds of the respective institutions according to the share of each employee's responsibility to each institution.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985.

Sec. 51.665. SUPPORT SERVICES. By interagency contract the governing boards of the participating institutions may assign the management and operation of selected services to one of the institutions in order to achieve cost effectiveness. Such services include, but are not limited to, maintenance of building and grounds, operation of auxiliary enterprises, and operation of a jointly supported library.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985.

Sec. 51.666. FACILITIES. A participating institution of higher education may lease facilities from or to the community/junior college for administrative and instructional purposes. Community/junior college facilities may not be transferred to the other participating institution of higher education and may not be included in the space inventory of the other participating institution of higher education for formula funding purposes.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 901, Sec. 3, eff. Aug.30, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.667. STATE FUNDING. The community/junior college shall receive state appropriations on the same formula basis as other community/junior colleges, and the other participating institution of higher education shall receive state appropriations on the same formula basis as other similar institutions of higher education.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 43, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.668. CONTINUING RESPONSIBILITIES. A participating community/junior college must continue to provide programs and services enumerated in Section 130.003(e). The role and scope of the other participating institution of higher education are subject to approval by the coordinating board.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER O. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY POLICIES

Sec. 51.680. REVIEW BY COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) The commissioner of higher education, by December 31, 1987, shall review the intellectual property policies of institutions of higher education that were filed with the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, pursuant to Senate Concurrent Resolution 92 of the 69th Texas Legislature. In this review, the commissioner shall determine, as a ministerial duty, without regard to the substance of the content thereof, whether the intellectual property policies address as a minimum standard the following matters:

(1) disclosure of scientific and technological developments, including inventions, discoveries, trade secrets, and computer software;

(2) institutional review of scientific and technological disclosures, including consideration of ownership and appropriate legal protection;

(3) guidelines for licensing scientific and technological developments;

(4) clear identification of ownership and licensing responsibilities for each class of intellectual property;

(5) royalty participation by inventors and the institution; and

(6) equity and management participation on the part of the inventor or inventors in business entities that utilize technology created at the institution of higher education.

(b) No later than January 31, 1988, the commissioner of higher education shall inform institutions of higher education whether their intellectual property policies meet the minimum standards set out in Subsection (a). Thereafter, an institution of higher education may file or post on the institution's website on the Internet in a manner available to the public policies amended to overcome any failure to meet the standards. The commissioner shall within a reasonable time after receiving an amended policy inform the submitting institution whether it meets the standards.

(c) It is a policy of the state that each institution of higher education shall at all times after August 31, 1988, have a current copy of its intellectual property policies that meet the minimum standards set out in Subsection (a) on file with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board or posted on the institution's website on the Internet in a manner available to the public. The commissioner of higher education shall establish procedures for the monitoring of this policy of the state.

(d) Institutions of higher education not having an intellectual property policy meeting the minimum standards set out in Subsection (a) of this section by August 31, 1988, shall not receive funds under any state-run competitive research or advanced technology funding programs.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 772, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 5.01, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER P. FUND FOR THE NATIONAL CENTER FOR MANUFACTURING SCIENCES

Sec. 51.701. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:

(1) strength in the manufacturing sector is critical to the United States' and Texas' international competitive position, as well as to the national security. Manufacturing has the highest economic multiplier of any industrial sector, contributing to economic growth and personal wealth. High technology manufacturing has the highest economic multiplier among manufacturing sectors;

(2) the health of the manufacturing sector is critical for economic growth in Texas. Texas, as a primary producer of raw materials, finds itself positioned to benefit tremendously from improvement and development of its manufacturing capabilities, even while the Texas economy suffers the consequences of having depended too heavily on production of raw materials alone; and

(3) manufacturing industry sales growth and productivity increases have been shown to move in direct relation to the performance of research and development by the industry.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. April 29, 1987.

Sec. 51.702. PURPOSE. It is the intent of the legislature that Texas accept the challenge of becoming the nation's centerpoint for advanced manufacturing technology development by aggressively pursuing the siting in Texas of the National Center for Manufacturing Sciences, proposed by the National Academy of Sciences and the Manufacturing Science Board, and initiated by the National Machine Tool Industry. With this centerpiece for advanced research and technology transfer in the area of manufacturing sciences, Texas could become a primary producer of high value-added products, with enormous benefits for the entire economy.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. April 29, 1987.

Sec. 51.703. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "fund" means the fund for the National Center for Manufacturing Sciences.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. April 29, 1987.

Sec. 51.704. FUND. (a) The fund for the National Center for Manufacturing Sciences is created as a special fund in the state treasury.

(b) The fund consists of:

(1) appropriations; and

(2) grants from industry and other sources.

(c) For each biennium the legislature may appropriate to the fund an amount equal to the amount of donations received from private sources for the biennium, not to exceed $2 million per biennium.

(d) The comptroller shall administer the fund until the center is located in Texas.

(e) The comptroller may accept grants for the purpose of the fund.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. April 29, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 5.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.705. USE OF FUND. (a) When the National Center for Manufacturing Sciences is announced for location in Texas, the existing funds (and all subsequent funds) will be made available for use by the center in accordance with its charter.

(b) Should the center not be located in Texas, the industry grants will be returned to their source and the state's matching appropriation will be held for reappropriation by the legislature.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. April 29, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER R. EDUCATIONAL ECONOMIC POLICY CENTER

Sec. 51.751. CREATION AND OPERATION. (a) The Educational Economic Policy Center is created as a consortium of universities. Each public senior college or university in the state shall participate in the Educational Economic Policy Center at the request of the governor. The center shall represent business, finance, public policy, education, and other appropriate disciplines.

(b) The center shall examine the efficiency of the public school system and the effectiveness of instructional methods and curricular programs and promote the use of successful methods and programs. The center shall monitor and evaluate the implementation of the accountability system under Chapters 39 and 39A and provide annual progress reports to the governor, Legislative Budget Board, and commissioner of education.

(c) The center may be funded by donations, grants, and legislative appropriations. The office of the governor may receive grants and donations for the purposes of this subchapter.

(d) The center may assist the legislature with education policy studies related to the purposes of the center on approval of the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker. The center may participate in collaborative studies with foundations or organizations within or outside the state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 813, Sec. 6.08, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 34.051 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 4, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 4.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(31), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.752. EDUCATIONAL ECONOMIC POLICY COMMITTEE. (a) The Educational Economic Policy Committee is created as the primary policy-making body of the Educational Economic Policy Center. The committee shall study the elements of a quality educational system to:

(1) improve the management and productivity of the public education system to meet the demands of the twenty-first century;

(2) provide greater accountability to the taxpayers of the state; and

(3) improve the state's ability to compete in education and to compete economically with other states and nations.

(b) The committee is composed of nine members. The governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint two members, only one of whom may be a board member or employee of a public school district, college, or university. Those appointees shall include persons in the private sector who have an interest in improving public education. In addition, the governor shall appoint three members who serve on the boards of regents representing the universities or systems participating in the center.

(c) Members of the committee serve two-year staggered terms.

(d) The governor shall appoint one member of the committee as the chairman.

(e) Members shall not receive salaries but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in attending meetings of the committee.

(f) State agencies shall cooperate with and assist the center at the committee's request.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 , Sec. 21(1), eff. September 1, 2015.

(h) If the legislature fails to appropriate funds for the operation of the Educational Economic Policy Center, the Legislative Budget Board shall perform the duties of the committee under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 813, Sec. 6.08, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 520, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 34.052 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 4, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 (S.B. 1455), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 (S.B. 1455), Sec. 21(1), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER S. ADMISSION APPLICATION FORMS

Sec. 51.761. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter, "board," "general academic teaching institution," "governing board," "institution of higher education," "public state college," "public technical institute," "private or independent institution of higher education," and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 11, Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 725 (S.B. 502), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (S.B. 1813), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.762. COMMON ADMISSION APPLICATION FORMS. (a) The board, with the assistance of high school counselors and an advisory committee composed of representatives of general academic teaching institutions, junior college districts, public state colleges, public technical institutes, and private or independent institutions of higher education, and with the consultation of all institutions of higher education that admit freshman-level students:

(1) shall adopt by rule:

(A) a common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as a freshman student to a general academic teaching institution;

(B) an electronic common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as a freshman student to an institution of higher education that admits freshman-level students, other than a general academic teaching institution; and

(C) if the board determines that adoption of the form would be cost-effective for nursing schools, an electronic common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as a student to an undergraduate nursing education program at an institution of higher education; and

(2) may adopt by rule a printed format common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as a freshman student to an institution of higher education that admits freshman-level students, other than a general academic teaching institution.

(b) The board, with the assistance of an advisory committee composed of representatives of general academic teaching institutions, junior college districts, public state colleges, and public technical institutes, and with the consultation of all institutions of higher education that admit undergraduate transfer students, may adopt by rule:

(1) a common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as an undergraduate transfer student to a general academic teaching institution;

(2) an electronic or printed format common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as an undergraduate transfer student to an institution of higher education that admits undergraduate transfer students, other than a general academic teaching institution; and

(3) if the board determines that adoption of the form would be cost-effective for nursing schools, an electronic common admission application form for use by a person seeking admission as a transfer student to an undergraduate nursing education program at an institution of higher education.

(c) In addition to information required to determine the residency status of the applicant and information relating to the use of the form at each institution, the board shall include on each application form adopted under this section information that the board considers appropriate.

(d) The board shall attempt to ensure as much uniformity in the forms adopted under this section as possible, regardless of the category of institution for which the forms are adopted.

(e) The board shall publicize in both electronic and printed formats the availability of a form adopted under this section.

(f) The board shall ensure that copies of the freshman common admission application forms and information for the use of the forms are available in electronic format for distribution to the appropriate personnel at each public high school in this state.

(g) The board shall make a form adopted under this section available to the public electronically by the Internet or other commonly used telecommunications media and may contract with an institution of higher education or other provider to satisfy this requirement.

(h) An applicant may file, and each institution of higher education shall accept, an application for admission as an entering freshman or undergraduate transfer student that uses the appropriate form adopted under this section. The form used to apply to a general academic teaching institution may be filed in either electronic or printed format. An institution of higher education is not prohibited from requiring an applicant to submit additional information within a reasonable time after the institution has received an application using a form adopted under this section.

(i) In addition to other information considered appropriate by the board, the board by rule shall require each institution to collect information regarding gender, ethnicity, and date of birth as part of the application process and report this information to the board.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 11, Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 725 (S.B. 502), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 983 (H.B. 2099), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (S.B. 1813), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.763. ELECTRONIC ADMISSION APPLICATION FORM FOR UNIVERSITY SYSTEMS. (a) The governing board of a university system shall adopt a common admission application form consistent with this subchapter to be used by any person seeking freshman or undergraduate transfer admission to one or more of the general academic teaching institutions within the university system.

(b) The form shall allow each applicant to:

(1) apply electronically to one or more of the general academic teaching institutions within the university system; and

(2) indicate preferences for admission between those institutions.

(c) A general academic teaching institution is not prohibited from requiring an applicant to submit additional information within a reasonable time after the institution has received an application under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 11, Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 1997.

Sec. 51.764. FEES. This subchapter does not affect the authority of an institution of higher education to receive a reasonable fee for the filing of an application for admission.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 11, Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER T. CONSTRUCTION AND REPAIR OF PERMANENT IMPROVEMENTS

Sec. 51.776. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Architect" means an individual registered as an architect under Chapter 1051, Occupations Code.

(2) "Board" means the governing body of an institution.

(3) "Contractor" in the context of a contract for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that assumes the risk for constructing, rehabilitating, altering, or repairing all or part of the facility at the contracted price.

(4) "Engineer" means an individual licensed as an engineer under Chapter 1001, Occupations Code.

(5) "Facility" means real property, including buildings and associated structures and improved or unimproved land.

(6) "Fee" in the context of a contract for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility means the payment a construction manager receives for its overhead and profit in performing its services.

(7) "General conditions" in the context of a contract for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility means on-site management, administrative personnel, insurance, bonds, equipment, utilities, and incidental work, including minor field labor and materials.

(8) "Institution" means an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, other than a public junior college.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.763, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.777. DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY. A board may, as appropriate, delegate by rule its authority under this subchapter to its designated representative.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.778. COMPETITIVE BIDDING ON CONTRACTS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, all contracts for the construction or erection of permanent improvements at an institution are void unless made after advertising for bids for the contracts in a manner prescribed by the institution's board, receiving sealed competitive bids, and awarding of the contract to the lowest responsible bidder by the board.

(b) If a contract awarded under sealed competitive bidding is to be recommended for award to other than the lowest bidder, any bidder making a lower bid than the recommended bid shall be notified of the recommendation for award and shall be allowed an opportunity before the award to present evidence to the board or its designated representative as to the responsibility of that bidder.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.779. EVALUATION OF BIDS AND PROPOSALS FOR CONSTRUCTION SERVICES. (a) An institution that is considering a construction contract using a method authorized by this subchapter must, before advertising, determine which method provides the best value for the institution.

(b) The institution shall base its selection among the offerors on criteria established by the institution. The institution shall publish in the request for bids, proposals, or qualifications the criteria that will be used to evaluate the offerors.

(c) The institution shall document the basis of its selection and shall make the evaluations public not later than the seventh day after the date the contract is awarded.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 51.780. DESIGN-BUILD CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Design-build contract" means a single contract with a design-build firm for the design and construction of a facility.

(2) "Design-build firm" means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity or team that includes an engineer or architect and builder qualified to engage in building construction in Texas.

(3) "Design criteria package" means a set of documents that provides sufficient information to permit a design-build firm to prepare a response to an institution's request for qualifications and any additional information requested, including criteria for selection. The design criteria package must specify criteria the institution considers necessary to describe the project and may include, as appropriate, the legal description of the site, survey information concerning the site, interior space requirements, special material requirements, material quality standards, conceptual criteria for the project, special equipment requirements, cost or budget estimates, time schedules, quality assurance and quality control requirements, site development requirements, applicable codes and ordinances, provisions for utilities, parking requirements, or any other requirement, as applicable.

(b) An institution may use the design-build method for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility. In using that method and in entering into a contract for the services of a design-build firm, the contracting institution and the design-build firm shall follow the procedures provided by Subsections (c)-(k).

(c) The board may designate an engineer or architect independent of the design-build firm to act as its representative for the duration of the work on the facility. If the board's engineer or architect is not a full-time employee of the institution, any engineer or architect designated shall be selected on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications in accordance with Section 2254.004, Government Code.

(d) The institution shall prepare a request for qualifications that includes general information on the project site, project scope, budget, special systems, selection criteria, and other information that may assist potential design-build firms in submitting proposals for the project. The institution shall also prepare the design criteria package that includes more detailed information on the project. If the preparation of the design criteria package requires engineering or architectural services that constitute the practice of engineering within the meaning of Chapter 1001, Occupations Code, or the practice of architecture within the meaning of Chapter 1051, Occupations Code, those services shall be provided in accordance with the applicable law.

(e) The board or its representative shall publish the request for qualifications in a manner prescribed by the board.

(f) The board or its representative shall evaluate statements of qualifications and select a design-build firm in two phases:

(1) In phase one, the board or its representative shall prepare a request for qualifications and evaluate each offeror's experience, technical competence, and capability to perform, the past performance of the offeror's team and members of the team, and other appropriate factors submitted by the team or firm in response to the request for qualifications, except that cost-related or price-related evaluation factors are not permitted. Each offeror must certify to the board that each engineer or architect that is a member of its team was selected based on demonstrated competence and qualifications in the manner provided by Section 2254.004, Government Code. The board or its representative shall qualify a maximum of five offerors to submit additional information and, if the board or its representative chooses, to interview for final selection.

(2) In phase two, the board or its representative shall evaluate the information submitted by the offerors on the basis of the selection criteria stated in the request for qualifications and the results of any interview. The board or its representative may request additional information regarding demonstrated competence and qualifications, considerations of the safety and long-term durability of the project, the feasibility of implementing the project as proposed, the ability of the offeror to meet schedules, costing methodology, or other factors as appropriate. The board or its representative may not require offerors to submit detailed engineering or architectural designs as part of the proposal. The board or its representative shall rank each proposal submitted on the basis of the criteria specified in the request for qualifications. The board or its representative shall select the design-build firm that submits the proposal offering the best value for the institution on the basis of the published selection criteria and on its ranking evaluations. The board or its representative shall first attempt to negotiate with the selected offeror a contract. If the board or its representative is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the selected offeror, the institution shall, formally and in writing, end all negotiations with that offeror and proceed to negotiate with the next offeror in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or negotiations with all ranked offerors end.

(g) Following selection of a design-build firm under Subsection (f), that firm's engineers or architects shall complete the design, submitting all design elements for review and determination of scope compliance by the institution's engineer or architect before or concurrently with construction.

(h) An engineer shall have responsibility for compliance with the engineering design requirements and all other applicable requirements of Chapter 1001, Occupations Code. An architect shall have responsibility for compliance with the requirements of Chapter 1051, Occupations Code.

(i) The institution shall provide or contract for, independently of the design-build firm, the inspection services, the testing of construction materials engineering, and the verification testing services necessary for acceptance of the facility by the institution. The institution shall select those services for which it contracts in accordance with Section 2254.004, Government Code.

(j) The design-build firm shall supply a signed and sealed set of construction documents for the project to the institution at the conclusion of construction.

(k) A payment or performance bond is not required for, and may not provide coverage for, the portion of a design-build contract under this section that includes design services only. If a fixed contract amount or guaranteed maximum price has not been determined at the time a design-build contract is awarded, the penal sums of the performance and payment bonds delivered to the institution shall each be in an amount equal to the project budget, as specified in the design criteria package. The design-build firm shall deliver the bonds not later than the 10th day after the date the design-build firm executes the contract unless the design-build firm furnishes a bid bond or other financial security acceptable to the institution to ensure that the design-build firm will furnish the required performance and payment bonds when a guaranteed maximum price is established.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 13, 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1409, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.764, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.781. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT. (a) An institution may use the construction manager-agent method for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility. In using that method and in entering into a contract for the services of a construction manager-agent, a board shall follow the procedures prescribed by this section.

(b) A construction manager-agent is a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that provides consultation to the institution regarding construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of the facility. An institution using the construction manager-agent method may, under the contract between the institution and the construction manager-agent, require the construction manager-agent to provide administrative personnel, equipment necessary to perform duties under this section, and on-site management and other services specified in the contract. A construction manager-agent represents the institution in a fiduciary capacity.

(c) Before or concurrently with selecting a construction manager-agent, the board shall select or designate an engineer or architect who shall prepare the construction documents for the project and who has full responsibility for complying with Chapter 1001 or 1051, Occupations Code, as applicable. If the engineer or architect is not a full-time employee of the institution, the board shall select the engineer or architect on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications as provided by Section 2254.004, Government Code. The institution's engineer or architect may not serve, alone or in combination with another person, as the construction manager-agent unless the engineer or architect is hired to serve as the construction manager-agent under a separate or concurrent procurement conducted in accordance with this subchapter. This subsection does not prohibit the institution's engineer or architect from providing customary construction phase services under the engineer's or architect's original professional service agreement in accordance with applicable licensing laws.

(d) A board shall select a construction manager-agent on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications in the same manner as provided for the selection of engineers or architects under Section 2254.004, Government Code.

(e) A board using the construction manager-agent method shall procure, in accordance with applicable law and in any manner authorized by this chapter, a general contractor, trade contractors, or subcontractors who will serve as the prime contractor for their specific portion of the work.

(f) The board or the construction manager-agent shall procure in accordance with Section 2254.004, Government Code, all of the testing of construction materials engineering, the inspection services, and the verification testing services necessary for acceptance of the facility by the institution.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.765, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.782. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AT-RISK. (a) An institution may use the construction manager-at-risk method for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility. In using that method and in entering into a contract for the services of a construction manager-at-risk, a board shall follow the procedures prescribed by this section.

(b) A construction manager-at-risk is a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that assumes the risk for construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility at the contracted price as a general contractor and provides consultation to the institution regarding construction during and after the design of the facility.

(c) Before or concurrently with selecting a construction manager-at-risk, the board shall select or designate an engineer or architect who shall prepare the construction documents for the project and who has full responsibility for complying with Chapter 1001 or 1051, Occupations Code, as applicable. If the engineer or architect is not a full-time employee of the institution, the board shall select the engineer or architect on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications as provided by Section 2254.004, Government Code. The institution's engineer, architect, or construction manager-agent for a project may not serve, alone or in combination with another, as the construction manager-at-risk unless the engineer or architect is hired to serve as the construction manager-at-risk under a separate or concurrent procurement conducted in accordance with this subchapter. This subsection does not prohibit the institution's engineer or architect from providing customary construction phase services under the engineer's or architect's original professional service agreement in accordance with applicable licensing laws.

(d) The board shall provide or contract for, independently of the construction manager-at-risk, the inspection services, the testing of construction materials engineering, and the verification testing services necessary for acceptance of the facility by the institution. The board shall select those services for which it contracts in accordance with Section 2254.004, Government Code.

(e) The board shall select the construction manager-at-risk in either a one-step or two-step process. The board shall prepare a request for proposals, in the case of a one-step process, or a request for qualifications, in the case of a two-step process, that includes general information on the project site, project scope, schedule, selection criteria, estimated budget, and the time and place for receipt of proposals or qualifications, as applicable, a statement as to whether the selection process is a one-step or two-step process, and other information that may assist the board in its selection of a construction manager-at-risk. The board shall state the selection criteria in the request for proposals or qualifications, as applicable. The selection criteria may include the offeror's experience, past performance, safety record, proposed personnel and methodology, and other appropriate factors that demonstrate the capability of the construction manager-at-risk. If a one-step process is used, the board may request, as part of the offeror's proposal, proposed fees and prices for fulfilling the general conditions. If a two-step process is used, the board may not request fees or prices in step one. In step two, the board may request that five or fewer offerors, selected solely on the basis of qualifications, provide additional information, including the construction manager-at-risk's proposed fee and its price for fulfilling the general conditions.

(f) The board shall publish the request for qualifications in a manner prescribed by the board.

(g) At each step, the board shall receive, publicly open, and read aloud the names of the offerors. At the appropriate step, the board shall also read aloud the fees and prices, if any, stated in each proposal as the proposal is opened. Within 45 days after the date of opening the proposals, the board or its representative shall evaluate and rank each proposal submitted in relation to the criteria set forth in the request for proposals.

(h) The board or its representative shall select the offeror that submits the proposal that offers the best value for the institution based on the published selection criteria and on its ranking evaluation. The board or its representative shall first attempt to negotiate with the selected offeror a contract. If the board or its representative is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the selected offeror, the board or its representative shall, formally and in writing, end negotiations with that offeror and proceed to negotiate with the next offeror in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or negotiations with all ranked offerors end.

(i) A construction manager-at-risk shall publicly advertise, in the manner prescribed by the institution, and receive bids or proposals from trade contractors or subcontractors for the performance of all major elements of the work other than general conditions work. A construction manager-at-risk may seek to perform major elements of the work itself if the construction manager-at-risk submits its bid or proposal for that work in the same manner as all other trade contractors or subcontractors and if the board determines that the construction manager-at-risk's bid or proposal provides the best value for the institution. If no satisfactory bid or proposal for a major element of the work is received in the time allowed, the board may negotiate directly with the construction manager-at-risk for performance of that work. The board may negotiate directly with the manager-at-risk for the performance of minor elements of the work that are not included in major work packages.

(j) The construction manager-at-risk and the board or its representative shall review all trade contractor or subcontractor bids or proposals in a manner that does not disclose the contents of the bid or proposal during the selection process to a person not employed by the construction manager-at-risk, engineer, architect, or institution. All bids or proposals shall be made public after the award of the contract or within seven days after the date of final selection of bids and proposals, whichever is later.

(k) If the construction manager-at-risk reviews, evaluates, and recommends to the board a bid or proposal from a trade contractor or subcontractor but the board requires another bid or proposal to be accepted, the institution shall compensate the construction manager-at-risk by a change in price, time, or guaranteed maximum cost for any additional cost and risk that the construction manager-at-risk may incur because of the board's requirement that another bid or proposal be accepted.

(l) If a selected trade contractor or subcontractor defaults in the performance of its work or fails to execute a subcontract after being selected in accordance with this section, the construction manager-at-risk may, without advertising, itself fulfill the contract requirements or select a replacement trade contractor or subcontractor to fulfill the contract requirements.

(m) If a fixed contract amount or guaranteed maximum price has not been determined at the time the contract is awarded, the penal sums of the performance and payment bonds delivered to the institution must each be in an amount equal to the project budget, as set forth in the request for qualifications. The construction manager shall deliver the bonds not later than the 10th day after the date the construction manager executes the contract unless the construction manager furnishes a bid bond or other financial security acceptable to the institution to ensure that the construction manager will furnish the required performance and payment bonds when a guaranteed maximum price is established.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1229, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 4.01, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.766, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.783. SELECTING CONTRACTOR FOR CONSTRUCTION SERVICES THROUGH COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSALS. (a) In selecting a contractor for construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair services for a facility through competitive sealed proposals, a board shall follow the procedures prescribed by this section.

(b) The board shall select or designate an engineer or architect to prepare construction documents for the project. The selected or designated engineer or architect has full responsibility for complying with Chapter 1001 or 1051, Occupations Code, as applicable. If the engineer or architect is not a full-time employee of the institution, the board shall select the engineer or architect on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications as provided by Section 2254.004, Government Code.

(c) The board shall provide or contract for, independently of the contractor, the inspection services, the testing of construction materials engineering, and the verification testing services necessary for acceptance of the facility by the institution. The board shall select those services for which it contracts in accordance with Section 2254.004, Government Code, and shall identify them in the request for proposals.

(d) The board shall prepare a request for competitive sealed proposals that includes construction documents, selection criteria, estimated budget, project scope, schedule, and other information that contractors may require to respond to the request. The board shall state in the request for proposals the selection criteria that will be used in selecting the successful offeror.

(e) The board shall publish notice of the request for proposals in a manner prescribed by the board.

(f) The board shall receive, publicly open, and read aloud the names of the offerors and, if any are required to be stated, all prices stated in each proposal. Within 45 days after the date of opening the proposals the board shall evaluate and rank each proposal submitted in relation to the published selection criteria.

(g) The board shall select the offeror that offers the best value for the institution based on the published selection criteria and on its ranking evaluation. The board shall first attempt to negotiate with the selected offeror a contract. The board and its engineer or architect may discuss with the selected offeror options for a scope or time modification and any price change associated with the modification. If the board is unable to reach a contract with the selected offeror, the board shall, formally and in writing, end negotiations with that offeror and proceed to the next offeror in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or all proposals are rejected.

(h) In determining best value for the institution, the board is not restricted to considering price alone but may consider any other factor stated in the selection criteria.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.767, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.784. JOB ORDER CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION OR REPAIR. (a) An institution may award job order contracts for the minor construction, repair, rehabilitation, or alteration of a facility if the work is of a recurring nature but the delivery times are indefinite and indefinite quantities and orders are awarded substantially on the basis of predescribed and prepriced tasks.

(b) The institution may establish contractual unit prices for a job order contract by:

(1) specifying one or more published construction unit price books and the applicable divisions or line items; or

(2) providing a list of work items and requiring the offerors to bid or propose one or more coefficients or multipliers to be applied to the price book or work items as the price proposal.

(c) The board shall advertise for, receive, and publicly open sealed proposals for job order contracts.

(d) The board may require offerors to submit additional information besides rates, including experience, past performance, and proposed personnel and methodology.

(e) The board may award job order contracts to one or more job order contractors in connection with each solicitation of bids or proposals.

(f) An order for a job or project under the job order contract must be signed by the board's representative and the contractor. The order may be a fixed price, lump-sum contract based substantially on contractual unit pricing applied to estimated quantities or may be a unit price order based on the quantities and line items delivered.

(g) The contractor shall provide payment and performance bonds, if required by law, based on the amount or estimated amount of any order.

(h) The base term of a job order contract is for the period and with any renewal options that the institution sets forth in the request for proposals. If the institution fails to advertise that term, the base term may not exceed two years and is not renewable without further advertisement and solicitation of proposals.

(i) If a job order contract or an order issued under the contract requires engineering or architectural services that constitute the practice of engineering within the meaning of Chapter 1001, Occupations Code, or the practice of architecture within the meaning of Chapter 1051, Occupations Code, the board shall select or designate an architect or engineer to prepare the construction documents for the facility. If the architect or engineer is not a full-time employee of the institution, the board shall select the architect or engineer on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications as provided by Section 2254.004, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1179, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.768, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1213 (H.B. 1886), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 51.785. CERTAIN CONTRACTS PROHIBITED. The board of an institution may not enter into a contract with a person relating to a permanent improvement project at the institution under which the institution makes contractual payments to the person that are not reflected on the institution's financial statement unless the board:

(1) is specifically authorized to enter into the contract by other law; or

(2) receives prior approval by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 759 (H.B. 3291), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER U. UNIFORM ADMISSION POLICY

Sec. 51.801. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter, "general academic teaching institution," "governing board," "medical and dental unit," and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.802. UNIFORM ADMISSION SYSTEM. A general academic teaching institution shall admit first-time freshman students for each semester under the provisions of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.803. AUTOMATIC ADMISSION: ALL INSTITUTIONS. (a) Subject to Subsection (a-1), each general academic teaching institution shall admit an applicant for admission to the institution as an undergraduate student if the applicant graduated with a grade point average in the top 10 percent of the student's high school graduating class in one of the two school years preceding the academic year for which the applicant is applying for admission and:

(1) the applicant graduated from a public or private high school in this state accredited by a generally recognized accrediting organization or from a high school operated by the United States Department of Defense;

(2) the applicant:

(A) successfully completed:

(i) at a public high school, the curriculum requirements established under Section 28.025 for the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program; or

(ii) at a high school to which Section 28.025 does not apply, a curriculum that is equivalent in content and rigor to the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program; or

(B) satisfied ACT's College Readiness Benchmarks on the ACT assessment applicable to the applicant or earned on the SAT assessment a score of at least 1,500 out of 2,400 or the equivalent; and

(3) if the applicant graduated from a high school operated by the United States Department of Defense, the applicant is a Texas resident under Section 54.052 or is entitled to pay tuition fees at the rate provided for Texas residents under Section 54.241(d) for the term or semester to which admitted.

(a-1) Beginning with admissions for the 2011-2012 academic year, The University of Texas at Austin is not required to offer admission to applicants who qualify for automatic admission under Subsection (a) in excess of the number required to fill 75 percent of the university's enrollment capacity designated for first-time resident undergraduate students in an academic year. If the number of applicants who qualify for automatic admission to The University of Texas at Austin under Subsection (a) for an academic year exceeds 75 percent of the university's enrollment capacity designated for first-time resident undergraduate students for that academic year, the university may elect to offer admission to those applicants as provided by this subsection and not as otherwise required by Subsection (a). If the university elects to offer admission under this subsection, the university shall offer admission to those applicants by percentile rank according to high school graduating class standing based on grade point average, beginning with the top percentile rank, until the applicants qualified under Subsection (a) have been offered admission in the number estimated in good faith by the university as sufficient to fill 75 percent of the university's enrollment capacity designated for first-time resident undergraduate students, except that the university must offer admission to all applicants with the same percentile rank. After the applicants qualified for automatic admission under Subsection (a) have been offered admission under this subsection in the number estimated in good faith as sufficient to fill 75 percent of the designated enrollment capacity described by this subsection, the university shall consider any remaining applicants qualified for automatic admission under Subsection (a) in the same manner as other applicants for admission as first-time undergraduate students in accordance with Section 51.805.

(a-2) If the number of applicants who apply to a general academic teaching institution during the current academic year for admission in the next academic year and who qualify for automatic admission to a general academic teaching institution under Subsection (a) exceeds 75 percent of the institution's enrollment capacity designated for first-time resident undergraduate students for that next academic year and the institution plans to offer admission under Subsection (a-1) during the next school year, the institution shall, in the manner prescribed by the Texas Education Agency and not later than September 15, provide to each school district, for dissemination of the information to high school junior-level students and their parents, notice of which percentile ranks of high school senior-level students who qualify for automatic admission under Subsection (a) are anticipated by the institution to be offered admission under Subsection (a-1) during the next school year.

(a-3) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 776 , Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

(a-4) If The University of Texas at Austin elects to offer admission to first-time resident undergraduate students under Subsection (a-1) for an academic year, the university must continue its practice of not considering an applicant's legacy status as a factor in the university's decisions relating to admissions for that academic year.

(a-5) A general academic teaching institution that offers admission to first-time resident undergraduate students under Subsection (a-1) shall require that a student admitted under that subsection complete a designated portion of not less than six semester credit hours of the student's coursework during evening hours or other low-demand hours as necessary to ensure the efficient use of the institution's available classrooms.

(a-6) Not later than December 31 of each academic year in which The University of Texas at Austin offers admission under Subsection (a-1), the university shall deliver a written report to the governor, the lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives regarding the university's progress in each of the following matters:

(1) increasing geographic diversity of the entering freshman class;

(2) counseling and outreach efforts aimed at students qualified for automatic admission under this section;

(3) recruiting Texas residents who graduate from other institutions of higher education to the university's graduate and professional degree programs;

(4) recruiting students who are members of underrepresented demographic segments of the state's population; and

(5) assessing and improving the university's regional recruitment centers.

(b) An applicant who does not satisfy the curriculum requirements prescribed by Subsection (a)(2)(A)(i) or (ii) is considered to have satisfied those requirements if the student completed the portion of the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program curriculum or of the curriculum equivalent in content and rigor, as applicable, that was available to the student but was unable to complete the remainder of the curriculum solely because courses necessary to complete the remainder were unavailable to the student at the appropriate times in the student's high school career as a result of course scheduling, lack of enrollment capacity, or another cause not within the student's control.

(c) To qualify for admission under this section, an applicant must:

(1) submit an application before the expiration of any application filing deadline established by the institution; and

(2) provide a high school transcript or diploma that satisfies the requirements of Subsection (d).

(d) For purposes of Subsection (c)(2), a student's official transcript or diploma must, not later than the end of the student's junior year, indicate:

(1) whether the student has satisfied or is on schedule to satisfy the requirements of Subsection (a)(2)(A)(i) or (ii), as applicable; or

(2) if Subsection (b) applies to the student, whether the student has completed the portion of the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program curriculum or of the curriculum equivalent in content and rigor, as applicable, that was available to the student.

(e) Each institution of higher education shall admit an applicant for admission to the institution as an undergraduate student if the applicant:

(1) is the child of a public servant listed in Section 615.003, Government Code, who was killed or sustained a fatal injury in the line of duty; and

(2) meets the minimum requirements, if any, established for purposes of this subsection by the governing board of the institution for high school or prior college-level grade point average and performance on standardized tests.

(f) After admitting an applicant under this section, the institution shall review the applicant's record and any other factor the institution considers appropriate to determine whether the applicant may require additional preparation for college-level work or would benefit from inclusion in a retention program. The institution may require a student so identified to enroll during the summer immediately after the student is admitted under this section to participate in appropriate enrichment courses and orientation programs. This section does not prohibit a student who is not determined to need additional preparation for college-level work from enrolling, if the student chooses, during the summer immediately after the student is admitted under this section.

(g) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board by rule shall develop and implement a program to increase and enhance the efforts of general academic teaching institutions in conducting outreach to academically high-performing high school seniors in this state who are likely to be eligible for automatic admission under Subsection (a) to provide to those students information and counseling regarding the operation of this section and other opportunities, including financial assistance, available to those students for success at public institutions of higher education in this state. Under the program, the coordinating board, after gathering information and recommendations from available sources and examining current outreach practices by institutions in this state and in other states, shall prescribe best practices guidelines and standards to be used by general academic teaching institutions in conducting the student outreach described by this subsection.

(h) An institution that admits under this section an applicant qualified for automatic admission under Subsection (a) may admit the applicant for either the fall semester of the academic year for which the applicant applies or for the summer session preceding that fall semester, as determined by the institution.

(i) If a general academic teaching institution denies admission to an applicant for an academic year, in any letter or other communication the institution provides to the applicant notifying the applicant of that denial, the institution may not reference the provisions of this section, including using a description of a provision of this section such as the top 10 percent automatic admissions law, as a reason the institution is unable to offer admission to the applicant unless the number of applicants for admission to the institution for that academic year who qualify for automatic admission under Subsection (a) is sufficient to fill 100 percent of the institution's enrollment capacity designated for first-time resident undergraduate students.

(j) A general academic teaching institution that elects to offer admission under Subsection (a-1) for an academic year may not offer admission to first-time undergraduate students who are not residents of this state for that academic year in excess of the number required to fill 10 percent of the institution's enrollment capacity designated for first-time undergraduate students for that academic year.

(k) A general academic teaching institution may not offer admission under Subsection (a-1) for an academic year after the 2017-2018 academic year if, on the date of the institution's general deadline for applications for admission of first-time undergraduate students for that academic year:

(1) a final court order applicable to the institution prohibits the institution from considering an applicant's race or ethnicity as a factor in the institution's decisions relating to first-time undergraduate admissions; or

(2) the institution's governing board by rule, policy, or other manner has provided that an applicant's race or ethnicity may not be considered as a factor in the institution's decisions relating to first-time undergraduate admissions for that academic year.

(l) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall publish an annual report on the impact of Subsection (a-1) on the state's goal of closing college access and achievement gaps under "Closing the Gaps," the state's master plan for higher education, with respect to students of an institution that offers admission under that subsection, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, socioeconomic status, and geographic region and by whether the high school from which the student graduated was a small school, as defined by the commissioner of education, or a public high school that is ranked among the lowest 20 percent of public high schools according to the percentage of each high school's graduates who enroll in a four-year institution, including a general academic teaching institution, in one of the two academic years following the year of the applicant's high school graduation. On request, a general academic teaching institution that offers admission under Subsection (a-1) shall provide the board with any information the board considers necessary for the completion of the report required by this subsection.

(m) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the commissioner of education shall jointly adopt rules to establish eligibility requirements for admission under this section as to curriculum requirements for high school graduation under Subsection (a)(2)(A) for students participating under the recommended or advanced high school program so that the admission of those students is not affected by their participation in the recommended or advanced high school program. This subsection expires September 1, 2020.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 845, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 3826), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 175), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 4.008, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 64(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 959 (H.B. 1843), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 776 (H.B. 2472), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 51.8035. AUTOMATIC ADMISSION OF APPLICANTS COMPLETING CORE CURRICULUM AT ANOTHER INSTITUTION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Core curriculum" means the core curriculum adopted by an institution of higher education under Section 61.822.

(2) "General academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) A general academic teaching institution shall admit an applicant for admission to the institution as a transfer undergraduate student who:

(1) graduated from high school not earlier than the fourth school year before the academic year for which the applicant seeks admission to the institution as a transfer student and:

(A) qualified for automatic admission to a general academic teaching institution under Section 51.803 at the time of graduation; or

(B) was previously offered admission under this subchapter to the institution to which the applicant seeks admission as a transfer student;

(2) first enrolled in a public junior college or other public or private lower-division institution of higher education not earlier than the third academic year before the academic year for which the applicant seeks admission;

(3) completed the core curriculum at a public junior college or other public or private lower-division institution of higher education with a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.5 on a four-point scale or the equivalent; and

(4) submits a completed application for admission as a transfer student before the expiration of any application filing deadline established by the institution.

(c) For purposes of this section, transfer semester credit hours from a different institution of higher education and semester credit hours earned by examination shall be included in determining whether the person completed the core curriculum at an institution of higher education.

(d) It is the responsibility of the applicant for admission under this section to:

(1) expressly and clearly claim in the application entitlement to admission under this section; and

(2) timely provide to the general academic teaching institution the documentation required by the institution to determine the student's entitlement to admission under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 175), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.804. ADDITIONAL AUTOMATIC ADMISSIONS: SELECTED INSTITUTIONS. For each academic year, the governing board of each general academic teaching institution shall determine whether to adopt an admissions policy under which an applicant to the institution as a first-time freshman student, other than an applicant eligible for admission under Section 51.803, shall be admitted to the institution if the applicant:

(1) graduated from a public or private high school in this state accredited by a generally recognized accrediting organization with a grade point average in the top 25 percent of the applicant's high school graduating class; and

(2) satisfies the requirements of:

(A) Section 51.803(a)(2)(A) or 51.803(b), as applicable to the student, or Section 51.803 (a)(2)(B); and

(B) Sections 51.803(c)(2) and 51.803(d).

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 3826), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.8045. GRADUATES OF CERTAIN SPECIAL HIGH SCHOOL PROGRAMS. (a) For purposes of Sections 51.803 and 51.804 only, the governing body of a school district may treat a high school magnet program, academy, or other special program conducted by the school district at a high school attended by high school students who are not students of the special program as an independent high school with its own graduating class separate from the graduating class of other students attending the high school if:

(1) the special program was in operation in the 2000-2001 school year;

(2) the students of the special program are recruited, selected, or admitted from among the students residing in the attendance zones of not fewer than 10 regular high schools in the district, including the high school at which the special program is conducted;

(3) the students of the special program are selected or admitted independently of and identified as a student body separate from the other students of the high school;

(4) the students of the special program constitute not less than 35 percent of the total number of students in the graduating class at the high school at which the special program is conducted;

(5) the students of the special program have a curriculum different from that of the other students of the high school, even if students of the special program and other students of the high school attend some of the same classes; and

(6) a student graduating from the special program receives a high school diploma that includes a reference to the special program in describing the high school from which the student graduated.

(b) This section does not apply to the manner in which the members of a graduating class of the high school as a whole, including graduates of the special program, are ranked by grade point average for purposes other than admissions under Sections 51.803 and 51.804.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1024, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001.

Sec. 51.805. OTHER ADMISSIONS. (a) A graduating student who does not qualify for admission under Section 51.803 or 51.804 may apply to any general academic teaching institution if the student:

(1) successfully completed:

(A) at a public high school, the curriculum requirements established under Section 28.025 for the foundation high school program; or

(B) at a high school to which Section 28.025 does not apply, a curriculum that is equivalent in content and rigor to the foundation high school program; or

(2) satisfied ACT's College Readiness Benchmarks on the ACT assessment applicable to the applicant or earned on the SAT assessment a score of at least 1,500 out of 2,400 or the equivalent.

(b) The general academic teaching institution, after admitting students under Sections 51.803 and 51.804, shall admit other applicants for admission as undergraduate students. It is the intent of the legislature that all institutions of higher education pursue academic excellence by considering students' academic achievements in decisions related to admissions. Because of changing demographic trends, diversity, and population increases in the state, each general academic teaching institution shall also consider all of, any of, or a combination of the following socioeconomic indicators or factors in making first-time freshman admissions decisions:

(1) the applicant's academic record;

(2) the socioeconomic background of the applicant, including the percentage by which the applicant's family is above or below any recognized measure of poverty, the applicant's household income, and the applicant's parents' level of education;

(3) whether the applicant would be the first generation of the applicant's family to attend or graduate from an institution of higher education;

(4) whether the applicant has bilingual proficiency;

(5) the financial status of the applicant's school district;

(6) the performance level of the applicant's school as determined by the school accountability criteria used by the Texas Education Agency;

(7) the applicant's responsibilities while attending school, including whether the applicant has been employed, whether the applicant has helped to raise children, or other similar factors;

(8) the applicant's region of residence;

(9) whether the applicant is a resident of a rural or urban area or a resident of a central city or suburban area in the state;

(10) the applicant's performance on standardized tests;

(11) the applicant's performance on standardized tests in comparison with that of other students from similar socioeconomic backgrounds;

(12) whether the applicant attended any school while the school was under a court-ordered desegregation plan;

(13) the applicant's involvement in community activities;

(14) the applicant's extracurricular activities;

(15) the applicant's commitment to a particular field of study;

(16) the applicant's personal interview;

(17) the applicant's admission to a comparable accredited out-of-state institution; and

(18) any other consideration the institution considers necessary to accomplish the institution's stated mission.

(c) A general academic teaching institution may review other factors in making an admissions decision.

(d) Not later than one year before the date that applications for admission are first considered under this section, each general academic teaching institution shall publish in the institution's catalog a description of the factors considered by the institution in making admission decisions and shall make the information available to the public.

(e) This section does not apply to an institution that has an open enrollment policy, except that a student may apply to a general academic teaching institution that has an open enrollment policy only if the student satisfies the requirements described by Subsection (a).

(f) This section does not apply to Lamar State College--Orange or Lamar State College--Port Arthur as long as those institutions operate as two-year lower-division institutions of higher education.

(g) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the commissioner of education shall jointly adopt rules to establish eligibility requirements for admission under this section as to curriculum requirements for high school graduation under Subsection (a)(1) for students participating in the minimum, recommended, or advanced high school program so that the admission requirements for those students under this section are not more stringent than the admission requirements under this section for students participating in the foundation high school program. This subsection expires September 1, 2020.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 3826), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 449 (H.B. 2424), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 65(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Sec. 51.807. RULEMAKING. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules relating to the operation of admissions programs under this subchapter, including rules relating to the identification of eligible students.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, after consulting with the Texas Education Agency, by rule shall establish standards for determining for purposes of this subchapter:

(1) whether a private high school is accredited by a generally recognized accrediting organization; and

(2) whether a person completed a high school curriculum that is equivalent in content and rigor to the curriculum requirements established under Section 28.025 for the foundation high school program or the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 3826), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1369 (H.B. 3851), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Reenacted by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 62, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 66(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Sec. 51.808. APPLICATION OF ADMISSION CRITERIA TO OTHER PROGRAMS. (a) Each general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit that offers admissions to undergraduate transfer students or admissions to a graduate, postgraduate, or professional program shall adopt a written admission policy applicable to those programs.

(b) Each general academic teaching institution shall adopt a written admission policy to promote the admission of undergraduate transfer students to the institution. The policy must provide for outreach and recruiting efforts directed at junior colleges and other lower-division institutions of higher education and may include incentives to encourage transfer applications and to retain and promote transfer students.

(c) A policy adopted under this section shall be published in the institution's or unit's catalog and made available to the public.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1369 (H.B. 3851), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.809. SCHOLARSHIP AND FELLOWSHIP AWARDS. (a) A general academic teaching institution or a medical and dental unit that offers competitive scholarship or fellowship awards shall adopt a written policy describing the factors to be used by the institution or unit in making an award.

(b) A policy adopted under this section shall be published in the institution's or unit's catalog and shall be made available to the public in advance of any deadline for the submission of an application for a competitive scholarship or fellowship to which the policy applies.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 155, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.810. HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE PLANS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "Institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The institution of higher education in closest geographic proximity to a public high school in this state identified by the coordinating board for purposes of this section as substantially below the state average in the number of graduates who enroll in higher education institutions shall enter into an agreement with that high school to develop a plan to increase the number of students from that high school enrolling in higher education institutions. Under the plan, the institution shall:

(1) collaborate with the high school to:

(A) provide to prospective students information related to enrollment in an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, including admissions, testing, and financial aid information;

(B) assist those prospective students in completing applications and testing related to enrollment in those institutions, including admissions and financial aid applications, and fulfilling testing requirements; and

(C) target efforts to increase the number of Hispanic students and African American male students enrolled in higher education institutions; and

(2) actively engage with local school districts to provide access to rigorous, high-quality dual credit opportunities for qualified high school students as needed.

(c) An institution of higher education must include a plan developed by the institution under this section and the results of that plan in its annual report to the coordinating board under Section 51.4032.

(d) The coordinating board shall include in its annual "Closing the Gaps" higher education plan progress report a summary of the results of the plans developed and administered under this section.

(e) The coordinating board may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 2550), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER V. JOINT ADMISSION MEDICAL PROGRAM

Sec. 51.821. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Council" means the Joint Admission Medical Program Council established under this subchapter.

(2) "General academic teaching institution" means a four-year general academic teaching institution as defined by Section 61.003.

(3) "Private or independent institution of higher education" means an institution as defined by Section 61.003(15) that grants baccalaureate degrees and offers a program in premedical education.

(4) "Participating medical school" means each of the following entities:

(A) the medical school at The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston;

(B) the medical school at The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center;

(C) the medical school at The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio;

(D) the medical school at The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston;

(E) the medical school at the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center at Lubbock;

(F) the medical school at the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center at El Paso;

(G) the Baylor College of Medicine;

(H) the college of osteopathic medicine at the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth; and

(I) the medical school at The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center.

(5) "Participating student" means an eligible undergraduate student who is admitted to the program and who maintains eligibility for continued participation in the program. The term does not include a program alternate who participates in mentoring activities and receives other related counseling services under the program.

(6) "Program" means the Joint Admission Medical Program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 826 (S.B. 1728), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 65 (S.B. 120), Sec. 6, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.822. JOINT ADMISSION MEDICAL PROGRAM. The Joint Admission Medical Program is a program administered by the Joint Admission Medical Program Council to:

(1) provide services to support and encourage highly qualified, economically disadvantaged students pursuing a medical education;

(2) award undergraduate and graduate scholarships and summer stipends to those students; and

(3) guarantee the admission of those students to at least one participating medical school, subject to the conditions under Section 51.827 and under other provisions of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Sec. 51.823. COMPOSITION OF COUNCIL. (a) The participating medical schools shall jointly establish the Joint Admission Medical Program Council consisting of one faculty member employed by and representing each of the participating medical schools.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 826, Sec. 3(1), eff. June 19, 2009.

(c) The council shall select one of its members to serve as council chair for a term of two years.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 826 (S.B. 1728), Sec. 3(1), eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.824. COUNCIL DUTIES. (a) The council shall:

(1) recruit eligible undergraduate students for admission to the program;

(2) establish an application process for admitting eligible undergraduate students to the program;

(3) evaluate applications for admission to the program according to the procedures for selecting participating students under Subsection (b) and for selecting program alternates under Section 51.8245;

(4) monitor the implementation of the program;

(5) assist in developing services to support and encourage the pursuit of a medical education by participating students and program alternates;

(6) establish a process for participating students to:

(A) be matched to an internship program as described by Subsection (c);

(B) be matched to any required undergraduate mentoring program as described by Subsection (d);

(C) apply for admission to participating medical schools;

(D) be matched to a participating medical school as described by Subsection (e); and

(E) enroll in that school;

(7) award to participating students undergraduate scholarships and summer stipends, including a summer stipend for a student who is required to participate in an internship program in the summer immediately following the student's senior year;

(8) award graduate scholarships to participating students;

(9) enter into an agreement with each student admitted to the program, each program alternate, each participating medical school, and each general academic teaching institution or private or independent institution of higher education as required by this subchapter; and

(10) take any other action necessary to implement the program.

(b) From each general academic teaching institution, the council annually shall select for admission to the program two eligible undergraduate students who are enrolled as sophomores at that institution. From each private or independent institution of higher education, the council annually shall select for admission to the program one eligible undergraduate student who is enrolled as a sophomore at that institution. The council shall allocate the remaining program openings to participating institutions as the council determines to be appropriate. If there are insufficient program openings to accommodate two students from each general academic teaching institution and one student from each private or independent institution of higher education, as appropriate to achieve the purpose of this subchapter the council shall select for admission to the program eligible sophomore-level students who are enrolled in the participating institutions, with not more than 15 percent of the total program openings for any year to be allocated to eligible sophomore-level students who are enrolled at private or independent institutions of higher education.

(c) The council shall match each participating student with appropriate internship programs offered by participating medical schools during the summers immediately following the student's sophomore and junior years. A participating medical school to which a participating student is matched under Subsection (e) may require the student to participate in an internship program offered by the medical school during the summer immediately following the student's senior year.

(d) The council shall match each participating student and each program alternate with any appropriate undergraduate mentoring program required of the student or alternate by the council.

(e) During a participating student's senior year, the council shall match the student with an appropriate participating medical school as necessary to fill the percentage of enrollment capacity set aside by each medical school under the program. To the extent possible, the council shall accommodate the preferences of participating students regarding medical school placement. A participating medical school may not make an offer of admission to a participating student before the student is matched by the council to a medical school as described by this subsection.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 356 (S.B. 1247), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.8245. PROGRAM ALTERNATES. (a) The council shall establish procedures by which the council selects from the annual pool of applicants for the program an appropriate number of eligible undergraduate students to serve as program alternates until the beginning of their senior year. The council shall rank program alternates according to their qualifications for the program and, immediately on the termination of the participation of a student previously admitted to the program, shall select the highest ranking program alternate to be a participating student under the program. The council may not select a program alternate to be a participating student after the first day of the fall semester of the alternate's senior year.

(b) The council shall establish procedures for program alternates to be matched to any required undergraduate mentoring program as described by Section 51.824(d). A program alternate selected under this section is limited to participating in mentoring activities and receiving other related counseling services under the program and must sign an agreement to that effect.

(c) The council shall adopt criteria for program alternates to maintain their eligibility as program alternates.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 51.8246. CONFIDENTIAL RECORDS AND PROCEEDINGS. (a) Student education records created or considered under the program are confidential and may be released only in accordance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g).

(b) A meeting or portion of a meeting of the council at which the education records or other personal information of individual students or the evaluation, eligibility, admission, or selection of individual students are discussed is not open to the public under Chapter 551, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 51.825. COUNCIL DELEGATION. The council may delegate the performance of the council's administrative functions, including its matching functions, to the Texas Medical and Dental Schools Application Service operated through The University of Texas System.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Sec. 51.826. ELIGIBILITY FOR ADMISSION TO PROGRAM.

(a) To be eligible for admission to the program or for selection as a program alternate, an undergraduate student must:

(1) be enrolled at a general academic teaching institution or a private or independent institution of higher education at the time of application to the program;

(2) be a Texas resident for purposes of tuition under Subchapter B, Chapter 54;

(3) except as provided by Subsection (c), successfully complete at least 27 semester credit hours during the student's freshman year;

(4) apply for admission to the program not later than a date, as designated by the council, that occurs during the fall semester of the student's sophomore year at the general academic teaching institution or the private or independent institution of higher education; and

(5) meet criteria established by the council regarding:

(A) minimum high school and undergraduate grade point averages;

(B) financial need and any other indication of economic disadvantage; and

(C) any other matter the council considers appropriate.

(b) For purposes of Subsection (a)(3), a student is not a Texas resident as described by that subdivision solely because the student is eligible to pay tuition at the resident tuition rate.

(c) The council shall adopt rules to admit to the program or to select as a program alternate an otherwise eligible undergraduate student who, for good cause, has not successfully completed the number of semester credit hours required under Subsection (a)(4). The council may not admit to the program or select as a program alternate an undergraduate student who has successfully completed fewer than 18 semester credit hours.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 356 (S.B. 1247), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 826 (S.B. 1728), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.8265. PREADMISSION MENTORING AND ASSISTANCE. (a) In order to maximize a student's potential for success in the program, the council shall identify students who may be eligible to participate in the program not later than the beginning of the first fall semester following the student's graduation from high school.

(b) If the student is enrolled at a general academic teaching institution or a private or independent institution of higher education, an identified student who expresses an interest in participating in the program is entitled to the following assistance during the student's freshman year:

(1) regular meetings with a program faculty director or an academic or health professions advisor to monitor the student's academic progress and advise the student in academic course work and career choices; and

(2) tutoring in courses as necessary, to be paid with program funds.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 826, Sec. 3(2), eff. June 19, 2009.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 356 (S.B. 1247), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 826 (S.B. 1728), Sec. 3(2), eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.827. ELIGIBILITY TO CONTINUE PARTICIPATION IN PROGRAM. (a) To be eligible to continue participation in the program, an undergraduate student who is admitted to the program must:

(1) meet criteria established by the council regarding:

(A) courses taken and minimum grade point average for those courses during enrollment at the general academic teaching institution or the private or independent institution of higher education;

(B) progress in those courses;

(C) achievement of an acceptable score on the Medical College Admission Test or any equivalent examination taken as a precondition for enrollment in or admission to a participating medical school; and

(D) any other matter the council considers appropriate;

(2) participate in:

(A) internship programs described by Section 51.824(c) in:

(i) the summers immediately following the student's sophomore and junior years; and

(ii) if required, the summer immediately following the student's senior year; and

(B) any undergraduate or graduate mentoring program required by the council; and

(3) exhibit intelligence, integrity, and personal and emotional characteristics that are considered necessary for the student to become an effective physician.

(b) If an undergraduate student who is admitted to the program fails to meet the requirements of Subsection (a) without good cause as determined by the council, the council may terminate that student's participation in the program at the end of the semester during which the student failed to meet the requirements of that subsection. A student's participation in the program is automatically terminated if the student fails to meet the requirements of Subsection (a) for two consecutive semesters without good cause.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 356 (S.B. 1247), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 51.828. COUNCIL AGREEMENT WITH STUDENT ADMITTED TO PROGRAM. (a) A student admitted to the program must enter into an agreement with the council under which the student agrees to:

(1) maintain eligibility for continued participation in the program; and

(2) repay any scholarship or stipend received under the program if the student enrolls in a public or private medical school in another state, other than temporary enrollment occurring as a result of an exchange program.

(b) At the time the student enters into an agreement under this section, the council shall provide the student with information regarding:

(1) available program benefits, including undergraduate and graduate scholarships and summer stipends; and

(2) repayment of scholarship and stipend benefits received under the program.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Sec. 51.829. COUNCIL AGREEMENT WITH PARTICIPATING MEDICAL SCHOOL. (a) Each participating medical school must enter into an agreement with the council under which the medical school agrees to:

(1) select a faculty member employed by the medical school to serve on the council;

(2) commit faculty and administrative resources to the program;

(3) set aside for participating students at least 10 percent of the medical school's enrollment capacity for each entering class, except as provided by Subsection (b);

(4) admit participating students who are matched to the medical school under the program;

(5) provide internship programs for participating students who have been matched to or are required to participate in those programs as described by Section 51.824(c) and coordinate the administration of those programs with general academic teaching institutions or private or independent institutions of higher education as necessary;

(6) provide for participating students and program alternates any mentoring programs required by the council at the undergraduate level and coordinate the administration of those programs with general academic teaching institutions or private or independent institutions of higher education as necessary; and

(7) provide support services, including postbaccalaureate mentoring programs required by the council, to participating students who enroll in the medical school.

(b) The Baylor College of Medicine must agree under Subsection (a) to set aside under Subsection (a)(3) not less than 10 percent of its enrollment capacity set aside for students who are entitled to pay tuition at the rate provided by Chapter 54 for resident students.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 5, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.830. COUNCIL AGREEMENT WITH GENERAL ACADEMIC TEACHING INSTITUTION. Each general academic teaching institution must enter into an agreement with the council under which the institution agrees to:

(1) provide academic counseling to a participating student or program alternate enrolled at that institution;

(2) as soon as practicable, implement or expand appropriate degree programs as necessary to provide participating students with sufficient preparation for enrollment in participating medical schools; and

(3) select a faculty director or an academic or health professions advisor to assist in implementing the program at the institution and in implementing or expanding the institution's degree programs as necessary under Subdivision (2).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 6, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.831. COUNCIL AGREEMENT WITH PRIVATE OR INDEPENDENT INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION. Each private or independent institution of higher education must enter into an agreement with the council under which the institution agrees to:

(1) provide academic counseling to a participating student or program alternate enrolled at the institution;

(2) as soon as practicable, implement or expand appropriate degree programs as necessary to provide participating students with sufficient preparation for enrollment in participating medical schools;

(3) select a faculty director or an academic or health professions advisor to assist in implementing the program at the institution and in implementing or expanding the institution's degree programs as necessary under Subdivision (2); and

(4) provide a scholarship to a participating student in the amount required for a participating student attending a general academic teaching institution, but not to exceed the amount of tuition and fees that the student is charged.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 922, Sec. 7, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.833. FUNDING. (a) The council may accept a gift, grant, devise, or bequest of money, securities, service, or property to carry out any purpose of this subchapter, including funds raised or services provided by a volunteer or volunteer group to promote the work of the council. The council's administrative staff may participate in the establishment and operation of an affiliated nonprofit organization whose purpose is to raise funds for or provide services or other benefits to the council.

(b) The legislature may appropriate money for the purposes of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (S.B. 1601), Sec. 7, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.834. REPORT. (a) The council shall deliver a report on the program to the governor, the lieutenant governor, and the speaker of the house of representatives not later than December 31 of each even-numbered year.

(b) The report must contain detailed information regarding:

(1) any problems the council identifies in implementing the program, with recommended solutions for those problems;

(2) the expenditure of any money received under this subchapter, including legislative appropriations; and

(3) the number of students who are admitted to the program and who are enrolled in each year of a baccalaureate, graduate, or professional degree program offered by a general academic teaching institution, a private or independent institution of higher education, or a participating medical school, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER W. ADMISSION AND SCHOLARSHIP POLICIES FOR GRADUATE AND PROFESSIONAL PROGRAMS

Sec. 51.841. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "General academic teaching institution" and "medical and dental unit" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Graduate program" means a degree program, as defined by Section 61.003, to which a student may be admitted that leads to a master's or doctoral degree.

(3) "Professional program" means a degree program, as defined by Section 61.003, to which a student may be admitted that leads to a degree required for licensure as an attorney, doctor of medicine or osteopathy, dentist, architect, or pharmacist.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1039, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.821 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(25), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.842. ADMISSION AND SCHOLARSHIP FACTORS FOR GRADUATE AND PROFESSIONAL PROGRAMS. (a) A graduate or professional program of a general academic teaching institution or medical or dental unit may consider the following factors in making an admissions or scholarship decision for admissions into or competitive scholarships for the graduate or professional program:

(1) an applicant's academic record as a high school student and undergraduate student;

(2) the socioeconomic background of the applicant while the applicant attended elementary and secondary school and was an undergraduate student, including any change in that background;

(3) whether the applicant would be the first generation of the applicant's family to attend or graduate from an undergraduate program or from a graduate or professional program;

(4) whether the applicant has multilingual proficiency;

(5) the applicant's responsibilities while attending elementary and secondary school and as an undergraduate student, including whether the applicant was employed, whether the applicant helped to raise children, and other similar factors;

(6) to achieve geographic diversity, the applicant's region of residence at the time of application and, if the applicant graduated from a public high school in this state within the preceding 20 years, the region in which the applicant's school district is located;

(7) the applicant's involvement in community activities;

(8) the applicant's demonstrated commitment to a particular field of study;

(9) for admission into a professional program, the current comparative availability of members of that profession in the applicant's region of residence while the applicant attended elementary and secondary school;

(10) whether the applicant was automatically admitted to a general academic teaching institution as an undergraduate student under Section 51.803; and

(11) the applicant's personal interview.

(b) An applicant's performance on a standardized test may not be used in the admissions or competitive scholarship process for a graduate or professional program as the sole criterion for consideration of the applicant or as the primary criterion to end consideration of the applicant. If an applicant's performance on a standardized test is used in the admissions or competitive scholarship process, the applicant's performance must also be used to compare the applicant's test score with those of other applicants from similar socioeconomic backgrounds to the extent that those backgrounds can be properly determined and identified by the general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit based on information provided in the institution's or unit's admissions or competitive scholarship process. This subsection does not apply to a standardized test used to measure the English language proficiency of a student who is a graduate of a foreign institution of higher education.

(c) A general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit may not assign a specific weight to any one factor being considered in the admissions or competitive scholarship process for a graduate or professional program.

(d) Not later than one year before the date that applications for admissions and competitive scholarships are first considered for a graduate or professional program under this subchapter, each general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit shall publish in the catalog of the institution or unit a description of the factors to be considered by the institution or unit in making those admissions and competitive scholarship decisions and shall make the information available to the public.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (d), if compliance with requirements of an accrediting agency effectively prevent a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit from timely publishing the factors to be considered in admissions decisions, the institution may delay publication of the factors, but shall publish the factors as soon as practicable when compliance with accrediting agency requirements permits.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1039, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.822 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(25), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 129 (S.B. 2031), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 51.843. RULEMAKING. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules relating to the operation of admissions and competitive scholarship processes under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1039, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.823 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(25), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.844. READMISSION OF CERTAIN MILITARY PERSONNEL TO GRADUATE AND PROFESSIONAL PROGRAMS. (a) This section applies only to a person who:

(1) was previously offered admission to, or was enrolled in, a graduate program or professional program at a general academic teaching institution or medical and dental unit;

(2) did not initially enroll in the program, or withdrew from the program, as applicable, because of the person's deployment as a member of the armed forces of the United States serving on active duty for the purpose of engaging in a combative military operation outside the United States; and

(3) seeks readmission to the program following the person's military deployment under Subdivision (2).

(b) A general academic teaching institution or a medical and dental unit must, regardless of the time since the person was initially offered admission to, or withdrew from, the program, as applicable:

(1) readmit a person to whom this section applies to the applicable graduate or professional program;

(2) apply credit toward the program for any course work previously completed by the person under the program; and

(3) accept a standardized test score previously submitted by that person for admission to the program.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1194 (S.B. 1159), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER Y. WOMENS ATHLETIC DEVELOPMENT FUND

Sec. 51.871. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Board" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Fund" means the women's athletic development fund established under this subchapter.

(3) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1513, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.831 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(27), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.872. ADMINISTRATION OF FUND. The women's athletic development fund is a fund in the state treasury. The board shall administer the fund.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1513, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.832 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(27), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.873. USE OF FUND. The board shall allocate money in the fund to institutions of higher education to support women's athletic development programs that are operated by the institution on a collaborative basis with one or more public high schools in this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1513, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.833 Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(27), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.874. CRITERIA IN SELECTING PROGRAMS. In selecting programs to be supported with money from the fund, the board shall give priority to programs addressing the needs of public high school students whose economic conditions limit their access to athletic facilities, programs, and opportunities. The board shall also consider other relevant factors, including whether a program:

(1) promotes gender equality; and

(2) includes the participation of collegiate-level coaches and athletes, to the extent the participation is allowed by the rules of the national intercollegiate athletic association of which the institution of higher education operating the program is a member.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1513, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.834 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(27), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.875. FUNDING. The board may use any available revenue, including legislative appropriations, and may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from a public or private source for the purposes of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1513, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.835 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(27), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER Y-1. MAINTENANCE, STORAGE, ADMINISTRATION, AND DISPOSAL OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS

Sec. 51.881. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Advisory committee" means the committee established under Section 38.202.

(2) "Anaphylaxis" means a sudden, severe, and potentially life-threatening allergic reaction that occurs when a person is exposed to an allergen.

(3) "Campus" means an educational unit under the management and control of an institution of higher education and may include, in addition to the main campus, off-campus and secondary locations, such as branch campuses, teaching locations, and regional centers.

(4) "Epinephrine auto-injector" means a disposable medical drug delivery device that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is intended to be used to treat anaphylaxis.

(5) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(6) "Personnel" means employees of an institution of higher education.

(7) "Physician" means a person who holds a license to practice medicine in this state.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.882. MAINTENANCE, STORAGE, ADMINISTRATION, AND DISPOSAL OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS. (a) Each institution of higher education may adopt and implement a policy regarding the maintenance, storage, administration, and disposal of epinephrine auto-injectors on the institution's campus.

(b) If a policy is adopted under Subsection (a), the policy:

(1) must provide that personnel or volunteers who are authorized and trained may administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a person who is reasonably believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis on the institution's campus; and

(2) may provide that personnel or volunteers who are authorized and trained may administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a person who is reasonably believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis at an off-campus event or while in transit to or from an off-campus event sponsored by the institution of higher education.

(c) The commissioner of state health services with advice from the advisory committee shall adopt rules regarding the maintenance, storage, administration, and disposal of an epinephrine auto-injector on the campus of an institution of higher education subject to a policy adopted under Subsection (a). The rules must establish:

(1) the number of epinephrine auto-injectors available at each campus;

(2) the process for each institution of higher education to check the inventory of epinephrine auto-injectors at regular intervals for expiration and replacement; and

(3) the amount of training required for personnel or volunteers to administer an epinephrine auto-injector.

(d) Each institution of higher education that adopts a policy under Subsection (a) must require that the institution's campuses have personnel or volunteers authorized and trained to administer an epinephrine auto-injector present.

(e) The supply of epinephrine auto-injectors at a campus must be stored in a secure location and be easily accessible to personnel or volunteers authorized and trained to administer an epinephrine auto-injector.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.883. REPORT ON ADMINISTERING EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTOR. (a) Not later than the 10th business day after the date a personnel member or volunteer administers an epinephrine auto-injector in accordance with a policy adopted under Section 51.882(a), the institution of higher education shall report the information required under Subsection (b) to:

(1) the physician who prescribed the epinephrine auto-injector; and

(2) the commissioner of state health services.

(b) The report required under this section must include the following information:

(1) the age of the person who received the administration of the epinephrine auto-injector;

(2) whether the person who received the administration of the epinephrine auto-injector was a student, a personnel member, or a visitor;

(3) the physical location where the epinephrine auto-injector was administered;

(4) the number of doses of epinephrine auto-injector administered;

(5) the title of the person who administered the epinephrine auto-injector; and

(6) any other information required by the commissioner of state health services.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.884. TRAINING. (a) Each institution of higher education that adopts a policy under Section 51.882(a) is responsible for training personnel or volunteers in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector.

(b) Training required under this section must:

(1) include information on:

(A) recognizing the signs and symptoms of anaphylaxis;

(B) administering an epinephrine auto-injector;

(C) implementing emergency procedures, if necessary, after administering an epinephrine auto-injector; and

(D) properly disposing of used or expired epinephrine auto-injectors; and

(2) be provided in a formal training session or through online education and be completed annually.

(c) Each institution of higher education that adopts a policy under Section 51.882(a) shall maintain records on the training required under this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.885. PRESCRIPTION OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS. (a) A physician may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors in the name of an institution of higher education that adopts a policy under Section 51.882(a). The physician shall provide the institution with a standing order for the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector to a person reasonably believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis.

(b) The standing order under Subsection (a) is not required to be patient-specific, and the epinephrine auto-injector may be administered to a person without an established physician-patient relationship.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, supervision or delegation by a physician is considered adequate if the physician:

(1) periodically reviews the order; and

(2) is available through direct telecommunication as needed for consultation, assistance, and direction.

(d) An order issued under this section must contain:

(1) the name and signature of the prescribing physician;

(2) the name of the institution of higher education to which the order is issued;

(3) the quantity of epinephrine auto-injectors to be obtained and maintained under the order; and

(4) the date of issue.

(e) A pharmacist may dispense an epinephrine auto-injector to an institution of higher education without requiring the name or any other identifying information relating to the user.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.886. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. An institution of higher education may accept gifts, grants, donations, and federal funds to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.887. RULES. Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, the commissioner of state health services shall adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.888. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. (a) A person who in good faith takes, or fails to take, any action under this subchapter is immune from civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action resulting from that act or failure to act, including:

(1) issuing an order for epinephrine auto-injectors;

(2) supervising or delegating the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector;

(3) possessing an epinephrine auto-injector;

(4) maintaining an epinephrine auto-injector;

(5) storing an epinephrine auto-injector;

(6) disposing of an epinephrine auto-injector;

(7) prescribing an epinephrine auto-injector;

(8) dispensing an epinephrine auto-injector;

(9) administering, or assisting in administering, an epinephrine auto-injector;

(10) providing, or assisting in providing, training, consultation, or advice in the development, adoption, or implementation of policies, guidelines, rules, or plans; or

(11) undertaking any other act permitted or required under this subchapter.

(b) The immunity provided by Subsection (a) is in addition to other immunity or limitations of liability provided by law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this subchapter does not create a civil, criminal, or administrative cause of action or liability or create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that provides the basis for a cause of action for an act or omission under this subchapter.

(d) An institution of higher education or a campus of an institution of higher education is immune from suit resulting from an act, or failure to act, under this subchapter, including an act or failure to act under related policies and procedures.

(e) A cause of action does not arise from an act or omission described by this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 51.901. LIABILITY INSURANCE FOR OPERATORS OF ATOMIC ENERGY REACTORS. (a) The governing boards of the state institutions of higher education, as state agencies, which are or will be constructing and operating atomic energy reactors, or otherwise performing experiments in the field of nuclear science, in cooperation with and licensed by the Atomic Energy Commission, or its successor in function, or any other governmental agency, may purchase liability insurance in any amount not to exceed $250,000, and may pay the premium from funds appropriated for that purpose.

(b) The defense of sovereign immunity shall not be available to or asserted by the insurer in any claim against it or in any cause of action arising or growing out of a nuclear incident.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.902. CONTRACTS FOR TEACHER TRAINING. The governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education which trains teachers may contract with the trustees of any independent school district for the use of the public schools of the school district as laboratory schools for the training of teachers. The available local funds of the institution or the local funds of the school district may be used in the performance of the contracts.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 51.903. ARCHIVES; CERTIFIED COPIES. (a) The commissioners court of any county or any other custodian of public records may lend to the library of any state-supported institution of higher education, for any period and on any conditions it may determine, any parts of its archives or records that have become mainly of historical value. The librarian shall give a receipt for any archives or records received. The librarian may make copies for historical study.

(b) The librarian and the archivist of any state-supported institution of higher education are authorized to make certified copies of public records in the custody of the institution. These certified copies are valid in law and have the same force and effect for all purposes as if certified by the county clerk or other custodian as otherwise provided by law. In making a certified copy, the librarian or archivist shall certify that the foregoing is a true and correct copy of the document, and after signing the certificate shall swear to it before any officer authorized to take oaths under the laws of this state.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the authority of the Texas State Librarian concerning public records as currently or later granted by law.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Text of section as added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 11

Sec. 51.904. STREET CLOSING. The governing body of an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 in a county having a population in excess of 3.3 million may vacate, abandon, and close a street or alley running through the campus if the institution owns all of the real property abutting the street or alley and if the institution owns 20 or more acres of real property at the campus where the street or alley is located.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3338, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 597, ch. 237, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 134, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1088, Sec. 1

Sec. 51.904. STREET CLOSING. The governing board of an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 in a county having a population of more than 3 million may vacate, abandon, and close a street or alley running through the campus if the institution:

(1) owns all of the real property abutting the street or alley;

(2) owns 20 or more acres of real property at the campus where the street or alley is located;

(3) before the 45th day preceding the date the street or alley is to close, provides to the governing body of the political subdivision owning, controlling, or maintaining the street or alley written notice of the institution's intent to close the street or alley; and

(4) for each utility line or facility in the affected street or alley that is owned by a governing body described by Subdivision (3) or a franchised utility company:

(A) grants an easement of sufficient size and configuration and with appropriate rights to enable the continued use, operation, and maintenance of the line or facility; or

(B) moves the line or facility to another location:

(i) on the approval of the appropriate governing body and franchised utility company; and

(ii) at the sole expense of the institution.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3338, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 597, ch. 237, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 134, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1088, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.9045. LIMITATION ON USE OF EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Lodging facility" does not include a dormitory or other student housing facility.

(b) The governing board of an institution of higher education may not use the power of eminent domain to acquire land to be used for a lodging facility or for parking or a parking structure intended to be used in connection with the use of a lodging facility.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 7), Sec. 5, eff. November 18, 2005.

Sec. 51.905. STATE-OWNED MUSEUM BUILDINGS. (a) The governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education commonly referred to as a senior college shall formulate and adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the use of a state-owned museum building located on its campus, including the designation of rooms or areas in honor of donors or other benefactors, if appropriate, and shall administer the expenditure of all state funds appropriated for construction, equipment, operation, maintenance, or improvement of such museum, including restoration or refurbishing of collections.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1251, ch. 474, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

(c) State funds appropriated for construction, equipment, operation, maintenance, or improvement of a museum located on a college or university campus referred to in Subsection (a) of this section which are used or expended conjunctively with funds belonging to a historical society or group incorporated as a nonprofit organization are subject to audit by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321, Government Code, including all accounts, books, and other financial records of the state government and the nonprofit corporation pertaining to the expenditure of funds which have been used or expended jointly for constructing, equipping, operating, maintaining, or improving such museum. The state auditor shall prepare a written report or reports of such audit or audits to the Legislative Audit Committee and the governing board of the state-supported institution of higher education.

(d) No employee of a museum located on a campus referred to in Subsection (a) of this section, who is paid in whole or in part by state funds may be employed or discharged except with the approval and consent of the governing board of the state-supported institution on which campus the museum is located.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3361, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1251, ch. 474, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 95, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 51.906. SEQUENTIAL EDUCATION PLANNING FOR NURSING EDUCATION. The governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education which provides a nursing education program shall plan and incorporate into the program standards and sequential procedures which will recognize and grant credit for actual educational and clinical experiences in the nursing field which are equivalent to regular course content. The board may require students to pass examinations demonstrating competence based on educational and clinical experiences before granting academic credit.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1912, ch. 615, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 51.907. LIMITATIONS ON NUMBER OF COURSES THAT MAY BE DROPPED UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. (a) In this section, "governing board" and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) This section applies only to an undergraduate student who drops a course at an institution of higher education and only if:

(1) the student was able to drop the course without receiving a grade or incurring an academic penalty;

(2) the student's transcript indicates or will indicate that the student was enrolled in the course; and

(3) the student is not dropping the course in order to withdraw from the institution.

(c) Except as provided under rules adopted under Subsection (d), an institution of higher education may not permit a student to drop more than six courses, including any course a transfer student has dropped at another institution of higher education, under circumstances described by Subsection (b).

(d) The governing board of an institution of higher education may adopt a policy under which the maximum number of courses a student is permitted to drop under circumstances described by Subsection (b) is less than the maximum number of courses that a student may drop under Subsection (c).

(e) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt rules under which an institution of higher education shall permit a student to drop more courses under circumstances described by Subsection (b) than the number of courses permitted to be dropped under Subsection (c) or under a policy adopted under Subsection (d) if the student shows good cause for dropping more than that number, including a showing of:

(1) a severe illness or other debilitating condition that affects the student's ability to satisfactorily complete a course;

(2) the student's responsibility for the care of a sick, injured, or needy person if the provision of care affects the student's ability to satisfactorily complete a course;

(3) the death of a person who:

(A) is considered to be a member of the student's family under a rule adopted under this subsection for purposes of this subdivision; or

(B) is otherwise considered to have a sufficiently close relationship to the student under a rule adopted under this subsection that the person's death is considered to be a showing of good cause; or

(4) the active duty service as a member of the Texas National Guard or the armed forces of the United States of:

(A) the student; or

(B) a person who is considered to be a member of the student's family under a rule adopted under this subsection for purposes of this subdivision.

(e-1) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt rules under which an institution of higher education shall permit a student to drop one additional course under circumstances described by Subsection (b) than the number of courses permitted to be dropped under Subsection (c) or under a policy adopted under Subsection (d) if the student:

(1) has reenrolled at the institution following a break in enrollment from the institution or another institution of higher education covering the 24-month period preceding the first class day of the initial semester or other academic term of the student's reenrollment; and

(2) successfully completed at least 50 semester credit hours of course work at an institution of higher education before that break in enrollment.

(f) In determining the number of courses dropped by a student for purposes of this section, a course, such as a laboratory or discussion course, in which a student is enrolled concurrently with a lecture course is not considered to be a course separate from the lecture course if:

(1) concurrent enrollment in both courses is required; and

(2) in dropping the lecture course, the student would be required to drop the laboratory, discussion, or other course in which the student is concurrently enrolled.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 546 (S.B. 1231), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (S.B. 1782), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 51.908. FACULTY COMPENSATION POLICIES. (a) The governing board of each institution of higher education shall establish faculty compensation policies that, to the greatest extent possible, provide the faculty of the institution with an average salary and benefits at least equal to the average of that provided by similar institutions nationwide having a similar role and mission.

(b) The coordinating board shall include information relating to national average salary and benefits, and correlating that information to Texas schools having a similar role and mission, in the master plan for higher education and in the appropriate reports to the legislature.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.10, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 51.909. EXPULSION OF CERTAIN FOREIGN STUDENTS. (a) The governing board of a public institution of higher education may expel from that institution any student who is a citizen of a country other than the United States attending the institution under a nonimmigrant visa issued by the Immigration and Naturalization Service and who is finally convicted of an offense under Section 28.03, 28.04, 42.02, 42.03, or 42.05, Penal Code, or under Section 4.30 of this code.

(b) In this section, a person is finally convicted if the conviction has not been reversed on appeal and all appeals, if any, have been exhausted.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1258, ch. 595, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 1979. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 51.9091. REQUIRED NOTIFICATION OF FEDERAL STUDENT AND EXCHANGE VISITOR INFORMATION SYSTEM (SEVIS) REGARDING WITHDRAWAL OR NONATTENDANCE OF CERTAIN FOREIGN STUDENTS. A public institution of higher education that is certified by the United States secretary of homeland security to enroll a foreign student admitted into the United States under a nonimmigrant F or M visa shall promptly notify the federal Student and Exchange Visitor Information System (SEVIS) or a successor program if:

(1) a student enrolled under an F or M visa withdraws from the institution or withdraws from all courses in which the student is enrolled; or

(2) the institution dismisses a student enrolled under an F or M visa for nonattendance or takes any other official administrative action in regard to the student as a result of the student's nonattendance.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 646 (S.B. 1009), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 51.9095. STUDENT COMPLIANCE WITH SELECTIVE SERVICE REGISTRATION. (a) An individual may not receive a loan, grant, scholarship, or other financial assistance funded by state revenue, including federal funds or gifts and grants accepted by this state, or receive a student loan guaranteed by this state or the Texas Guaranteed Student Loan Corporation, unless the individual files a statement of the individual's selective service status with the institution or other entity granting or guaranteeing the financial assistance as required by this section.

(b) If an individual required by this section to file a statement of the individual's selective service status files a statement indicating that the individual is registered with the selective service system as required by federal law, the individual is not required to file a statement of the individual's selective service status the next time the individual makes an application to the same entity for financial assistance or a student loan guarantee. If an individual required by this section to file a statement of the individual's selective service status files a statement indicating that the individual is not required to register with the selective service system, the institution or other entity shall require the individual to file a new statement of the individual's selective service status the next time the individual makes an application to the entity for financial assistance or a student loan guarantee.

(c) This section does not apply to:

(1) a female individual if females are not subject to general selective service registration under federal law; or

(2) an individual older than the maximum age at which an individual is required to be registered with the selective service system under federal law.

(d) The statement of an individual's selective service status required by this section must require the individual to certify that the individual:

(1) has registered with the selective service system as required by federal law; or

(2) is exempt from selective service registration under federal law.

(e) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt rules for the administration of this section and shall prescribe the statement to be used under this section. The coordinating board shall notify each institution of higher education of the required statement and the applicable rules. The statement must require an individual claiming to be exempt from registration to specify the basis of the exemption. The coordinating board may require an individual filing a statement of selective service status to include with the statement any additional information or documentation the coordinating board determines appropriate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 881, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.910. INTERVIEWS FOR HISTORICAL PURPOSES AND COLLECTIONS OF RARE BOOKS, ORIGINAL MANUSCRIPTS, PERSONAL PAPERS, UNPUBLISHED LETTERS, AND AUDIO AND VIDEO TAPES. (a) An oral interview that is obtained for historical purposes by an agreement of confidentiality between an interviewee and a state institution of higher education is not public information. The interview becomes public information when the conditions of the agreement of confidentiality have been met.

(b) Rare books, original manuscripts, personal papers, unpublished letters, and audio and video tapes held by an institution of higher education for the purposes of historical research are confidential, and the institution may restrict access by the public to those materials to protect the actual or potential value of the materials and the privacy of the donors.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 2814, ch. 482, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1983. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 408, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 51.911. RELIGIOUS HOLY DAYS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Subdivision (7) of Section 61.003 of this code, but includes the Southwest Collegiate Institute for the Deaf and Texas State Technical Institute.

(2) "Religious holy day" means a holy day observed by a religion whose places of worship are exempt from property taxation under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

(b) An institution of higher education shall excuse a student from attending classes or other required activities, including examinations, for the observance of a religious holy day, including travel for that purpose. A student whose absence is excused under this subsection may not be penalized for that absence and shall be allowed to take an examination or complete an assignment from which the student is excused within a reasonable time after the absence.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 218, Sec. 2.

(d) A student who is excused under this section may not be penalized for the absence, but the instructor may appropriately respond if the student fails to satisfactorily complete the assignment or examination.

(e) The Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, shall adopt rules for the implementation of this section and shall disseminate the rules to the appropriate institutions under its jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 503, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 218, Sec. 1, 2, eff. June 18, 2003.

Sec. 51.9111. EXCUSED ABSENCE FOR ACTIVE MILITARY SERVICE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Active military service" includes active military service performed by a member of the Texas National Guard or the Texas State Guard.

(b) This section applies only if:

(1) a student enrolled in an institution of higher education fails to attend classes or engage in other required activities because the student is called to active military service that is of a reasonably brief duration, as determined by rule adopted under Subsection (d); and

(2) the student chooses not to withdraw as authorized by Section 54.006(f).

(c) An institution of higher education shall excuse a student from attending classes or engaging in other required activities, including examinations, in order for the student to participate in active military service to which the student is called, including travel associated with the service. A student whose absence is excused under this subsection may not be penalized for that absence and shall be allowed to complete an assignment or take an examination from which the student is excused within a reasonable time after the absence. An instructor may appropriately respond if the student fails to satisfactorily complete the assignment or examination within a reasonable time after the absence.

(d) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in consultation with institutions of higher education, shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this section. The rules must establish a maximum period for which a student may be excused under this section. In establishing that period, the board shall consider the maximum period a student may be absent without significantly interfering with the student's ability to learn the course material, complete course assignments, and succeed academically during the applicable semester or other academic period.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 583 (H.B. 1630), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 51.9112. RESERVE OFFICERS' TRAINING CORPS (ROTC) PROGRAM: FEES AND COURSE CREDIT. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in consultation with institutions of higher education, shall determine a standard fee for a course offered through a Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) program that takes into account the average statewide cost per student to an institution of higher education in providing the program, not including any reimbursement or other amounts the institution receives from the applicable military service or other source for offering the course. Except as provided by Subsection (b), the governing board of each institution of higher education may not charge a student enrolled in an ROTC course any amount for the course in excess of the fee as determined by the coordinating board under this subsection.

(b) If the governing board of an institution of higher education offers course credit toward a student's degree for a course in which the student enrolls for the purposes of an ROTC program, the governing board may charge the student tuition for that course as otherwise provided by Chapter 54 after subtracting any reimbursement or other amount the institution receives from the applicable military service or other source for offering the course.

(c) To the extent it will not adversely affect the accreditation status of an institution of higher education with the appropriate accrediting agency, the governing board of the institution shall count courses in which a student enrolls for the purposes of an ROTC program, including courses for which the student does not receive course credit toward the student's degree, in determining whether the student is enrolled as a full-time student.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (H.B. 269), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.912. EQUITY OWNERSHIP; BUSINESS PARTICIPATION. (a) It is not a violation of Chapter 572, Government Code, or any other statute, rule, regulation, or the common law of the State of Texas for:

(1) an employee of a university system or an institution of higher education as defined in Section 61.003 of this code, who conceives, creates, discovers, invents, or develops intellectual property, to own or to be awarded any amount of equity interest or participation in, or, if approved by the institutional governing board, to serve as a member of the board of directors or other governing board or an officer or an employee of, a business entity that has an agreement with the state or a political subdivision of the state relating to the research, development, licensing, or exploitation of that intellectual property; or

(2) an individual, at the request and on behalf of a university system or an institution of higher education as defined in Section 61.003 of this code, to serve as a member of the board of directors or other governing board of a business entity that has an agreement with the state or a political subdivision of the state relating to the research, development, licensing, or exploitation of intellectual property in which the university system or institution of higher education has an ownership interest.

(b) An employee or individual covered by Subsection (a) of this section must report to the appropriate person or persons at the system or institution at which the person is employed or on behalf of which the person is serving the name of such business entity in which the person has an interest or for which the person serves as a director, officer, or employee.

(c) The governing board of each system and institution shall include in the appropriate annual report required by Section 51.005 the information that is provided to it under Subsection (b) of this section during the preceding fiscal year.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 845, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(38), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 51.913. EXECUTIVE SEARCH COMMITTEES. (a) As used in this section, the term "executive search committee" shall mean a committee formed by an act of a board of regents of an institution of higher education, which has as its primary purpose the evaluation and assessment of candidates and nominees for the position of chief executive officer of a system administration, institution of higher education, or other agency of higher education as defined in Section 61.003 of this code.

(b) The board of regents shall announce the name, background, and qualifications of any individual it selects and employs by use of such a committee. Additionally, public notice of the name or names of the finalist or finalists being considered by the search committee must be made public record at least 21 days prior to the meeting at which final action or vote is to be taken on the employment of the individual.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1252, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 51.914. PROTECTION OF CERTAIN INFORMATION. (a) In order to protect the actual or potential value, the following information is confidential and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or otherwise:

(1) all information relating to a product, device, or process, the application or use of such a product, device, or process, and all technological and scientific information (including computer programs) developed in whole or in part at a state institution of higher education, regardless of whether patentable or capable of being registered under copyright or trademark laws, that have a potential for being sold, traded, or licensed for a fee;

(2) any information relating to a product, device, or process, the application or use of such product, device, or process, and any technological and scientific information (including computer programs) that is the proprietary information of a person, partnership, corporation, or federal agency that has been disclosed to an institution of higher education solely for the purposes of a written research contract or grant that contains a provision prohibiting the institution of higher education from disclosing such proprietary information to third persons or parties; or

(3) the plans, specifications, blueprints, and designs, including related proprietary information, of a scientific research and development facility that is jointly financed by the federal government and a local government or state agency, including an institution of higher education, if the facility is designed and built for the purposes of promoting scientific research and development and increasing the economic development and diversification of this state.

(b) Information maintained by or for an institution of higher education that would reveal the institution's plans or negotiations for commercialization or a proposed research agreement, contract, or grant, or that consists of unpublished research or data that may be commercialized, is not subject to Chapter 552, Government Code, unless the information has been published, is patented, or is otherwise subject to an executed license, sponsored research agreement, or research contract or grant. In this subsection, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 818, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1985. Renumbered from Sec. 51.911 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(13), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(90), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6.04, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.915. ACADEMIES OF MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE. (a) On approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, a public senior college or university, as defined by Section 61.003 of this code, may establish an academy of mathematics and science as provided by Subchapter H, Chapter 105, of this code as a division of the institution.

(b) An institution may pay the expenses of an academy established under this section by:

(1) using available funds or entering into contracts and accepting grants or matching grants for the purpose of establishing an academy; and

(2) accepting federal funds or money from any corporation or other private contributor for use in operating or providing programs to the academy.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1131, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Renumbered from Sec. 51.912 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(14), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 51.917. FACULTY MEMBERS; USE OF ENGLISH. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code, but does not include a medical or dental unit.

(2) "Faculty member" means a person who teaches a course offered for academic credit by an institution of higher education, including teaching assistants, instructors, lab assistants, research assistants, lecturers, assistant professors, associate professors, and full professors.

(3) "Governing board" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

(b) The governing board of each institution of higher education shall establish a program or a short course the purpose of which is to:

(1) assist faculty members whose primary language is not English to become proficient in the use of English; and

(2) ensure that courses offered for credit at the institution are taught in the English language and that all faculty members are proficient in the use of the English language, as determined by a satisfactory grade on the "Test of Spoken English" of the Educational Testing Service or a similar test approved by the board.

(c) A faculty member may use a foreign language to conduct foreign language courses designed to be taught in a foreign language.

(d) This section does not prohibit a faculty member from providing individual assistance during course instruction to a non-English-speaking student in the native language of the student.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(15), eff. June 17, 2011.

(f) The cost of such English proficiency course as determined by the coordinating board shall be paid by the faculty member lacking proficiency in English. A faculty member must take the course until deemed proficient in English by his or her supervisor. The cost will be deducted from said faculty member's salary.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 975, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(15), eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.918. RURAL HEALTH; FAMILY PRACTICE RESIDENCY PROGRAM. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the Texas Department of Rural Affairs, medical schools, nursing schools, and schools of allied health sciences shall cooperate to improve and expand programs for rural areas.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall:

(1) encourage and coordinate the creation or expansion of a rural preceptor program among medical schools, teaching hospitals, nursing schools, and schools of allied health sciences; and

(2) require family practice residency programs to provide an opportunity for residents to have a one-month rotation through:

(A) a rural setting; and

(B) a public health setting.

(c) The Texas Department of Rural Affairs shall develop relief service programs for rural physicians and allied health personnel to facilitate ready access to continuing medical education as well as to provide practice coverage for purposes other than continuing medical education.

(d) Each medical school shall:

(1) incorporate a clerkship in family practice during the third core clinical year; and

(2) report to the legislature and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board on its efforts to fulfill the intent of Chapter 58, Education Code, of having at least 25 percent of their first year primary care residents in family practice.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1027, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 51.917 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(20), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 349, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 965, Sec. 11, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 787, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1424, Sec. 5, 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (H.B. 1918), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 51.919. HIV AND AIDS POLICY; INFORMATION DISSEMINATION. (a) In this section:

(1) "AIDS" means acquired immune deficiency syndrome as defined by the Centers for Disease Control of the United States Public Health Service.

(2) "HIV" means human immunodeficiency virus.

(3) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

(b) Each institution of higher education shall make available the institution's policy on HIV infection and AIDS to students, faculty, and staff members by including the policy in the student handbook and personnel handbook if practicable or by any other method.

(c) Each institution of higher education shall make available to students, on request, the educational pamphlet on HIV infection developed by the Texas Department of Health and shall include in the student handbook a statement that the pamphlet is available from the institution.

(d) The student health center of each institution of higher education shall provide clear, accurate information on how to prevent the transmission of HIV infection, including:

(1) the value of abstinence and long-term mutual monogamy;

(2) information on the efficacy and use of condoms;

(3) offering of or referring students, faculty, or staff members to anonymous HIV counseling and testing services; and

(4) state laws relating to the transmission and to conduct that may result in the transmission of HIV.

(e) The curricula of medical, dental, nursing, allied health, counseling, and social work degree programs of institutions of higher education shall:

(1) include information about:

(A) methods of transmission and methods of prevention of HIV infection; and

(B) federal and state laws, rules, and regulations concerning HIV infection and AIDS; and

(2) give special attention to the physical, emotional, and psychological stress associated with the care of patients with terminal illnesses.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1195, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 51.917 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(21), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 51.9191. BACTERIAL MENINGITIS INFORMATION FOR NEW STUDENTS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "New student" means a first-time student of an institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education and includes a student who transfers to the institution from another institution.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall prescribe procedures by which each institution of higher education shall provide information relating to bacterial meningitis to new students of the institution. The procedures must provide for the information to be provided in a brochure or other manner so that the information is reasonably likely to come to the attention of each student. The coordinating board shall prescribe the form and content of the information. The information must cover:

(1) the symptoms of the disease, how it may be diagnosed, and its possible consequences if untreated;

(2) how the disease is transmitted, how it may be prevented, and the relative risk of contracting the disease for students of institutions of higher education;

(3) the availability and effectiveness of vaccination against and treatment for the disease, including how students of the institution may seek vaccination or treatment and whether a vaccination is available from the student health center, and a brief description of the risks and possible side effects of vaccination; and

(4) sources of additional information regarding the disease and include the telephone numbers of the student health center, if there is a student health center, and the appropriate office of the Texas Department of Health.

(c) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall consult with the Texas Department of Health in prescribing the content of the information to be provided to students under this section. The coordinating board shall establish an advisory committee to assist the coordinating board in the initial implementation of this section. The advisory committee must include at least two members who are students at public or private institutions of higher education.

(d) An institution of higher education, with the written consent of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, may provide the information required by this section to new students of the institution by a method different from the method prescribed by the coordinating board under Subsection (b) if the coordinating board determines that method would be effective in bringing the information to the attention of all new students of the institution.

(e) Each institution of higher education shall make reasonable efforts to obtain from each new student of the institution a confirmation signed or acknowledged by the student that the student has received the information required to be provided to the student under this section and shall retain the confirmation for not less than two years after the student first enrolls at the institution.

(f) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the Texas Department of Health shall encourage private or independent institutions of higher education to provide the information prescribed by Subsection (b) to all new students of those institutions.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 219, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2001.

Sec. 51.9192. BACTERIAL MENINGITIS VACCINATION REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN STUDENTS; EXCEPTIONS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Health practitioner" means any person authorized by law to administer an immunization.

(2) "Institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) This section applies only to an entering student at an institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education. This section does not apply to a student of an institution who is enrolled only in online or other distance education courses or who is 22 years of age or older. For purposes of this subsection, "entering student" includes:

(1) a new student, as defined by Section 51.9191; and

(2) a student who previously attended an institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education before January 1, 2012, and who is enrolling in the same or another institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education following a break in enrollment of at least one fall or spring semester.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a student to whom this section applies or a parent or guardian of the student must provide to the institution, at the time and in the manner prescribed by rules adopted by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, a certificate signed by a health practitioner or an official immunization record evidencing that the student has received a bacterial meningitis vaccination dose or booster during the five-year period preceding the date established by the coordinating board under Subsection (e).

(d) A student to whom this section applies or a parent or guardian of the student is not required to comply with Subsection (c) if the student or a parent or guardian of the student submits to the institution:

(1) an affidavit or a certificate signed by a physician who is duly registered and licensed to practice medicine in the United States in which it is stated that, in the physician's opinion, the vaccination required would be injurious to the health and well-being of the student; or

(2) an affidavit signed by the student stating that the student declines the vaccination for bacterial meningitis for reasons of conscience, including a religious belief, or confirmation that the student has completed the Internet-based process described by Subsection (d-3) for declining the vaccination on that basis, if applicable to the student.

(d-1) The exemption provided by Subsection (d)(2) does not apply during a disaster or public health emergency, terrorist attack, hostile military or paramilitary action, or extraordinary law enforcement emergency declared by an appropriate official or other authority and in effect for the location of the institution the student attends.

(d-2) An affidavit submitted under Subsection (d)(2) must be:

(1) on a form described by Section 161.0041, Health and Safety Code; and

(2) submitted to the appropriate admitting official not later than the 90th day after the date the affidavit is notarized.

(d-3) The Department of State Health Services shall develop and implement a secure, Internet-based process to be used exclusively at those public junior colleges that elect to use the process to allow an entering student to apply online for an exemption from the vaccination requirement under this section for reasons of conscience. The online process portal must be designed to ensure that duplicate exemption requests are avoided to the greatest extent possible. The exemption form used by a student to claim an exemption under the process must contain a statement indicating that the student understands the benefits and risks of the immunization and the benefits and risks of not receiving the immunization.

(d-4) A public junior college may require an entering student to use the Internet-based process under Subsection (d-3) as the exclusive method to apply for an exemption from the vaccination required under this section for reasons of conscience.

(d-5) The Department of State Health Services shall report to the legislature annually the number of exemptions applied for in the preceding academic year using the Internet-based process under Subsection (d-3).

(d-6) An institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education shall provide, with the registration materials that the institution provides to a student to whom this section applies before the student's initial enrollment in the institution, written notice of the right of the student or of a parent or guardian of the student to claim an exemption from the vaccination requirement in the manner prescribed by Subsection (d) and of the importance of consulting a physician about the need for immunization to prevent the disease.

(e) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in consultation with institutions of higher education and private or independent institutions of higher education, shall adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules establishing the date by which a student who is required to comply with Subsection (c) must have received the vaccination required by that subsection, which may not be later than the 10th day before the first day of the semester or other term in which the student initially enrolls unless the student is granted an extension by the institution as provided by the rules adopted under this subsection. The rules must authorize an institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education to extend the compliance date for an individual student to a date that is not later than the 10th day after the first day of the semester or other term in which the student initially enrolls.

(f) In this section, "public junior college" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 4189), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 142 (S.B. 1107), Sec. 2, eff. May 27, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (S.B. 62), Sec. 1, eff. October 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.9193. REQUIRED POSTING OF MENTAL HEALTH RESOURCES. (a) In this section, "local mental health authority" has the meaning assigned by Section 531.002, Health and Safety Code.

(b) This section applies only to a general academic teaching institution, medical and dental unit, public junior college, public state college, or public technical institute as those terms are defined by Section 61.003.

(c) Each institution to which this section applies shall:

(1) create a web page on the institution's Internet website that:

(A) is dedicated solely to information regarding the mental health resources available to students at the institution, regardless of whether the resources are provided by the institution; and

(B) includes the address of the nearest local mental health authority; and

(2) maintain a conspicuous link on the institution's Internet website home page to the web page described by Subdivision (1).

(d) Not later than August 1 of each year, the president or the president's designee of an institution to which this section applies shall certify to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board the institution's compliance with this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 452 (H.B. 197), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 278 (H.B. 2895), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.9194. REQUIRED INFORMATION FOR ENTERING STUDENTS REGARDING MENTAL HEALTH AND SUICIDE PREVENTION SERVICES. (a) A general academic teaching institution shall provide to each entering full-time undergraduate, graduate, or professional student, including each full-time undergraduate, graduate, or professional student who transfers to the institution, information about:

(1) available mental health and suicide prevention services offered by the institution or by any associated organizations or programs; and

(2) early warning signs that are often present in and appropriate intervention for a person who may be considering suicide.

(b) The information required under this section:

(1) may be provided through:

(A) a live presentation; or

(B) a format that allows for student interaction, such as an online program or video; and

(2) may not be provided in a paper format only.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 961 (S.B. 1624), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.9195. INFORMATION FOR UNDERGRADUATE STUDENTS REGARDING BENEFITS OF TIMELY GRADUATION. (a) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" and "public state college" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) This section applies only to a general academic teaching institution other than a public state college.

(c) An institution to which this section applies shall provide to each first-time entering undergraduate student, including each undergraduate student who transfers to the institution, information in electronic or paper format that includes, based on a reasonable projection by the institution using the most recently available data:

(1) a comparison of the average total amounts of tuition and fees paid by a full-time student who graduates from the institution in the following number of academic years:

(A) four years;

(B) five years; and

(C) six years; and

(2) an estimate of the average earnings lost by a recent graduate of the institution as a result of graduating after five or six years instead of four years.

(d) An institution to which this section applies shall include with the information provided to a student under Subsection (c):

(1) a list of actions that the student can take to facilitate graduating from the institution in a timely manner; and

(2) contact information for available academic, career, and other related support services at the institution to assist the student in that effort.

(e) An institution to which this section applies may satisfy the requirements of Subsections (c)(1) and (2) with regard to a student by providing the student with information that is more specific than the information described by those subdivisions.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 801 (S.B. 1531), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.920. TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER. (a) Technology transfer can enhance the state's investment in research and development through the rapid commercialization of university research and the creation and expansion of Texas companies.

(b) The Center for Technology Development and Transfer established by Section 65.45 of this code, and the Technology Business Development Division of the Texas Engineering Experiment Station established by Section 88.300 of this code, shall cooperate fully to exercise their respective authorities to promote the timely and effective transfer of technology.

(c) Technology development programs operated by other state-supported institutions of higher education are encouraged to cooperate with the Center for Technology Development and Transfer and the Technology Business Development Division.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 792, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 51.9201. ALTERNATIVE TECHNOLOGY FOR COLONIAS. An institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 that has a program in the area of community, rural, or urban development shall create partnerships with governmental agencies and counties to implement programs, policies, and strategies to develop alternative technologies to assist colonias that have inadequate services or are without services, including water, wastewater, utility, transportation, housing, and public health care services.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 341 (S.B. 99), Sec. 11, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.921. POSTING OF STEROID LAW NOTICE. Each public institution of higher education shall post in a conspicuous location in each gymnasium at the institution the following notice:

Anabolic steroids and growth hormones are for medical use only. State law prohibits the possession, dispensing, delivery, or administering of an anabolic steroid or growth hormone in any manner not allowed by state law. State law provides that body building, muscle enhancement, or increasing muscle bulk or strength through the use of an anabolic steroid by a person who is in good health is not a valid medical purpose. Only a medical doctor may prescribe an anabolic steroid or human growth hormone for a person. A violation of state law concerning anabolic steroids or human growth hormones is a criminal offense punishable by confinement in jail or imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 403, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.051, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 51.922. MANDATORY RETIREMENT PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

(b) An institution of higher education may not impose a mandatory retirement age for tenured faculty of the institution.

(c) Imposition of a mandatory retirement age in violation of this section is an unlawful employment practice for purposes of Chapter 21, Labor Code. An individual aggrieved by the practice has the rights and remedies provided by that chapter, and the Commission on Human Rights has the same powers in regard to the complaint as any other complaint under that chapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1246, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 51.917 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(22), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.56, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 51.923. QUALIFICATIONS OF CERTAIN BUSINESS ENTITIES TO ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Business entity" means any entity recognized by law through which business is conducted, including a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, holding company, joint stock company, receivership, or trust.

(2) "Governing board" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(3) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(4) "Nonprofit corporation" means any organization exempt from federal income tax under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that does not distribute any part of its income to any member, director, or officer.

(b) A nonprofit corporation is not disqualified from entering into a contract or other transaction with an institution of higher education even though one or more members of the governing board of the institution of higher education also serves as a member, director, officer, or employee of the nonprofit corporation.

(c) A business entity is not disqualified from entering into a contract or other transaction with an institution of higher education even though one or more members of the governing board of the institution of higher education have an interest in the business entity, subject to Subsection (d).

(d) An institution of higher education is not prohibited from entering into a contract or other transaction with a business entity in which a member of the governing board of the institution of higher education has an interest if the interest is not a substantial interest or, if the interest is a substantial interest, the board member discloses that interest in a meeting held in compliance with Chapter 551, Government Code, and refrains from voting on the contract or transaction requiring board approval. Any such contract or transaction requiring board approval must be approved by an affirmative majority of the board members voting on the contract or transaction.

(e) For purposes of this section, a member of a governing board has a substantial interest in a business entity if:

(1) the member owns one percent or more of the voting stock or shares of the business entity or owns either one percent or more or $15,000 or more of the fair market value of the business entity;

(2) funds received by the member from the business entity exceed one percent of the member's gross income for the previous year;

(3) the member is an officer of the business entity or a member of the governing board of the business entity; or

(4) an individual related to the member in the first degree by consanguinity or affinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code, has an interest in the business entity as described by Subdivision (1), (2), or (3).

(f) A violation of this section does not render an action of the governing board voidable unless the contract or transaction that was the subject of the action would not have been approved by the governing board without the vote of the member who violated this section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 51.921 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(23), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(91), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 2.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 556 (S.B. 533), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 51.924. ASSESSMENT INSTRUMENTS USED FOR ADMISSION STANDARDS. Each company or organization that sponsors a college admissions testing program shall annually report to the Central Education Agency the performance in the testing program of students in this state and the program's state and national average standard score results. The company or organization shall report the performance of students by school district on the request of the Central Education Agency. In its determination of the admission of a student, an institution of higher education may not use the student's results on an assessment instrument administered by an organization that fails to comply with this section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1010, Sec. 3. Renumbered from Sec. 51.921 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(24), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 51.9241. ADMISSION OF STUDENT WITH NONTRADITIONAL SECONDARY EDUCATION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Nontraditional secondary education" means a course of study at the secondary school level in a nonaccredited private school setting, including a home school.

(b) Because the State of Texas considers successful completion of a nontraditional secondary education to be equivalent to graduation from a public high school, an institution of higher education must treat an applicant for admission to the institution as an undergraduate student who presents evidence that the person has successfully completed a nontraditional secondary education according to the same general standards, including specific standardized testing score requirements, as other applicants for undergraduate admission who have graduated from a public high school.

(c) An institution of higher education may not require an applicant for admission to the institution as an undergraduate student who presents evidence that the person has successfully completed a nontraditional secondary education to:

(1) obtain or submit evidence that the person has obtained a general education development certificate, certificate of high school equivalency, or other credentials equivalent to a public high school degree; or

(2) take an examination or comply with any other application or admission requirement not generally applicable to other applicants for undergraduate admission to the institution.

(d) If an institution of higher education in its undergraduate admission review process sorts applicants by high school graduating class rank, the institution shall place any applicant who presents evidence that the applicant has successfully completed a nontraditional secondary education that does not include a high school graduating class ranking at the average high school graduating class rank of undergraduate applicants to the institution who have equivalent standardized testing scores as the applicant.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 232, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1210 (S.B. 1543), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.9242. READMISSION OF STUDENT WHO WITHDRAWS TO PERFORM ACTIVE MILITARY SERVICE. (a) This section applies only to a student who withdraws from an institution of higher education to perform active military service as a member of the United States armed forces or the Texas National Guard, except that this section does not apply to a student who withdraws from an institution solely to perform one or more training exercises as a member of the Texas National Guard.

(b) For any academic term that begins after the date a student described by Subsection (a) is released from active military service but not later than the first anniversary of that date, the institution of higher education from which the student withdrew shall readmit the student, without requiring reapplication or charging a fee for readmission, if the student is otherwise eligible to register for classes at the institution. On readmission of the student under this subsection, the institution shall:

(1) provide to the student any financial assistance previously provided by the institution to the student before the student's withdrawal if the student meets current eligibility requirements for the assistance, other than any requirement directly affected by the student's service, such as continuous enrollment or another similar timing requirement; and

(2) allow the student the same academic status that the student had before the student's withdrawal, including any course credit awarded to the student by the institution.

(c) An institution of higher education may adopt rules requiring reasonable proof from a student of the fact and duration of the student's active military service.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 549 (H.B. 1170), Sec. 2(a), eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 51.9245. ADMISSION OF PERSON RECEIVING ATHLETIC SCHOLARSHIP. (a) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) A general academic teaching institution may not admit an applicant who has been promised or granted an athletic scholarship, grant, or similar financial assistance conditioned on the student's participation in a sport, game, or other competition involving substantial physical ability or physical skill for or on a team organized or sponsored by the general academic teaching institution that is funded by state funds unless:

(1) if the general academic teaching institution requires a minimum high school grade point average as an admissions criterion for any entering freshman, that minimum applies to all freshmen being admitted; or

(2) for an applicant other than an entering freshman, the applicant's cumulative college-level grade point average is equal to or greater than the minimum cumulative college-level grade point average required for an undergraduate student to remain enrolled at the institution in the preceding academic year.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1198, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.925. RELIGIOUS HOLY DAYS. (a) An institution of higher education may not discriminate against or penalize in any way a member of the faculty of the institution who is absent from work for the observance of a religious holy day and gives proper notice of that absence if the customary and generally applicable educational practices of the institution permit general personal absence by members of the faculty. If personal absence is customarily penalized, the penalty for absence due to observance of a religious holy day under this section shall be forfeiture of one day's pay equivalent for each day of absence.

(b) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Subdivision (7) of Section 61.003 of this code, except that the term includes the Southwest Collegiate Institute for the Deaf and Texas State Technical Institute.

(c) In this section, "proper notice" means that the faculty member shall provide a listing of religious holy days to be observed during the semester to the chairman of the department and shall provide notice of such days in advance to all students whose class would be canceled due to the faculty member's absence. Notice herein shall be in writing and shall be personally delivered to the chairman of the department, receipt therefor being acknowledged and dated by the chairman, or by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the chairman.

(d) In this section, "religious holy day" means a holy day observed by a religion whose places of worship are exempt from property taxation under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 520, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1985. Renumbered from Sec. 51.911 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(19), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 51.926. PAYROLL DEDUCTIONS FOR QUALIFIED RETIREMENT PLANS. (a) On written authorization from a football coach who is entitled to participate in a qualified football coaches plan, an institution of higher education may:

(1) enter into a salary reduction agreement under which the salary of the coach is reduced by the amount of contribution to the plan; and

(2) remit such contribution to the plan for credit to the coach's plan account.

(b) A person who participates in a qualified football coaches plan may also participate in another retirement plan or be a member of a retirement system established by law for employees of institutions of higher education.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

(2) "Qualified football coaches plan" means a retirement plan under Title 29 U.S.C. Section 1002(37)(F).

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 683, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 13, Sec. 24, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 51.927. ENERGY SAVINGS PERFORMANCE CONTRACTS.

(a) In this section, "energy savings performance contract" has the meaning assigned by Section 302.001, Local Government Code.

(b) The governing board of an institution of higher education may enter into an energy savings performance contract in accordance with this section.

(c) Each energy or water conservation measure must comply with current local, state, and federal construction, plumbing, and environmental codes and regulations. Notwithstanding Subsection (a), an energy savings performance contract may not include improvements or equipment that allow or cause water from any condensing, cooling, or industrial process or any system of nonpotable usage over which the public water supply system officials do not have sanitary control, to be returned to the potable water supply.

(d) The board may enter into energy savings performance contracts only with entities that are experienced in the design, implementation, and installation of the energy or water conservation measures addressed by the contract.

(e) Before entering into an energy savings performance contract, the board shall require the provider of the energy or water conservation measures to file with the board a payment and performance bond in accordance with Chapter 2253, Government Code. The board may also require a separate bond to cover the value of the guaranteed savings on the contract.

(f) The board may enter into an energy savings performance contract for a period of more than one year only if the board finds that the amount the institution would spend on the energy or water conservation measures will not exceed the amount to be saved in energy, water, wastewater, and operating costs over 20 years from the date of installation. If the term of the contract exceeds one year, the institution's contractual obligation in any year during the term of the contract beginning after the final date of installation may not exceed the total energy, water, wastewater, and operating cost savings, including electrical, gas, water, wastewater, or other utility cost savings and operating cost savings resulting from the measures, as determined by the board in this subsection, divided by the number of years in the contract term beginning after the final date of installation. The board shall consider all costs of the energy or water conservation measures, including costs of design, engineering, installation, maintenance, repairs, and debt service.

(g) An energy savings performance contract may be financed:

(1) under a lease/purchase contract that has a term not to exceed 20 years from the final date of installation and that meets federal tax requirements for tax-free municipal leasing or long-term financing, including a lease/purchase contract under the master equipment lease purchase program administered by the Texas Public Finance Authority under Chapter 1232, Government Code;

(2) with the proceeds of bonds; or

(3) under a contract with the provider of the energy or water conservation measures that has a term not to exceed the lesser of 20 years from the final date of installation or the average useful life of the energy or water conservation or usage measures.

(g-1) Notwithstanding other law, the board may use any available money to pay the provider of the energy or water conservation measures under this section, and the board is not required to pay for such costs solely out of the savings realized by the institution of higher education under an energy savings performance contract. The board may contract with the provider to perform work that is related to, connected with, or otherwise ancillary to the measures identified in the scope of an energy savings performance contract.

(h) An energy savings performance contract shall contain provisions requiring the provider of the energy or water conservation measures to guarantee the amount of the savings to be realized by the institution of higher education under the contract.

(i) An energy savings performance contract shall be let according to the procedures established for procuring certain professional services by Section 2254.004, Government Code. Notice of the request for qualifications shall be given in the manner provided by Section 2156.002, Government Code. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in consultation with the State Energy Conservation Office with regard to energy and water conservation measures, shall establish guidelines and an approval process for awarding energy savings performance contracts. The guidelines must require that the cost savings projected by an offeror be reviewed by a licensed professional engineer who has a minimum of three years of experience in energy calculation and review, is not an officer or employee of an offeror for the contract under review, and is not otherwise associated with the contract. In conducting the review, the engineer shall focus primarily on the proposed improvements from an engineering perspective, the methodology and calculations related to cost savings, increases in revenue, and, if applicable, efficiency or accuracy of metering equipment. An engineer who reviews a contract shall maintain the confidentiality of any proprietary information the engineer acquires while reviewing the contract. A contract is not required to be reviewed or approved by the State Energy Conservation Office. Sections 1001.053 and 1001.407, Occupations Code, apply to work performed under the contract.

(j) The legislature shall base an institution's appropriation for energy, water, and wastewater costs during a fiscal year on the sum of:

(1) the institution's estimated energy, water, and wastewater costs for that fiscal year; and

(2) if an energy savings performance contract is in effect, the institution's estimated net savings resulting from the contract during the contract term, divided by the number of years in the contract term.

(k) Chapter 2269, Government Code, does not apply to this section.

(l) The guidelines established under Subsection (i) must require the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board to:

(1) review any reports submitted to the board that measure and verify cost savings to an institution of higher education under an energy savings performance contract; and

(2) based on the reports, provide an analysis, on a periodic basis, of the cost savings under the energy savings performance contract to the governing board of the institution of higher education and the Legislative Budget Board until the governing board of the institution of higher education determines that the analysis is no longer required to accurately measure cost savings.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 3.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(92), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 773, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 17.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1142, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 4.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 361, Sec. 2, eff. Sept; 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1450, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; ; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 573, Sec. 3, 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1319, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 6, 121(2), eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 527 (S.B. 831), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 982 (H.B. 1728), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 3.02, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(7), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 537 (S.B. 533), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 258 (H.B. 1571), Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 2017.

Sec. 51.9271. ENERGY-EFFICIENT LIGHT BULBS IN EDUCATIONAL AND HOUSING FACILITIES. (a) In this section, "housing facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 53.02.

(b) An institution of higher education shall purchase for use in each type of light fixture in an educational or housing facility the commercially available model of light bulb that:

(1) is compatible with the light fixture;

(2) uses the fewest watts for the necessary luminous flux or light output; and

(3) is the most cost-effective, considering the factors described by Subdivisions (1) and (2).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 939 (H.B. 3693), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 51.928. WRITTEN CONTRACTS OR AGREEMENTS BETWEEN CERTAIN INSTITUTIONS. (a) In this section, "governing board" and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

(b) A written contract or agreement for the furnishing of resources or services that is between institutions of higher education with a common governing board is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 771, Government Code, if the governing board has adopted rules providing for governing board review and approval of those contracts.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 5.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 51.929. PROHIBITION AGAINST CERTAIN EXTENSIONS OF CREDIT BY CERTAIN RETAIL STORES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, a retail store that is owned or operated by an institution of higher education may not enter into a transaction for the sale or lease of goods or services in which the institution extends the credit of the state to the obligor.

(b) This section does not apply to an extension of credit to a student for the purchase of books or other educational supplies if the credit may be offset against undistributed grant or loan funds that are held by the institution for the student or that the institution is entitled to receive on behalf of the student. The institution may not withhold grant or loan funds to require the student to purchase books or educational supplies from a store that it owns or operates.

(c) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 15, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 51.930. NATIONAL STUDENT EXCHANGE PROGRAM. (a) In this section:

(1) "General academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

(2) "National student exchange program" means the program administered by the National Student Exchange, a nonprofit corporation.

(b) General academic teaching institutions may participate in the national student exchange program for the purpose of providing reciprocal educational opportunities for undergraduate students of colleges and universities in the United States.

(c) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules relating to the participation of institutions of higher education and students in the national student exchange program.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 54.051 of this code, a nonresident exchange student participating in the program may be charged the resident tuition rate during the period of participation in the program.

(e) A student participating in the program from another state shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 51.306 of this code unless that student becomes a degree-seeking undergraduate student at a Texas public institution of higher education.

(f) A student may not participate in the program for more than one year.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 228, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1993. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.929 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 17.01(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 51.931. RIGHT TO AN ACADEMIC FRESH START. (a) This section applies to any public institution of higher education as defined in Section 61.003 of this code.

(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a resident of this state is entitled to apply for admission to and enroll as an undergraduate student in any public institution of higher education under this section.

(c) If an applicant elects to seek admission under this section, a public institution of higher education, in considering the applicant for admission, shall not consider academic course credits or grades earned by the applicant 10 or more years prior to the starting date of the semester in which the applicant seeks to enroll. An applicant who makes the election to apply under this section and is admitted as a student may not receive any course credit for courses undertaken 10 or more years prior to enrollment under this section.

(d) If a student who enrolls under this section completes a prescribed course of study, earns a baccalaureate degree, and applies for admission to a postgraduate or professional program offered by a public institution of higher education, the institution, in considering the applicant for admission into the postgraduate or professional program, shall consider only the grade point average of the applicant established by the course work completed after enrollment under this section, along with any other criteria the institution uses in evaluating applicants for admission into the postgraduate or professional program.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits a public institution of higher education from applying standard admissions criteria generally applicable to persons seeking admission to the institution.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.929 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 17.01(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 51.932. MOTOR VEHICLES OWNED AND USED BY STATE-SUPPORTED INSTITUTIONS. (a) A motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that is the property of and used exclusively by any institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 must have the name of the institution printed on the side of the vehicle. The inscription must be in a color sufficiently different from the body of the vehicle and must be of letters of sufficient height so that the lettering is plainly legible at a distance of not less than 100 feet. This subsection does not apply to a motor vehicle used by:

(1) a peace officer commissioned under Subchapter E; or

(2) a chancellor or president of an institution of higher education.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person operates a vehicle subject to Subsection (a) without the proper inscription. An offense under this subsection is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 18, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 51.9325. RETIREMENT INCENTIVES. (a) A medical and dental unit may offer a retirement incentive to an employee of the unit who is eligible to retire under Subtitle C, Title 8, Government Code.

(b) A medical and dental unit offering a retirement incentive plan shall file the plan with the Legislative Budget Board not later than the 61st day before the date the plan is implemented and shall provide the board with any information concerning the plan required by the board.

(c) A medical and dental unit may not rehire an employee receiving a retirement incentive under this section without the specific approval of the president of the unit. The president may not delegate this responsibility to any other employee of the unit.

(d) A retirement incentive offered to an employee by a medical and dental unit under this section must be paid from institutional funds or hospital or clinic fees.

(e) A retirement incentive paid by a medical and dental unit to an employee is not subject to any provision of state law that entitles the employee to benefits based on salary or compensation, including contributions under Subtitle C, Title 8, Government Code.

(f) In this section:

(1) "Institutional funds" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.009(b).

(2) "Medical and dental unit" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 and includes a school of veterinary medicine and a health care facility operated by a medical and dental unit, except that the term does not include The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 736, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1995. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.932 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(20), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.933. IMMUNIZATION REQUIREMENTS; EXCEPTION. (a) An institution of higher education may require applicants for admission to be immunized against diphtheria, rubeola, rubella, mumps, tetanus, and poliomyelitis, except as provided in Subsection (d).

(b) The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission may require immunizations against the diseases listed in Subsection (a) and additional diseases for students at any institution of higher education who are pursuing a course of study in a human or animal health profession, and the executive commissioner may require those immunizations for any students in times of an emergency or epidemic in a county where the commissioner of state health services has declared such an emergency or epidemic.

(b-1) A rule adopted under Subsection (b) that requires a hepatitis B vaccination for students may apply only to students enrolled in a course of study that involves potential exposure to human or animal blood or bodily fluids.

(c) An institution of higher education, in conjunction with the Department of State Health Services, should provide individual notice to each student applying for admission regarding:

(1) the consequences of not being current on immunization for certain diseases;

(2) the age groups most vulnerable to these vaccine preventable diseases; and

(3) local providers of immunization services.

(d) No form of immunization is required for a person's admission to an institution of higher education if the person applying for admission:

(1) submits to the admitting official:

(A) an affidavit or a certificate signed by a physician who is duly registered and licensed to practice medicine within the United States in which it is stated that, in the physician's opinion, the immunization required poses a significant risk to the health and well-being of the applicant or any member of the applicant's family or household; or

(B) an affidavit signed by the applicant or, if a minor, by the applicant's parent or guardian stating that the applicant declines immunization for reasons of conscience, including a religious belief; or

(2) is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on active duty.

(d-1) An affidavit submitted under Section (d)(1)(B) must be on a form described by Section 161.0041, Health and Safety Code, and must be submitted to the admitting official not later than the 90th day after the date the affidavit is notarized.

(e) The exception provided by Subsection (d)(1)(B) does not apply in a time of emergency or epidemic declared by the commissioner of state health services.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 18, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.161, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 466 (S.B. 291), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 6.024, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.9335. ACQUISITION OF GOODS AND SERVICES. (a) An institution of higher education may acquire goods or services by the method that provides the best value to the institution, including:

(1) competitive bidding;

(2) competitive sealed proposals;

(3) a catalogue purchase;

(4) a group purchasing program; or

(5) an open market contract.

(b) In determining what is the best value to an institution of higher education, the institution shall consider:

(1) the purchase price;

(2) the reputation of the vendor and of the vendor's goods or services;

(3) the quality of the vendor's goods or services;

(4) the extent to which the goods or services meet the institution's needs;

(5) the vendor's past relationship with the institution;

(6) the impact on the ability of the institution to comply with laws and rules relating to historically underutilized businesses and to the procurement of goods and services from persons with disabilities;

(7) the total long-term cost to the institution of acquiring the vendor's goods or services;

(8) any other relevant factor that a private business entity would consider in selecting a vendor; and

(9) the use of material in construction or repair to real property that is not proprietary to a single vendor unless the institution provides written justification in the request for bids for use of the unique material specified.

(c) The state auditor may audit purchases of goods or services by an institution of higher education or by a component of an institution of higher education that purchases goods and services.

(d) Subject to Section 51.9337, Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code, and Subchapter B, Chapter 2254, Government Code, do not apply to the acquisition of goods and services under this section, except that an institution of higher education must comply with any provision of those laws, or a rule adopted under a provision of those laws, relating to contracting with historically underutilized businesses or relating to the procurement of goods and services from persons with disabilities. An institution of higher education may, but is not required to, acquire goods or services as provided by Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code.

(e) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 and includes a school of veterinary medicine and a health care facility operated by a medical and dental unit, except that the term does not include The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center or a public junior college.

(f) This section does not apply to professional services as defined by Section 2254.002, Government Code. Professional services shall be procured in accordance with Subchapter A, Chapter 2254, Government Code.

(g) An institution of higher education may adopt rules and procedures for the acquisition of goods or services.

(h) In any contract for the acquisition of goods and services to which an institution of higher education is a party, a provision required by applicable law to be included in the contract is considered to be a part of the executed contract without regard to:

(1) whether the provision appears on the face of the contract; or

(2) whether the contract includes any provision to the contrary.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 736, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1995. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.933 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(21), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 334, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1225, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 2.02, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.9336. ELECTRONIC AND DIGITAL SIGNATURES. (a) An institution of higher education or university system, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, shall determine whether, and the extent to which, the institution or system will send and accept electronic or digital signatures to and from other persons and otherwise create, generate, communicate, store, process, use, and rely on electronic or digital signatures. The institution or system may adopt rules and procedures governing the use of electronic or digital signatures.

(b) To the extent of any conflict, this section prevails over Chapter 322, Business & Commerce Code, and rules and guidelines adopted under that chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 2.03, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.9337. PURCHASING AUTHORITY CONDITIONAL; REQUIRED STANDARDS. (a) An institution of higher education may not exercise the acquisition authority granted by Section 51.9335 or 73.115 unless the institution complies with this section. An institution that is determined under Subsection (j) to not be in compliance with this section is subject to the laws governing acquisition of goods and services by state agencies, including Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code, and Chapter 2254, Government Code.

(b) The board of regents of an institution of higher education by rule shall establish for each institution under the management and control of the board:

(1) a code of ethics for the institution's officers and employees, including provisions governing officers and employees authorized to execute contracts for the institution or to exercise discretion in awarding contracts, subject to Subsection (c);

(2) policies for the internal investigation of suspected defalcation, misappropriation, and other fiscal irregularities and an institutional or systemwide compliance program designed to promote ethical behavior and ensure compliance with all applicable policies, laws, and rules governing higher education, including research and health care to the extent applicable;

(3) a contract management handbook that provides consistent contracting policies and practices and contract review procedures, including a risk analysis procedure, subject to Subsection (d);

(4) contracting delegation guidelines, subject to Subsections (e) and (f);

(5) training for officers and employees authorized to execute contracts for the institution or to exercise discretion in awarding contracts, including training in ethics, selection of appropriate procurement methods, and information resources purchasing technologies; and

(6) internal audit protocols, subject to Subsection (g).

(c) The code of ethics governing an institution of higher education must include:

(1) general standards of conduct and a statement that each officer or employee is expected to obey all federal, state, and local laws and is subject to disciplinary action for a violation of those laws;

(2) policies governing conflicts of interest, conflicts of commitment, and outside activities, ensuring that the primary responsibility of officers and employees is to accomplish the duties and responsibilities assigned to that position;

(3) a conflict of interest policy that prohibits employees from having a direct or indirect financial or other interest, engaging in a business transaction or professional activity, or incurring any obligation that is in substantial conflict with the proper discharge of the employee's duties related to the public interest;

(4) a conflict of commitment policy that prohibits an employee's activities outside the institution from interfering with the employee's duties and responsibilities to the institution;

(5) a policy governing an officer's or employee's outside activities, including compensated employment and board service, that clearly delineates the nature and amount of permissible outside activities and that includes processes for disclosing the outside activities and for obtaining and documenting institutional approval to perform the activities;

(6) a policy that prohibits an officer or employee from acting as an agent for another person in the negotiation of the terms of an agreement relating to the provision of money, services, or property to the institution;

(7) a policy governing the use of institutional resources; and

(8) a policy providing for the regular training of officers and employees on the policies described by this subsection.

(d) An institution of higher education shall establish contract review procedures and a contract review checklist that must be reviewed and approved by the institution's legal counsel before implementation. The review procedures and checklist must include:

(1) a description of each step of the procedure that an institution must use to evaluate and process contracts;

(2) a checklist that describes each process that must be completed before contract execution; and

(3) a value threshold that initiates the required review by the institution's legal counsel unless the contract is a standard contract previously approved by the counsel.

(e) An institution of higher education's policies governing contracting authority must clearly specify the types and values of contracts that must be approved by the board of regents and the types and values of contracts for which contracting authority is delegated by the board to the chief executive officer and by the chief executive officer to other officers and employees of the institution. An officer or employee may not execute a document for the board unless the officer or employee has authority to act for the board and the authority is exercised in compliance with applicable conditions and restrictions.

(f) An institution of higher education may not enter into a contract with a value of more than $1 million, including any amendment, extension, or renewal of the contract that increases the value of the original contract to more than $1 million, unless the institution's board of regents approves the contract, expressly delegates authority to exceed that amount, or expressly adopts an exception for that contract. The board must approve any amendment, extension, or renewal of a contract with a value that exceeds 25 percent of the value of the original contract approved by the board unless the authority to exceed the approved amount is expressly delegated by the board or an exception is expressly adopted by the board for that contract.

(g) The board of regents of an institution of higher education shall adopt standards for internal audits conducted by the institution to provide a systematic, disciplined approach to evaluate and improve the effectiveness of the institution's risk management, control, and governance processes related to contracts and to require risk-based testing of contract administration. The internal auditor must have full and unrestricted access to all institutional property, personnel, and records. An internal auditor must report directly to the board of regents in accordance with Chapter 2102, Government Code.

(h) The chief auditor of an institution of higher education shall annually assess whether the institution has adopted the rules and policies required by this section and shall submit a report of findings to the state auditor. In auditing the purchase of goods and services by the institution, the state auditor shall determine whether an institution has adopted the required rules and policies.

(i) If the state auditor determines that an institution of higher education has failed to adopt the required rules and policies, the auditor shall report that failure to the legislature and to the institution's board of regents and shall, in consultation with the institution, adopt a remediation plan to bring the institution into compliance. If the institution fails to comply within the time established by the state auditor, the auditor shall find the institution to be in noncompliance and report that finding to the legislature and comptroller.

(j) In accordance with a schedule adopted by the state auditor in consultation with the comptroller, the authority of an institution of higher education to acquire goods and services as provided by Section 51.9335 or 73.115 is suspended if the institution fails to comply with the remediation plan under Subsection (i) within the time established by the state auditor. As a result of the suspension, the laws, including Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code, and Chapter 2254, Government Code, governing acquisition of goods and services by state agencies from which the institution is otherwise exempt, shall apply to the institution's acquisition of goods and services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.934. ASSIGNMENT, TRANSFER, OR PLEDGE OF COMPENSATION. (a) In this section, "employee" means any person employed by an institution of higher education in an executive, administrative, or clerical capacity or as a professor or instructor or in any similar capacity.

(b) An employee's assignment, pledge, or transfer, as security for indebtedness, of any interest in or part of the employee's salary or wages then due or that may become due under an existing contract of employment is enforceable only:

(1) if, before or at the time of execution, delivery, or acceptance of an assignment, pledge, or transfer, written approval is obtained in accordance with the policy of the employing institution; and

(2) to the extent that the indebtedness it secures is a valid and enforceable obligation.

(c) An institution of higher education shall honor an assignment, pledge, or transfer fulfilling the conditions of Subsection (b) without incurring any liability to the employee executing the assignment, pledge, or transfer. Payment to any assignee, pledgee, or transferee in accordance with the terms of the instrument is payment to or for the account of the assignor, pledgor, or transferor. An assignment, pledge, or transfer is enforceable only to the extent of salary due or that may become due during continuation of the assignor's employment as an employee of the institution.

(d) Venue for any suit against the employer of an employee to enforce an assignment, pledge, or transfer of salary is in the county where the employing institution is located.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 18, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 51.935. DISRUPTIVE ACTIVITIES. (a) A person commits an offense if the person, alone or in concert with others, intentionally engages in disruptive activity on the campus or property of an institution of higher education.

(b) For purposes of this section, disruptive activity is activity described by Section 37.123(b).

(c) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(d) Any person who is convicted the third time of violating this section is ineligible to attend any institution of higher education receiving funds from this state before the second anniversary of the third conviction.

(e) This section may not be construed to infringe on any right of free speech or expression guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States or of this state.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 18, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 51.9355. ASSISTANCE RELATING TO UNDERGRADUATE ADMISSIONS, FINANCIAL AID, AND TESTING. (a) The governing board of each general academic teaching institution shall establish an office at the institution to assist applicants, potential applicants, school counselors at the high school level, and other interested persons requesting assistance relating to:

(1) applying for admission to a bachelor's degree program at the institution;

(2) applying for financial aid offered by or through the institution or by an office or agency of this state or the United States for attendance as an undergraduate student at the institution;

(3) registering for an examination to be taken in connection with admission to a bachelor's degree program at the institution; or

(4) registering for an examination that may be taken to receive undergraduate course credit at the institution or to determine the skill or placement level of an applicant to or student enrolled in a bachelor's degree program at the institution.

(b) The office may be operated in connection with the admissions office or another existing office of the institution.

(c) This section does not require an institution to assist a person in preparing to take an examination.

(d) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 474, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.935 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(22), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 35, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 51.9356. DESIGNATION OF LIAISON OFFICER TO ASSIST STUDENTS FORMERLY IN FOSTER CARE. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Each institution of higher education shall designate at least one employee of the institution to act as a liaison officer for current and incoming students at the institution who were formerly in the conservatorship of the Department of Family and Protective Services. The liaison officer shall provide to those students information regarding support services and other resources available to the students at the institution and any other relevant information to assist the students.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 822 (H.B. 3748), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 51.936. HAZING. (a) Subchapter F, Chapter 37, applies to a postsecondary educational institution under this section in the same manner as that subchapter applies to a public or private high school.

(b) For purposes of this section, "postsecondary educational institution" means:

(1) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003;

(2) a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003; or

(3) a private postsecondary educational institution as defined by Section 61.302.

(c) Each postsecondary educational institution shall distribute to each student during the first three weeks of each semester:

(1) a summary of the provisions of Subchapter F, Chapter 37; and

(2) a list of organizations that have been disciplined for hazing or convicted for hazing on or off the campus of the institution during the preceding three years.

(d) If the institution publishes a general catalogue, student handbook, or similar publication, it shall publish a summary of the provisions of Subchapter F, Chapter 37, in each edition of the publication.

(e) Section 1.001(a) does not limit the application of this section to postsecondary educational institutions supported in whole or in part by state tax funds.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 18, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 594 (H.B. 1791), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 51.9361. RISK MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS FOR MEMBERS AND ADVISORS OF STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Advisor" means a person who:

(A) serves in an advisory capacity to a student organization to provide guidance to the organization and its members;

(B) is older than 21 years of age; and

(C) is not a student of the postsecondary educational institution at which the student organization is registered.

(2) "Postsecondary educational institution" means:

(A) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, except that the term does not include a medical and dental unit or other agency of higher education as those terms are defined by that section; and

(B) a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, except that the term does not include:

(i) a health-related institution; or

(ii) an institution that offers only upper-division, graduate-level, or professional courses.

(b) This section applies only to a student organization that is registered at a postsecondary educational institution and that is composed mostly of students enrolled at the institution. Notwithstanding Section 1.001(a), this section applies to each postsecondary educational institution at which is registered one or more student organizations.

(c) At least once during each academic year, a postsecondary educational institution shall provide a risk management program for members of student organizations registered at the institution. Any member of a student organization who is not otherwise required to attend may attend the program.

(d) Unless a postsecondary educational institution requires each student organization registered at the institution to have representatives of the organization attend a program under this section, the institution shall adopt a policy that specifies one or more of those student organizations or types of student organizations that are required to have representatives attend. The selection of student organizations or types of student organizations under the policy must be based on the institution's determination that those organizations or types of organizations could particularly benefit from risk management guidance. Each advisor who has not previously attended a program under this section and each person serving in a designated officer position of a student organization that is required to have representatives attend a program under this section shall attend the program. An institution may allow an advisor, other than a faculty or staff member of the institution, to satisfy the attendance requirements prescribed by this subsection through completion of an appropriate computer-based risk assessment program.

(e) For purposes of Subsection (d), the institution may designate not more than four officer positions of a student organization, such as the president, membership chair, risk management chair, social chair, or pledge class or new member chair. If a student organization does not have an officer position described by this subsection or if an officer position described by Subsection (d) is vacant, the institution shall, to the extent practicable, identify and designate an equivalent officer position, and the person serving in that officer position shall attend the program.

(f) Each advisor or officer required by Subsection (d) to attend a program shall report on the program's contents at a meeting of the full membership of the student organization the advisor or officer represented at the program.

(g) A program under this section may address any issue determined appropriate by the postsecondary educational institution and must address:

(1) possession and use of alcoholic beverages and illegal drugs, including penalties that may be imposed for possession or use;

(2) hazing;

(3) sexual abuse and harassment;

(4) fire and other safety issues, including the possession and use of a firearm or other weapon or of an explosive device;

(5) travel to a destination outside the area in which the institution is located;

(6) behavior at parties and other events held by a student organization;

(7) adoption by a student organization of a risk management policy; and

(8) issues regarding persons with disabilities, including a review of applicable requirements of federal and state law, and any related policies of the institution, for providing reasonable accommodations and modifications to address the needs of students with disabilities, including access to the activities of the student organization.

(h) A postsecondary educational institution shall provide notice of a program under this section to student organizations in the manner determined by the institution.

(i) A postsecondary educational institution shall take attendance at a program provided under this section in the manner determined appropriate by the institution and may, as provided by a policy adopted by the institution, impose reasonable sanctions on a person who is required to attend the program and fails to attend. The institution shall, until at least the third anniversary of the date of the program, maintain in an appropriate location at the institution a record of that attendance and of notice provided under Subsection (h).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 731 (H.B. 2639), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 807 (S.B. 1138), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1216 (S.B. 1525), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 51.9363. SEXUAL ASSAULT POLICY. (a) In this section, "postsecondary educational institution" means an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003.

(b) Each postsecondary educational institution shall adopt a policy on sexual assault applicable to each student enrolled at and each employee of the institution. The policy must:

(1) include:

(A) definitions of prohibited behavior;

(B) sanctions for violations; and

(C) the protocol for reporting and responding to reports of sexual assault; and

(2) be approved by the institution's governing board before final adoption by the institution.

(c) Each postsecondary educational institution shall make the institution's sexual assault policy available to students, faculty, and staff members by:

(1) including the policy in the institution's student handbook and personnel handbook; and

(2) creating and maintaining a web page on the institution's Internet website dedicated solely to the policy.

(d) Each postsecondary educational institution shall require each entering freshman or undergraduate transfer student to attend an orientation on the institution's sexual assault policy before or during the first semester or term in which the student is enrolled at the institution. The institution shall establish the format and content of the orientation.

(e) Each postsecondary educational institution shall develop and implement a public awareness campaign to inform students enrolled at and employees of the institution of the institution's sexual assault policy. As part of the campaign, the institution shall provide to students information regarding the protocol for reporting incidents of sexual assault adopted under Subsection (b), including the name, office location, and contact information of the institution's Title IX coordinator, by:

(1) e-mailing the information to each student at the beginning of each semester or other academic term; and

(2) including the information in the orientation required under Subsection (d).

(f) As part of the protocol for responding to reports of sexual assault adopted under Subsection (b), each postsecondary educational institution shall:

(1) to the greatest extent practicable based on the number of counselors employed by the institution, ensure that each alleged victim or alleged perpetrator of an incident of sexual assault and any other person who reports such an incident are offered counseling provided by a counselor who does not provide counseling to any other person involved in the incident; and

(2) notwithstanding any other law, allow an alleged victim or alleged perpetrator of an incident of sexual assault to drop a course in which both parties are enrolled without any academic penalty.

(g) Each biennium, each postsecondary educational institution shall review the institution's sexual assault policy and, with approval of the institution's governing board, revise the policy as necessary.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1005 (H.B. 699), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 719 (S.B. 968), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 51.9365. ELECTRONIC REPORTING OPTION FOR CERTAIN OFFENSES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Dating violence" means abuse or violence, or a threat of abuse or violence, against a person with whom the actor has or has had a social relationship of a romantic or intimate nature.

(2) "Postsecondary educational institution" means an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003.

(3) "Sexual assault" means sexual contact or intercourse with a person without the person's consent, including sexual contact or intercourse against the person's will or in a circumstance in which the person is incapable of consenting to the contact or intercourse.

(4) "Sexual harassment" means unwelcome, sex-based verbal or physical conduct that:

(A) in the employment context, unreasonably interferes with an employee's work performance or creates an intimidating, hostile, or offensive work environment; or

(B) in the education context, is sufficiently severe, persistent, or pervasive that the conduct interferes with a student's ability to participate in or benefit from educational programs or activities.

(5) "Stalking" means a course of conduct directed at a person that would cause a reasonable person to fear for the person's safety or to suffer substantial emotional distress.

(b) Each postsecondary educational institution shall provide an option for a student enrolled at or an employee of the institution to electronically report to the institution an allegation of sexual harassment, sexual assault, dating violence, or stalking committed against or witnessed by the student or employee, regardless of the location at which the alleged offense occurred.

(c) The electronic reporting option provided under Subsection (b) must:

(1) enable a student or employee to report the alleged offense anonymously; and

(2) be easily accessible through a clearly identifiable link on the postsecondary educational institution's Internet website home page.

(d) A protocol for reporting sexual assault adopted under Section 51.9363 must comply with this section.

(e) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 719 (S.B. 968), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 51.9366. AMNESTY FOR STUDENTS REPORTING CERTAIN INCIDENTS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "Dating violence" means abuse or violence, or a threat of abuse or violence, against a person with whom the actor has or has had a social relationship of a romantic or intimate nature.

(3) "Postsecondary educational institution" means an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003.

(4) "Sexual assault" means sexual contact or intercourse with a person without the person's consent, including sexual contact or intercourse against the person's will or in a circumstance in which the person is incapable of consenting to the contact or intercourse.

(5) "Sexual harassment" means unwelcome, sex-based verbal or physical conduct that:

(A) in the employment context, unreasonably interferes with a person's work performance or creates an intimidating, hostile, or offensive work environment; or

(B) in the education context, is sufficiently severe, persistent, or pervasive that the conduct interferes with a student's ability to participate in or benefit from educational programs or activities at a postsecondary educational institution.

(6) "Stalking" means a course of conduct directed at a person that would cause a reasonable person to fear for the person's safety or to suffer substantial emotional distress.

(b) A postsecondary educational institution may not take any disciplinary action against a student enrolled at the institution who in good faith reports to the institution being the victim of, or a witness to, an incident of sexual harassment, sexual assault, dating violence, or stalking for a violation by the student of the institution's code of conduct occurring at or near the time of the incident, regardless of the location at which the incident occurred or the outcome of the institution's disciplinary process regarding the incident, if any.

(c) A postsecondary educational institution may investigate to determine whether a report of an incident of sexual harassment, sexual assault, dating violence, or stalking was made in good faith.

(d) A determination that a student is entitled to amnesty under Subsection (b) is final and may not be revoked.

(e) Subsection (b) does not apply to a student who reports the student's own commission or assistance in the commission of sexual harassment, sexual assault, dating violence, or stalking.

(f) This section may not be construed to limit a postsecondary educational institution's ability to provide amnesty from application of the institution's policies in circumstances not described by Subsection (b).

(g) The coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to implement and enforce this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 720 (S.B. 969), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 51.937. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY FOR VOLUNTEERS. (a) A volunteer who is serving as a direct service volunteer for an institution of higher education is immune from civil liability for any act that:

(1) is incident to or within the scope of the duties of the volunteer's position; and

(2) involves the exercise of judgment or discretion on the part of the volunteer.

(b) This section does not apply to the operation, use, or maintenance of a motor vehicle.

(c) This section does not limit the liability of a person for intentional misconduct or gross negligence.

(d) In this section, "volunteer" means a person providing services for or on behalf of an institution of higher education, on the premises of the institution or at an activity related to or sponsored by the institution on or off of the property of the institution, who does not receive compensation in excess of reimbursement for expenses.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 622, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1997.

Sec. 51.940. STUDENT DEBIT CARDS. (a) The governing board of an institution of higher education may establish a program to provide students enrolled at the institution with a debit card.

(b) A student issued a debit card under the program may use the card to purchase merchandise or service available through the institution or through a person authorized to sell merchandise or service at the institution, as determined by the governing board.

(c) The program must allow a person who is in business to sell merchandise or service of the same kind as the merchandise or service that a student may purchase under Subsection (b) to participate in the program under the same or equivalent terms applicable to a person authorized to sell merchandise under Subsection (b) and accept a debit card payment from a student to whom a debit card has been issued under the program for purchase of that merchandise or service. The institution of higher education may assess participating businesses a fee sufficient to cover the cost of implementation and administration of this program.

(d) An institution of higher education may not administer or sponsor a debit card program for students of the institution that does not conform to this section.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Governing board" and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Person" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.201, Business & Commerce Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 316, Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 710, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.941. PURCHASE OF AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS. (a) An institution of higher education that purchases agricultural products shall give first preference to products grown, produced, or processed in this state if the cost to the institution and the quality of the products are equal to the cost and quality of other available products.

(b) An institution of higher education shall ensure that bid specifications used by the institution in connection with the purchase of agricultural products do not preclude or discourage the purchase of agricultural products grown, produced, or processed in this state.

(c) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 473, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.940 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.942. PERFORMANCE EVALUATION OF TENURED FACULTY. (a) In this section:

(1) "Governing board" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Institution of higher education" means a general academic teaching institution, medical and dental unit, or other agency of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003.

(3) "Neglect of duty" means continuing or repeated substantial neglect of professional responsibilities.

(b) Each governing board of an institution of higher education shall adopt rules and procedures providing for a periodic performance evaluation process for all faculty tenured at the institution. The governing board may design its rules and procedures to fit the institution's particular educational mission, traditions, resources, and circumstances relevant to its character, role, and scope, in addition to other relevant factors determined by the governing board in the rules adopted pursuant to this section. The governing board shall seek advice and comment from the faculty of the institution before adopting any rules pursuant to this section. The advice and comment from the faculty on the performance evaluation of tenured faculty shall be given the utmost consideration by the governing board.

(c) In addition to any other provisions adopted by the governing board, the rules shall include provisions providing that:

(1) each faculty member tenured at the institution be subject to a comprehensive performance evaluation process conducted no more often than once every year, but no less often than once every six years, after the date the faculty member was granted tenure or received an academic promotion at the institution;

(2) the evaluation be based on the professional responsibilities of the faculty member, in teaching, research, service, patient care, and administration, and include peer review of the faculty member;

(3) the process be directed toward the professional development of the faculty member;

(4) the process incorporate commonly recognized academic due process rights, including notice of the manner and scope of the evaluation, the opportunity to provide documentation during the evaluation process, and, before a faculty member may be subject to disciplinary action on the basis of an evaluation conducted pursuant to this section, notice of specific charges and an opportunity for hearing on those charges; and

(5) a faculty member be subject to revocation of tenure or other appropriate disciplinary action if incompetency, neglect of duty, or other good cause is determined to be present.

(d) A faculty member subject to termination on the basis of an evaluation conducted pursuant to this section must be given the opportunity for referral of the matter to a nonbinding alternative dispute resolution process as described in Chapter 154, Civil Practice and Remedies Code. If both parties agree, another type of alternative dispute resolution method may be elected. The governing board must give specific reasons in writing for any decision to terminate a faculty member on the basis of an evaluation conducted pursuant to this section.

(e) A governing board may not waive the evaluation process for any faculty member granted tenure at an institution.

(f) A governing board may not award tenure to an administrator in any way that varies from the institution's general policy on the award of tenure.

(g) Each governing board shall file a copy of the rules adopted pursuant to this section, and any amendments to such rules, with the coordinating board on or before September 1 of each year.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1017, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

Sec. 51.943. RENEWAL OF FACULTY EMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Contract" means an agreement between an institution of higher education or its authorized agent and a faculty member that establishes the terms of the faculty member's employment, including the faculty member's responsibilities and salary, for an academic year.

(2) "Faculty member" means a person who is employed full time by an institution of higher education as a member of the faculty whose primary duties include teaching or research. The term does not include:

(A) a person employed in the classified personnel system of the institution or a person employed in a similar type of position if the institution does not have a classified personnel system;

(B) a person who holds faculty rank but who spends a majority of the person's time for the institution engaged in managerial or supervisory activities, including a chancellor, vice chancellor, president, vice president, provost, associate or assistant provost, dean, or associate or assistant dean.

(3) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Except as provided in Subsection (c), an institution of higher education that determines it is in its best interest to reappoint a faculty member for the next academic year shall offer the faculty member a written contract for that academic year not later than 30 days before the first day of the academic year.

(c) For the purposes of this section, an institution of higher education is not required to provide an annual contract to tenure or tenure-track faculty, but must provide tenure and tenure-track faculty with any written notification required in the institution's tenure policy of a change in a term of employment according to the policies of the institution, but no later than the 30th day prior to the change.

(d) If the institution of higher education is unable to comply with Subsection (b), the institution shall:

(1) provide the faculty member with written notification that the institution is unable to comply with Subsection (b);

(2) include in the written notification reasons for its inability to comply with Subsection (b); and

(3) specify in the written notification a time by which it will offer a written contract to the faculty member for the applicable academic year.

(e) If the institution does not offer the faculty member a written contract before the 61st day after the first day of the academic year and the institution retains the faculty member for that academic year without a written contract, the institution must retain the faculty member for that academic year under terms and conditions, including terms governing the faculty member's compensation, that are at least as favorable to the faculty member's employment for the preceding academic year, unless the institution and the faculty member subsequently enter into a different written contract.

(f) This section does not prohibit an institution of higher education from entering into a contract with a faculty member for a period longer than an academic year.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to provide a faculty member who does not hold tenure additional rights, privileges, or remedies or to provide an expectation of continued employment beyond the period of a faculty member's current contract.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1298, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2002.

Sec. 51.945. STUDENT PARTICIPATION IN SELECTION OF FOOD SERVICE CONTRACTS. (a) The governing board of an institution of higher education shall develop and implement policies that provide the students at the institution with a reasonable opportunity to appear before any committee or other entity that is determining whether a food service provider should be selected or retained by the institution. The policies shall provide the students with a reasonable opportunity to discuss the performance of a food service provider and the students' recommendations for qualifications of food service providers.

(b) A contract between an institution of higher education and a food service provider must require the food service provider to periodically hold meetings or forums to provide the students at the institution with a reasonable opportunity to discuss the performance of the food service provider.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Food service provider" means a person who contracts with the institution to provide food or beverage service at any location on the premises of the institution.

(2) "Governing board" and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 51.946. STUDENT DEBIT CARDS AT PRIVATE OR INDEPENDENT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) The governing board of a private or independent institution of higher education may establish a program to provide students enrolled at the institution with a debit card.

(b) A student issued a debit card under the program may use the card to purchase merchandise or service available through the institution or through a person authorized to sell merchandise or service at the institution, as determined by the governing board.

(c) The program may allow a person who is in business to sell merchandise or service of the same kind as the merchandise or service that a student may purchase under Subsection (b) to participate in the program under the same or equivalent terms applicable to a person authorized to sell merchandise under Subsection (b) and accept a debit card payment from a student to whom a debit card has been issued under the program for purchase of that merchandise or service.

(d) The private or independent institution of higher education may assess participating businesses a fee for the implementation and administration of the program.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Private or independent institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Person" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.201, Business & Commerce Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 370, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999.

Sec. 51.9461. CHARGES AND FEES FOR CERTAIN PAYMENTS AT PRIVATE OR INDEPENDENT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) In this section, "private or independent institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) This section applies only to a payment of tuition, a fee, or another charge made by or on behalf of a student, including a person admitted but not yet enrolled, of a private or independent institution of higher education if the payment is made or authorized in person, by mail, by telephone call, or through the Internet by means of:

(1) an electronic funds transfer; or

(2) a credit card.

(c) A private or independent institution of higher education may charge a fee or other amount in connection with a payment to which this section applies, in addition to the amount of the tuition, fee, or other charge being paid, including:

(1) a discount, convenience, or service charge for the transaction; or

(2) a service charge in connection with a payment transaction that is dishonored or refused for lack of funds or insufficient funds.

(d) A fee or other charge under this section must be in an amount reasonable and necessary to reimburse the institution for the expense incurred by the institution in processing and handling the payment or payment transaction.

(e) Before accepting a payment by credit card, the institution shall notify the student or other person making the payment of any fee to be charged under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1829), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 51.947. PAYROLL DEDUCTIONS FOR CERTAIN ORGANIZATIONS. (a) An employee of an institution of higher education may authorize a deduction each pay period from the employee's salary or wage payment for:

(1) a contribution to an institution of higher education; or

(2) a charitable contribution to a nonprofit organization the purpose of which is to support the programs of an institution of higher education.

(b) To be eligible to receive charitable contributions under this section, a nonprofit organization must comply with the rules adopted under Section 2255.001, Government Code, by the institution of higher education the organization supports.

(c) An institution of higher education shall establish procedures to enable an employee of the institution to authorize a deduction under this section.

(d) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 307, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 51.946 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(18), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.948. RESTRICTIONS ON CONTRACTS WITH ADMINISTRATORS. (a) The governing board of an institution of higher education may enter into an employment contract with an administrator that is to be paid in whole or in part from appropriated funds only if, before the date the contract is executed, the governing board determines that the contract is in the best interest of the institution.

(b) A contract entered into by a governing board under this section may not:

(1) provide for employment for more than three years;

(2) allow for severance or other payments on the termination of the contract to exceed an amount equal to the discounted net present cash value of the contract on termination at a market interest rate agreed upon in the contract;

(3) allow for development leave that is inconsistent with Section 51.105; or

(4) award tenure in any way that varies from the institution's general policy on the award of tenure.

(c) An institution of higher education may not pay a salary to a person who is reassigned from an administrative position to a faculty or other position at the institution that exceeds the salary of other persons with similar qualifications performing similar duties.

(d) An institution of higher education must require an administrator who receives development leave to:

(1) return to work at the institution for an amount of time equal to the amount of time the administrator received development leave; or

(2) repay the institution for all the costs of the development leave, including the amount of the administrator's salary, if any, paid during the leave.

(e) A record that pertains to a contract between an institution and an administrator, including terms relating to an amount of money the institution has paid or agreed to pay or the extension of any monetary or other consideration to an administrator in connection with the settlement, compromise, or other resolution of any difference between the institution or governing body and a current or former administrator, is public information and may not be withheld from public disclosure.

(f) Notwithstanding Subsection (b)(3), the governing board of an institution may grant development leave at the faculty member's full regular salary for one year to a faculty member who has held an administrative position at the institution for more than four years.

(g) In this section:

(1) "Administrator" means a person who has significant administrative duties relating to the operation of the institution, including the operation of a department, college, program, or other subdivision of the institution.

(2) "Governing board" and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(3) "Contract" includes a letter of agreement or letter of understanding.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 91.946 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(19), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.950. POLICY REGULATING STUDENT TRAVEL. (a) In this section, "governing board" and "institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Each governing board of an institution of higher education shall adopt a policy regulating travel that is undertaken by one or more students presently enrolled at the institution to reach an activity or event that is located more than 25 miles from the institution that is organized and sponsored by the institution and that is:

(1) funded by the institution, and the travel is undertaken using a vehicle owned or leased by the institution; or

(2) required by a student organization registered at the institution.

(c) The governing board shall seek advice and comment from the faculty and students of the institution before adopting any policy under this section.

(d) The policy must contain provisions that address:

(1) different modes of travel likely to be used by students; and

(2) safety issues related to student travel, including:

(A) use of seat belts or other safety devices;

(B) passenger capacity; and

(C) for the person providing transportation services:

(i) qualifications and training required to operate that particular mode of travel; and

(ii) fatigue at the time of travel.

(e) The governing board shall make the policy available to the public by publishing the policy in the institution's catalog and by any other method the board considers appropriate.

(f) The governing board shall file a copy of the policy adopted under this section, and any amendments to that policy, with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(g) This section does not create a claim or cause of action against an institution of higher education beyond a claim or cause of action authorized on the effective date of the Act that enacted this section by Chapter 101, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 697, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.949 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(28), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.951. CONFIDENTIALITY OF CERTAIN INFORMATION RELATED TO PURCHASE OR SALE OF REAL ESTATE. (a) Information related to the location, purchase price, or sale price of real property purchased or sold by or for an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, is confidential and exempt from disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, until a deed for the property is executed. Information that is confidential and exempted from disclosure under this subsection includes an appraisal, completed report, evaluation, investigation conducted for the purpose of locating or determining the purchase or sale price of the property, or any report prepared in anticipation of purchasing or selling real property.

(b) Information that is confidential and excluded from disclosure under Subsection (a) is not subject to a subpoena directed to an institution of higher education, its governing board, or any officer, agent, or employee of an institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1317, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 532, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 51.961 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(29), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.952. STUDENT HEALTH INSURANCE. (a) The governing board of a medical and dental unit may require a student enrolled at a medical and dental unit to have in effect during the calendar year of enrollment a health insurance policy for health care services received by the student.

(b) The governing board of a medical and dental unit shall determine the minimum coverage standards for health insurance required under this section.

(c) If the student agrees in writing, the medical and dental unit shall provide a reasonable estimate of the cost of the health insurance coverage within the student's cost of education for financial aid purposes.

(d) If a governing board of a medical and dental unit requires health insurance coverage for students under Subsection (a), a student may be provisionally enrolled at the medical and dental unit for one academic session without the coverage in order to allow the student time to obtain the coverage.

(e) The governing board of a medical and dental unit may adopt such other rules and regulations as it determines necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(f) In this section, "governing board" and "medical and dental unit" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 711, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 51.961 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(30), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 51.953. CERTAIN REVENUE RECEIVED FROM STUDENT HEALTH CENTER SERVICES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Health benefit plan" means any health benefit plan regulated under the Insurance Code, including:

(A) an individual or group health insurance policy; or

(B) an evidence of coverage issued by a health maintenance organization.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Amounts received by an institution of higher education from a health benefit plan issuer as a result of a claim filed with the issuer by or on behalf of the institution's student health center are institutional funds under Section 51.009 and may be used only for the construction, improvement, operation, or maintenance of the student health center or to increase or enhance the services offered by the student health center. It is the intent of the legislature that those amounts be in addition to other amounts of money allocated to the student health center and those other amounts not be reduced.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1270 (H.B. 3430), Sec. 7, eff. October 1, 2007.

Text of section as added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 24

For text of section as added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1024 (H.B. 1295), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 51.954.

Sec. 51.954. DISCLOSURE OF SPONSORS OF CONTRACTED RESEARCH IN PUBLIC COMMUNICATIONS. (a) In any public communication the content of which is based on the results of sponsored research, a faculty member or other employee or appointee of an institution of higher education who conducted or participated in conducting the research shall conspicuously disclose the identity of each sponsor of the research.

(b) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Public communication" means oral or written communication intended for public consumption or distribution, including:

(A) testimony in a public administrative, legislative, regulatory, or judicial proceeding;

(B) printed matter including a magazine, journal, newsletter, newspaper, pamphlet, or report; or

(C) posting of information on a website or similar Internet host for information.

(3) "Sponsor" means an entity that contracts for or provides money or materials for research.

(4) "Sponsored research" means research:

(A) that is conducted under a contract with, or that is conducted under a grant awarded by and pursuant to a written agreement with, an individual or entity other than the institution conducting the research; and

(B) in which payments received or the value of materials received under that contract or grant, or under a combination of more than one such contract or grant, constitutes at least 50 percent of the cost of conducting the research.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2015.

Text of section as added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1024 (H.B. 1295), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 24, see other Sec. 51.954.

Sec. 51.954. DISCLOSURE OF SPONSORS OF RESEARCH IN PUBLIC COMMUNICATIONS. (a) In any public communication the content of which is based on the results of sponsored research, a faculty member or other employee or appointee of an institution of higher education who conducted or participated in conducting the research shall conspicuously disclose the identity of each sponsor of the research.

(b) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Public communication" means oral or written communication intended for public consumption or distribution, including:

(A) testimony in a public administrative, legislative, regulatory, or judicial proceeding;

(B) printed matter including a magazine, journal, newsletter, newspaper, pamphlet, or report; or

(C) posting of information on a website or similar Internet host for information.

(3) "Sponsor" means an entity that contracts for or provides money or materials for research.

(4) "Sponsored research" means research:

(A) that is conducted under a contract with or a grant from an individual or entity, other than the institution conducting the research, for the purpose of the research; and

(B) in which payments received or the value of materials received under that contract or grant, or under a combination of more than one such contract or grant, constitutes at least 50 percent of the cost of conducting the research.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1024 (H.B. 1295), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.955. PROHIBITED STATE AGENCY ACTIONS RELATED TO DISCLOSURE OF PUBLICLY FUNDED RESEARCH. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) A state agency that expends appropriated funds may not:

(1) enter into a research contract with an institution of higher education if that contract contains a provision precluding public disclosure of any final data generated or produced in the course of executing the contract unless the agency reasonably determines that the premature disclosure of such data would adversely affect public safety, the protection of intellectual property rights of the institution of higher education, publication rights in professional scientific publications, or valuable confidential information of the institution of higher education or a third party; or

(2) adopt a rule that is based on research conducted under a contract entered into with an institution of higher education unless the agency:

(A) has made the results of the research and all data supporting the research publicly available; or

(B) reasonably determines that the premature disclosure of such data would adversely affect public safety, the protection of intellectual property rights of the institution of higher education, publication rights in professional scientific publications, or valuable confidential information of the institution of higher education or a third party.

(c) Subsection (b)(1) does not apply to a research contract between an institution of higher education and the Cancer Prevention and Research Institute of Texas.

(d) A response to a request for information regarding research described by Subsection (b) must be made in accordance with Chapter 552, Government Code.

(e) This section does not require the public disclosure of personal identifying information or any other information the disclosure of which is otherwise prohibited by law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1024 (H.B. 1295), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.960. GRIEVANCE RIGHTS ON CERTAIN PERSONNEL ISSUES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Faculty member" means a person employed full-time by an institution of higher education as a member of the institution's faculty, including professional librarians, whose duties include teaching, research, administration, or the performance of professional services. The term does not include a person who holds faculty rank but who spends the majority of the person's time for the institution engaged in managerial or supervisory activities, including a chancellor, vice chancellor, president, vice president, provost, associate or assistant provost, dean, or associate or assistant dean.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) A faculty member at an institution of higher education has a right to present a grievance, in person, to a member of the institution's administration designated by the governing board of the institution on an issue related to the nonrenewal or termination of the faculty member's employment at the institution.

(c) An institution may not, by contract, policy, or procedure, restrict a faculty member's right to present a grievance under this section. An institution may adopt a method for presenting, reviewing, and acting on a grievance filed under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 870, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 51.961. LEAVE PROVISIONS FOR EMPLOYEES OF UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OR COMPONENT INSTITUTION OF SYSTEM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Governing board" and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Leave" includes vacation leave, sick leave, and holidays.

(b) The governing board of a university system may adopt a comprehensive leave policy that applies to employees of the university system or any component institution of the system.

(c) A policy adopted under this section may combine vacation, sick, and holiday leave into a paid leave system that does not distinguish or separate the types of leave to be awarded and may award leave in an amount determined by the governing board to be appropriate and cost-effective.

(d) Chapters 661 and 662, Government Code, do not apply to employees covered by a policy adopted under this section. The policy must include provisions addressing the subject matter of each subchapter of Chapters 661 and 662, Government Code, and the intended effect of the policy on the rights, duties, and responsibilities of employees and the employing entity under those subchapters.

(e) A policy adopted under this section must include provisions for:

(1) payment for accrued leave to:

(A) the estates or heirs of deceased employees;

(B) employees separating from the employing entity; and

(C) contributing members of state retirement systems who retire; and

(2) awards of accrued leave to employees separating from the employing entity who are to be employed by other state agencies or institutions of higher education.

(f) A policy authorized by this section may include other matters as determined relevant and appropriate by the governing board.

(g) A policy authorized by this section must be adopted by a governing board in an open meeting of the board.

(h) Before implementing a policy adopted under this section, the governing board shall make reasonable efforts to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the office of the state auditor, the Employees Retirement System of Texas, and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board concerning awards of accrued leave for the purposes of retirement and other issues of concern related to the implementation of the policy.

(i) On or after September 15, 2005, the governing board of an institution of higher education may adopt a leave policy as provided by this section for employees of the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 2.09, 2.10, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 51.9611. PAYROLL DEDUCTIONS FOR EMPLOYEES OF UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The governing board of a university system, or of an institution of higher education that is not a component institution of a university system, may authorize employees of the system or institution, as applicable, to elect a payroll deduction for any purpose that the governing board determines serves a public purpose and benefits employees. The board may adopt policies and procedures governing payroll deductions under this section. A payroll deduction under this section is in addition to payroll deductions authorized by other law.

(c) A payroll deduction under this section must be at the written request of the employee, and the request must state the amount to be deducted and the entity to which the deducted amount is to be transferred. A payroll deduction is in effect until revoked in writing by the employee, but the policies and procedures of the university system or institution of higher education, as applicable, may provide for enrollment periods.

(d) A university system or institution of higher education may collect an administrative fee to cover the costs of making a deduction.

(e) This section does not authorize a payroll deduction for dues or membership fees payable to a labor union or employees association.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 3.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.962. MERIT SALARY INCREASES. (a) An institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 may grant merit salary increases, including one-time merit payments, to employees described by this section.

(b) A merit salary increase made under this section is compensation for purposes of Chapter 659, Government Code, and salary and wages and member compensation for purposes of Title 8, Government Code.

(c) An institution of higher education may pay merit salary increases under this section from any funds.

(d) Before awarding a merit salary increase under this section, an institution of higher education must adopt criteria for the granting of merit salary increases.

(e) To be eligible for a merit salary increase under this section, an employee must have been employed by the institution of higher education for the six months immediately preceding the effective date of the increase and at least six months must have elapsed since the employee's last merit salary increase.

(f) This subsection applies to an employee employed by the institution of higher education for more than six months. The requirement that six months elapse between merit salary increases prescribed by Subsection (e) does not apply to a one-time merit payment if the chief administrative officer of the institution of higher education determines in writing that the one-time merit payment is made in relation to the employee's performance during a natural disaster or other extraordinary circumstance.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 2.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1241 (S.B. 2298), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.963. EMPLOYEE WITH MULTIPLE APPOINTMENTS. A full-time employee of an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 who has appointments to more than one position at the same institution may receive pay for working more than 40 hours in a week if the institution determines that pay in lieu of compensatory time is in the best interests of the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 2.03, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.964. HIRING OF CERTAIN RETIREES. (a) An institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 may employ a person who has retired under the Teacher Retirement System (Subtitle C, Title 8, Government Code) or the optional retirement program (Chapter 830, Government Code) if:

(1) the governing board of the institution determines that the employment is in the best interests of the institution; and

(2) the person has been retired for at least 30 days before the effective date of the employment, except that a person retired under the optional retirement program may be rehired after retirement without a break in service.

(b) The governing board may pay a person employed under this section an amount considered by the governing board to be appropriate, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 2.04, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 2.06, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 51.9645. PROHIBITION AGAINST CERTAIN ACTIVITIES BY FINANCIAL AID EMPLOYEES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Student loan" means a loan for which the loan agreement requires that all or part of the loan proceeds be used to assist a person in attending an institution of higher education or other postsecondary institution.

(3) "Student loan lender" means a person whose primary business is:

(A) making, brokering, arranging, or accepting applications for student loans; or

(B) a combination of activities described by Paragraph (A).

(b) A person employed by an institution of higher education in the financial aid office of the institution may not:

(1) own stock or hold another ownership interest in a student loan lender, other than through ownership of shares in a publicly traded mutual fund or similar investment vehicle in which the person does not exercise any discretion regarding the investment of the assets of the fund or other investment vehicle; or

(2) solicit or accept any gift from a student loan lender.

(c) A person who violates this section is subject to dismissal or other appropriate disciplinary action.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1344 (S.B. 194), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.965. EMPLOYEE NOTIFICATION. (a) If a state law requires an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003 to provide written notification to its officers or employees of any requirement, right, duty, or responsibility provided by state law, the institution may provide the notification by use of electronic media.

(b) An institution of higher education may adopt rules and guidelines to ensure that notification provided by electronic media under this section is effective and that any required notification is provided to officers and employees who do not have access to electronic media.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 2.05, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.966. INSURANCE COVERAGE. (a) The governing board of an institution of higher education may purchase insurance insuring the institution and its employees against any liability, risk, or exposure and covering the losses of any institutional property.

(b) The governing board may pay the cost of any insurance from any funds of the institution.

(c) Section 612.002(b), Government Code, does not apply to an institution of higher education or university system purchasing insurance under this section.

(d) In this section, "governing board," "institution of higher education," and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 2.04, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.967. LIMITATION ON EDUCATIONAL DEBT. No statute of limitations shall apply to a lawsuit, to the enforcement of a judgment, or to any other legal action to collect an educational debt owed to an institution of higher education or to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 3.04, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.968. UNDERGRADUATE COURSE CREDIT FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS COMPLETING POSTSECONDARY-LEVEL PROGRAM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Advanced Placement examination" means an examination administered through the Advanced Placement Program.

(2) "CLEP examination" means an examination administered through the College-Level Examination Program.

(3) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(4) "Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, that offers freshman-level courses.

(5) "International Baccalaureate Diploma Program" means the curriculum and examinations leading to an International Baccalaureate diploma awarded by the International Baccalaureate Organization.

(b) Each institution of higher education that offers freshman-level courses shall adopt and implement a policy to grant undergraduate course credit to entering freshman students who have:

(1) successfully completed the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program;

(2) achieved required scores on one or more examinations in the Advanced Placement Program or the College-Level Examination Program; or

(3) successfully completed one or more dual credit courses.

(c) In the policy, the institution shall:

(1) establish the institution's conditions for granting course credit, including the minimum required scores on CLEP examinations, Advanced Placement examinations, and examinations for courses constituting the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program; and

(2) based on the correlations identified under Subsection (f), identify the specific course credit or other academic requirements of the institution, including the number of semester credit hours or other course credit, that the institution will grant to a student who:

(A) successfully completes the diploma program;

(B) achieves required scores on CLEP examinations or Advanced Placement examinations; or

(C) successfully completes a dual credit course.

(c-1) In establishing the minimum required score on an Advanced Placement examination for granting course credit for a particular lower-division course under Subsection (c), an institution of higher education may not require a score of more than three unless the institution's chief academic officer determines, based on evidence, that a higher score on the examination is necessary to indicate a student is sufficiently prepared to be successful in a related, more advanced course for which the lower-division course is a prerequisite.

(d) The policy adopted by an institution of higher education under Subsection (b) must provide that the institution may grant undergraduate course credit for a dual credit course only if the course is:

(1) in the core curriculum of the institution of higher education that offered the course;

(2) a career and technical education course; or

(3) a foreign language course.

(d-1) Subsection (d) does not apply to a dual credit course completed by a student as part of the early college education program established under Section 29.908 or any other early college program that assists a student in earning a certificate or an associate degree while in high school.

(d-2) The coordinating board, in coordination with the Texas Education Agency, shall adopt rules to implement Subsections (d) and (d-1). In adopting those rules, the coordinating board shall use the negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008, Government Code, and consult with relevant stakeholders.

(e) On request of an applicant for admission as an entering freshman, an institution of higher education, based on information provided by the applicant, shall determine and notify the applicant regarding:

(1) the amount and type of any course credit that would be granted to the applicant under the policy; and

(2) any other academic requirement that the applicant would satisfy under the policy.

(f) The coordinating board, in consultation with the Texas Education Agency, shall:

(1) identify correlations between the subject matter and content of courses offered by each institution of higher education and the subject matter and content of courses and examinations in the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program, the Advanced Placement Program, and the College-Level Examination Program; and

(2) make that information available to the public on the coordinating board's Internet website.

(g) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, an institution of higher education shall grant at least 24 semester credit hours or equivalent course credit in appropriate subject areas to an entering freshman student for successful completion of the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program. The institution may grant fewer than 24 semester credit hours if the student received a score of less than four on an examination administered as part of the diploma program. The institution may grant fewer credit hours only with respect to courses that are substantially related to the subject of that examination.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 293 (S.B. 111), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 9.01(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 318 (H.B. 1992), Sec. 1, eff. June 3, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (S.B. 1091), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 51.9685. REQUIRED FILING OF DEGREE PLAN. (a) In this section:

(1) "Degree plan" means a statement of the course of study requirements that an undergraduate student at an institution of higher education must complete in order to be awarded an associate or bachelor's degree from the institution.

(2) "Institution of higher education" and "public junior college" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (c), each student enrolled in an associate or bachelor's degree program at an institution of higher education shall file a degree plan with the institution not later than the end of the second regular semester or term immediately following the semester or term in which the student earned a cumulative total of 45 or more semester credit hours for coursework successfully completed by the student, including transfer courses, international baccalaureate courses, dual credit courses, and any other course for which the institution the student attends has awarded the student college course credit, including course credit awarded by examination.

(c) A student to whom this section applies who begins the student's first semester or term at an institution of higher education with 45 or more semester credit hours of course credit for courses described by Subsection (b) shall file a degree plan with the institution not later than the end of the student's second regular semester or term at the institution.

(c-1) Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), a student enrolled in an associate or bachelor's degree program at a public junior college shall file a degree plan with the college not later than:

(1) the end of the second regular semester or term immediately following the semester or term in which the student earned a cumulative total of 30 or more semester credit hours of course credit for courses described by Subsection (b); or

(2) if the student begins the student's first semester or term at the college with 30 or more semester credit hours of course credit for courses described by Subsection (b), the end of the student's second regular semester or term at the college.

(d) An institution of higher education shall provide to students to whom this section applies information regarding the degree plan filing requirement under this section and options for consulting with an academic advisor for that purpose, which may include consultation through electronic communication.

(e) At each registration for a semester or term, a student who is required to have filed a degree plan under this section before that semester or term shall verify to the institution that:

(1) the student has filed a degree plan with the institution; and

(2) the courses for which the student is registering are consistent with that degree plan.

(f) If a student to whom this section applies does not timely file a degree plan, the institution of higher education in which the student is enrolled shall notify the student that the degree plan is required by law and require the student to consult with an academic advisor for that purpose in accordance with the consulting options under Subsection (d) during the semester or term in which the student receives the notice. The student may not obtain an official transcript from the institution until the student has filed a degree plan with the institution.

(g) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in consultation with institutions of higher education, may adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1038 (H.B. 3025), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 241 (H.B. 655), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 241 (H.B. 655), Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 2017.

Sec. 51.96851. LEARNING OUTCOMES FOR UNDERGRADUATE COURSES. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) To foster a transparent student learning environment at institutions of higher education and to facilitate the universal articulation of undergraduate courses that are transferable for credit among all institutions of higher education, each institution of higher education shall identify, adopt, and make available for public inspection measurable learning outcomes for each undergraduate course offered by the institution other than:

(1) a course with a highly variable subject content that is tailored specifically to an individual student, such as an independent study or directed reading course; or

(2) a laboratory, practicum, or discussion section that is an intrinsic and required component of a lecture course.

(c) An institution of higher education may adopt learning outcomes for a course under this section that are the same as or based on those identified for that course by the institution's recognized accrediting agency.

(d) In consultation with institutions of higher education, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt any rules the coordinating board considers appropriate for the administration of this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1109 (S.B. 1726), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.969. ELIGIBILITY FOR SCHOLARSHIP; STATEMENT REQUIRED. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) A person is not eligible to receive a scholarship originating from and administered by an institution of higher education or university system if the person is related to a current member of the governing board of the institution or system, unless:

(1) the scholarship is granted by a private organization or third party not affiliated with the institution of higher education or university system;

(2) the scholarship is awarded exclusively on the basis of prior academic merit;

(3) the scholarship is an athletic scholarship; or

(4) the relationship is not within the third degree by consanguinity or the second degree by affinity, as determined under Subchapter B, Chapter 573, Government Code.

(c) Before receiving a scholarship originating from and administered by an institution of higher education or university system, a person must file a written statement with the institution or system indicating whether the person is related within the third degree by consanguinity or the second degree by affinity to a current member of the governing board of the institution or system.

(d) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt rules for the administration of this section and shall prescribe the statement to be used under this section. The coordinating board shall notify each institution of higher education and university system of the required statement and applicable rules.

(e) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly files a false statement under Subsection (c).

(f) An offense under Subsection (e) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 422 (S.B. 1325), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1017 (H.B. 4244), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.970. INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIAL FOR BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED STUDENTS AND STUDENTS WITH DYSLEXIA. (a) In this section:

(1) "Blind or visually impaired student" includes any student whose visual acuity is impaired to the extent that the student is unable to read the print in the standard instructional material used in a course in which the student is enrolled.

(2) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(3) "Dyslexia" means a condition of dyslexia considered to be a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.) or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794).

(4) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(5) "Instructional material" means a printed textbook or other printed instructional material or a combination of a printed book and supplementary printed instructional material that:

(A) conveys information to or otherwise contributes to the learning process of a student; and

(B) was published on or after January 1, 2004.

(6) "Special instructional material" means instructional material in Braille, large print, audio format, digital text, or any other medium or any apparatus that conveys information to or otherwise contributes to the learning process of a blind or visually impaired student or a student with dyslexia.

(b) This section applies only to instructional material that is:

(1) written and published primarily for postsecondary instruction of students; and

(2) required or essential for a student's success in a course at an institution of higher education, as identified by the instructor of the course for which the instructional material will be used, in consultation with the person at the institution with primary responsibility for services for students with disabilities and in accordance with rules adopted under Subsection (i)(1).

(c) To assist the institution in producing special instructional material, a publisher or manufacturer of instructional material assigned by an institution of higher education for use by students in connection with a course at the institution shall provide to the institution on the institution's request in accordance with this section a copy in an electronic format of the instructional material. The publisher or manufacturer, as applicable, shall provide the electronic copy not later than the 15th business day after the date of receipt of the request.

(d) A request made by an institution of higher education under Subsection (c) must:

(1) certify that for each blind or visually impaired student or student with dyslexia who will use specialized instructional material based on the requested copy of the material in an electronic format for a course in which the student is enrolled at the institution, either the institution or the student has purchased a printed copy of the instructional material; and

(2) be signed by the person at the institution with primary responsibility for services for students with disabilities.

(e) A publisher or manufacturer may require that a request made by an institution of higher education under Subsection (c) include from each student for whom the institution is making the request a signed statement in which the student agrees:

(1) to use the requested electronic copy and related special instructional material only for the student's own educational purposes; and

(2) not to copy or otherwise distribute in a manner that violates 17 U.S.C. Section 101 et seq. the requested electronic copy or the instructional material on which the requested electronic copy is based.

(f) Each electronic copy of instructional material must:

(1) be in a format that:

(A) except as provided by Subsection (g), contains all of the information that is in the instructional material, including any text, sidebar, table of contents, chapter headings, chapter subheadings, footnotes, index, glossary, and bibliography, and is approved by the publisher or manufacturer, as applicable, and the institution of higher education as a format that will contain that material; and

(B) is compatible with commonly used Braille translation and speech synthesis software; and

(2) include any correction or revision available at the time the electronic copy is provided.

(g) If the publisher or manufacturer and the institution of higher education are not able to agree on a format as required by Subsection (f)(1)(A), the publisher or manufacturer, as applicable, shall provide the electronic copy of the instructional material in a format that can be read by a word processing application and that contains as much of the material specified by that subsection as is practicable.

(h) The coordinating board may impose a reasonable administrative penalty, not to exceed $250 per violation, against a publisher or manufacturer that knowingly violates this section. The coordinating board shall provide for a hearing to be held, in accordance with coordinating board rule, to determine whether a penalty is to be imposed and the amount of any penalty. The coordinating board shall base the amount of any penalty on:

(1) the seriousness of the violation;

(2) any history of a previous violation;

(3) the amount necessary to deter a future violation;

(4) any effort to correct the violation; and

(5) any other matter justice requires.

(i) The coordinating board, in consultation with an advocacy organization for persons who are blind or visually impaired, an advocacy organization for persons with dyslexia, representatives from one or more instructional material publishing companies or publishing associations, and institutions of higher education, shall adopt rules for administering this section, including rules that address:

(1) the method for identifying instructional material considered to be required or essential for a student's success in a course;

(2) the procedures and standards relating to distribution of electronic copies of instructional material under this section; and

(3) any other matter considered necessary or appropriate for the administration of this section.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a publisher or manufacturer is not required to comply with Subsection (c) or (f), as applicable, if the coordinating board, using procedures and criteria adopted by coordinating board rule and based on information provided by the publisher or manufacturer, determines that:

(1) compliance by the manufacturer or publisher would violate a law, rule, or regulation relating to copyrights; or

(2) the instructional material on which the requested electronic copy is based is:

(A) out of print; or

(B) in a format that makes it impracticable to convert the material into an electronic format.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1267 (H.B. 3382), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.9701. ASSESSMENT FOR DYSLEXIA. Unless otherwise provided by law, an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, may not reassess a student determined to have dyslexia for the purpose of assessing the student's need for accommodations until the institution of higher education reevaluates the information obtained from previous assessments of the student.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 866), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.9705. NOTICE REGARDING AVAILABILITY OF TEXTBOOKS THROUGH MULTIPLE RETAILERS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "University-affiliated bookstore" means a bookstore that:

(A) sells textbooks for courses offered by an institution of higher education, regardless of whether the bookstore is located on the campus of the institution; and

(B) is operated by or with the approval of the institution through ownership, a management agreement, a lease or rental agreement, or otherwise.

(b) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall prescribe procedures by which each institution of higher education shall provide to each student enrolled at the institution written notice regarding the availability of required or recommended textbooks through university-affiliated bookstores and through retailers other than university-affiliated bookstores. The procedures must require the institution to provide the notice:

(1) to each student of the institution during the week preceding each fall and spring semester;

(2) to each student enrolled at the institution in a semester or summer term during the first three weeks of the semester or the first week of the summer term, as applicable; and

(3) to students or prospective students of the institution attending an orientation conducted by or for the institution.

(c) The notice shall be provided in a hard-copy or electronic format in a manner that ensures that the notice is reasonably likely to come to the attention of a student receiving the notice. The notice must contain the following:

"A student of this institution is not under any obligation to purchase a textbook from a university-affiliated bookstore. The same textbook may also be available from an independent retailer, including an online retailer."

(d) The coordinating board shall adopt rules to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 348 (H.B. 1096), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.971. COMPLIANCE PROGRAM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Compliance program" means a process to assess and ensure compliance by the officers and employees of an institution of higher education with applicable laws, rules, regulations, and policies, including matters of:

(A) ethics and standards of conduct;

(B) financial reporting;

(C) internal accounting controls; or

(D) auditing.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) An institution of higher education that maintains a compliance program may establish procedures, such as a telephone hotline, to permit private access to the compliance program office and to preserve the confidentiality of communications and the anonymity of a person making a compliance report or participating in a compliance investigation.

(c) The following are confidential:

(1) information that directly or indirectly reveals the identity of an individual who made a report to the compliance program office of an institution of higher education, sought guidance from the office, or participated in an investigation conducted under the compliance program; and

(2) information that directly or indirectly reveals the identity of an individual as a person who is alleged to have or may have planned, initiated, or participated in activities that are the subject of a report made to the compliance program office of an institution of higher education if, after completing an investigation, the office determines the report to be unsubstantiated or without merit.

(d) Subsection (c) does not apply to information related to an individual who consents to disclosure of the information.

(e) Information is excepted from disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, if it is collected or produced:

(1) in a compliance program investigation and releasing the information would interfere with an ongoing compliance investigation; or

(2) by a systemwide compliance office for the purpose of reviewing compliance processes at a component institution of higher education of a university system.

(f) Information made confidential or excepted from public disclosure by this section may be made available to the following on request in compliance with applicable law and procedure:

(1) a law enforcement agency or prosecutor;

(2) a governmental agency responsible for investigating the matter that is the subject of a compliance report, including the Texas Workforce Commission civil rights division or the federal Equal Employment Opportunity Commission; or

(3) an officer or employee of an institution of higher education or a compliance officer or employee of a university system administration who is responsible under institutional or system policy for a compliance program investigation or for reviewing a compliance program investigation.

(g) A disclosure under Subsection (f) is not a voluntary disclosure for purposes of Section 552.007, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 4189), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 188 (S.B. 1327), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 51.9715. RELEASE OF STUDENT ACADEMIC INFORMATION. (a) An institution of higher education may request the submission of a signed consent form authorizing the institution to release academic course, grade, and credit information with each:

(1) application for undergraduate transfer admission to the institution, if the institution is a general academic teaching institution, to be used for the purposes of Section 61.833; or

(2) request from a student for a release of the student's transcript by the institution.

(b) An institution of higher education may release student information in accordance with Subsection (a) through:

(1) the National Student Clearinghouse; or

(2) a similar national electronic data sharing and exchange platform operated by an agent of the institution that meets nationally accepted standards, conventions, and practices.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 1714), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 51.972. ON-SITE RECLAIMED SYSTEM TECHNOLOGIES CURRICULUM. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall encourage each institution of higher education to develop curriculum and provide related instruction regarding on-site reclaimed system technologies, including rainwater harvesting, condensate collection, or cooling tower blow down.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 9, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.25, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 51.969 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(8), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 51.973. INFORMATION REGARDING GANG-FREE ZONES. The governing board of each institution of higher education shall ensure that any student handbook or similar publication for the institution includes information on gang-free zones and the consequences of engaging in organized criminal activity within those zones.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1130 (H.B. 2086), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.974. INTERNET ACCESS TO COURSE INFORMATION. (a) Each institution of higher education, other than a medical and dental unit, as defined by Section 61.003, shall make available to the public on the institution's Internet website the following information for each undergraduate classroom course offered for credit by the institution:

(1) a syllabus that:

(A) satisfies any standards adopted by the institution;

(B) provides a brief description of each major course requirement, including each major assignment and examination;

(C) lists any required or recommended reading; and

(D) provides a general description of the subject matter of each lecture or discussion;

(2) a curriculum vitae of each regular instructor that lists the instructor's:

(A) postsecondary education;

(B) teaching experience; and

(C) significant professional publications; and

(3) if available, a departmental budget report of the department under which the course is offered, from the most recent semester or other academic term during which the institution offered the course.

(a-1) A curriculum vitae made available on the institution's Internet website under Subsection (a) may not include any personal information, including the instructor's home address or home telephone number.

(b) The information required by Subsection (a) must be:

(1) accessible from the institution's Internet website home page by use of not more than three links;

(2) searchable by keywords and phrases; and

(3) accessible to the public without requiring registration or use of a user name, a password, or another user identification.

(c) The institution shall make the information required by Subsection (a) available not later than the seventh day after the first day of classes for the semester or other academic term during which the course is offered. The institution shall continue to make the information available on the institution's Internet website until at least the second anniversary of the date on which the institution initially posted the information.

(d) The institution shall update the information required by Subsection (a) as soon as practicable after the information changes.

(e) The governing body of the institution shall designate an administrator to be responsible for ensuring implementation of this section. The administrator may assign duties under this section to one or more administrative employees.

(f) Not later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, each institution of higher education shall submit a written report regarding the institution's compliance with this section to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the presiding officer of each legislative standing committee with primary jurisdiction over higher education.

(g) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.

(h) Institutions of higher education included in this section shall conduct end-of-course student evaluations of faculty and develop a plan to make evaluations available on the institution's website.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 681 (H.B. 2504), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.9741. INTERNET ACCESS TO FINANCIAL TRANSACTIONS. (a) Each institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, shall post on the institution's Internet website a copy of the institution's financial transactions to the extent necessary to provide, for each payment drawn from money appropriated from the state general revenue fund or received as student tuition or fee payments:

(1) the amount of the payment;

(2) the date of the payment;

(3) a brief description of the purpose of the payment; and

(4) the name of the payee.

(b) An institution of higher education may comply with this section by providing on the institution's Internet website an easily noticeable direct link, the purpose of which is clearly identifiable, to an Internet website maintained by the comptroller that provides information concerning the institution that is similar to the information required under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1.03, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.9745. INTERNET ACCESS TO FACULTY INFORMATION. (a) Each general academic teaching institution, as defined by Section 61.003, shall make available to the public on the institution's Internet website the following information for the institution:

(1) the student/faculty ratio;

(2) the percentage of all full-time equivalent faculty members with teaching responsibility who are tenured or tenure track;

(3) the percentage of semester credit hours taken by students classified as freshmen or sophomores that are taught by tenured and tenure track faculty members;

(4) the number of faculty members in each of the following faculty ranks, including a breakdown for each rank showing the numbers of faculty members by race, ethnicity, and gender:

(A) professor;

(B) associate professor;

(C) assistant professor;

(D) instructor;

(E) nontenured or nontenure track; and

(F) teaching assistant;

(5) average faculty salaries by rank;

(6) the amount of money appropriated by the legislature per full-time equivalent faculty member and full-time equivalent student;

(7) the total revenue the institution spent per full-time equivalent faculty member and full-time equivalent student;

(8) the amount of federal and private research expenditures per tenured or tenure track full-time equivalent faculty member;

(9) the number and percentage of faculty members holding extramural research grants;

(10) the number and names of awards to faculty members from nationally recognized entities, including those identified by The Center for Measuring University Performance; and

(11) the number of endowed professorships or chairs.

(b) Each institution to which this section applies shall update the information required by Subsection (a) for the preceding academic or fiscal year, as applicable, not later than December 31 of each year.

(c) The administrator designated under Section 51.974 by an institution to which this section applies is responsible for ensuring implementation of this section. The administrator may assign duties under this section to one or more administrative employees.

(d) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules necessary to administer this section, including rules to ensure the consistency of information made available under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51.9746. INTERNET ACCESS TO EMPLOYMENT DATA. (a) In this section, "general academic teaching institution" and "public state college" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Each general academic teaching institution other than a public state college shall maintain in a prominent location on the institution's Internet website a link to the Texas Consumer Resource for Education and Workforce Statistics ("Texas CREWS") report on gainful employment applicable to the institution for the most recent year for which that report is available.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 720 (H.B. 1287), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 51.975. SHARING OF UNDERUSED CLASSROOMS. (a) A public institution of higher education may make the institution's classrooms not scheduled for use by the institution or by students, student organizations, or faculty of the institution between 5 p.m. and 10 p.m. on one or more weekdays or between 8 a.m. and 5 p.m. on one or more Saturdays available for that day to another public junior college on request for teaching courses in the core curriculum, as defined by Section 61.821, or continuing education courses.

(b) A public institution of higher education that under Subsection (a) makes a classroom available to another institution shall continue to make that classroom, or a comparable classroom, available to the other institution for the duration of the semester or other academic term.

(c) An institution of higher education may charge another institution for the use of a classroom under this section at a rate not to exceed the rate permitted for this purpose as determined by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board. The coordinating board shall establish those rates in an amount to reimburse the host institution for utility costs and other costs, such as maintenance and custodial services, based on the infrastructure formula funding that the host institution would receive if teaching a course in that space itself for that time.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 608 (H.B. 746), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51.976. TRAINING AND EXAMINATION PROGRAM FOR EMPLOYEES OF CAMPUS PROGRAMS FOR MINORS ON WARNING SIGNS OF SEXUAL ABUSE AND CHILD MOLESTATION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Camper" means a minor who is attending a campus program for minors.

(2) "Campus program for minors" means a program that:

(A) is operated by or on the campus of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education;

(B) offers recreational, athletic, religious, or educational activities for at least 20 campers who:

(i) are not enrolled at the institution; and

(ii) attend or temporarily reside at the camp for all or part of at least four days; and

(C) is not a day camp or youth camp as defined by Section 141.002, Health and Safety Code, or a facility or program required to be licensed by the Department of Family and Protective Services.

(3) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(4) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(5) "Private or independent institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(6) "Program operator" means a person who owns, operates, or supervises a campus program for minors, regardless of profit.

(7) "Training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation" means a program approved by the department under Subsection (f).

(b) A program operator may not employ an individual in a position involving contact with campers at a campus program for minors unless:

(1) the individual submits to the program operator or the campus program for minors has on file documentation that verifies the individual within the preceding two years successfully completed the training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation; or

(2) the individual successfully completes the campus program for minors training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation, which must be approved by the department, during the individual's first five days of employment by the campus program for minors and the campus program issues and files documentation verifying successful completion.

(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to an individual who is a student enrolled at the institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education that operates the campus program for minors or at which the campus program is conducted and whose contact with campers is limited to a single class of short duration.

(d) A program operator must:

(1) submit to the department:

(A) on the form and within the time prescribed by the department verification that each employee of the campus program for minors has complied with the requirements of this section; and

(B) the fee assessed by the department under Subsection (g); and

(2) retain in the operator's records a copy of the documentation required or issued under Subsection (b) for each employee until the second anniversary of the examination date.

(e) A person applying for or holding an employee position involving contact with campers at a campus program for minors must successfully complete the training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation during the applicable period prescribed by Subsection (b).

(f) The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission by rule shall establish criteria and guidelines for the training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation required by this section. The program must include training and an examination on the topics listed in Section 141.0095(e), Health and Safety Code. The department may approve training and examination programs on sexual abuse and child molestation offered by trainers under contract with campus programs for minors or by online training organizations or may approve programs offered in another format authorized by the department.

(g) The department may assess a fee in the amount necessary to cover the costs of administering this section to:

(1) each person that applies for the department's approval of a training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation under this section; and

(2) each program operator who files with the department the verification form required under Subsection (d)(1)(A).

(h) The department at least every five years shall review each training and examination program on sexual abuse and child molestation approved by the department under Subsection (f) to ensure the program continues to meet the criteria and guidelines established by rule under that subsection.

(i) The department may investigate a person the department suspects of violating this section or a rule adopted under this section. A person who violates this section is subject to the enforcement provisions of Section 141.015, Health and Safety Code, as if the person violated Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, or a rule adopted under that chapter.

(j) The program operator and the institution that operates the campus program for minors or at which the campus program is conducted are immune from civil or criminal liability for any act or omission of an employee for which the employee is immune under Section 261.106, Family Code.

(k) A program operator shall consider the costs of compliance with this section in determining any charges or fees imposed and collected for participation in the campus program for minors.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 447 (S.B. 1414), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 51.9761. CHILD ABUSE REPORTING POLICY AND TRAINING. (a) In this section, "other maltreatment" has the meaning assigned by Section 42.002, Human Resources Code.

(b) Each institution of higher education shall adopt a policy governing the reporting of child abuse and neglect as required by Chapter 261, Family Code, for the institution and its employees. The policy must require each employee of the institution to report child abuse and neglect in the manner required by Chapter 261, Family Code.

(c) Each institution of higher education shall provide training for employees who are professionals as defined by Section 261.101, Family Code, in prevention techniques for and the recognition of symptoms of sexual abuse and other maltreatment of children and the responsibility and procedure of reporting suspected occurrences of sexual abuse and other maltreatment. The training must include:

(1) techniques for reducing a child's risk of sexual abuse or other maltreatment;

(2) factors indicating a child is at risk for sexual abuse or other maltreatment;

(3) the warning signs and symptoms associated with sexual abuse or other maltreatment and recognition of those signs and symptoms; and

(4) the requirements and procedures for reporting suspected sexual abuse or other maltreatment as provided by Chapter 261, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 939), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.977. EMPLOYMENT POLICIES FOR NURSES IN MEDICAL AND DENTAL UNITS. (a) The president of a medical and dental unit, as defined by Section 61.003, shall determine whether a nurse employed by the unit for patient care or clinical activities is a full-time employee for purposes of:

(1) employees group benefits under Chapter 1551 or 1601, Insurance Code;

(2) leave under Chapter 661 or 662, Government Code;

(3) longevity pay under Section 659.043, Government Code.

(b) A determination under Subsection (a) does not entitle a nurse who works less than 40 hours a week to the full state contribution to the cost of any coverage or benefits. However, from money other than money appropriated from the general revenue fund, the employing medical and dental unit may contribute to that cost amounts in excess of the state contribution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 2426), Sec. 72, eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 51.969 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(9), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.978. TEMPORARY HOUSING BETWEEN ACADEMIC TERMS FOR CERTAIN STUDENTS FORMERLY UNDER CONSERVATORSHIP OF DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Academic term" includes a summer session.

(b) To be eligible to receive housing assistance from an institution of higher education under Subsection (c), a student must:

(1) have been under the conservatorship of the Department of Family and Protective Services or its predecessor in function on the day preceding:

(A) the student's 18th birthday; or

(B) the date the student's disabilities of minority are removed by a court under Chapter 31, Family Code;

(2) be enrolled full-time at the institution during the academic term immediately preceding the period for which the student requests the housing assistance;

(3) be registered or otherwise have taken the actions required by the institution to permit the student to enroll full-time at the institution during the academic term immediately following the period for which the student requests the housing assistance; and

(4) lack other reasonable temporary housing alternatives between the academic terms described by Subdivisions (2) and (3), as determined by the institution.

(c) On the student's request, each institution of higher education shall assist an eligible student in locating temporary housing for any period beginning on the last day of an academic term and ending on the first day of the immediately following academic term, according to the institution's academic calendar.

(d) For each eligible student under Subsection (b) who also demonstrates financial need, the institution may:

(1) provide a stipend to cover any reasonable costs of the temporary housing that are not covered by other financial aid immediately available to the student for that purpose; or

(2) provide temporary housing directly to the student for the applicable period.

(e) The receipt of a stipend under Subsection (d) does not prohibit the student from receiving additional stipends under that subsection in one or more subsequent periods, based on the student's demonstrated financial need.

(f) An institution of higher education may use any available revenue, including legislative appropriations, and may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations for the purposes of this section. The institution shall use any gifts, grants, and donations received for the purposes of this section before using other revenue.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 703 (H.B. 452), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 51.976 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(10), eff. September 1, 2013.